li i jiiiiawuwiiii!^^ 




The Social 
Revolution 




E16 

kt90E Mmmsmm m 



KARL KAUTSKY 



I 



uuu.,^H3f. ^^^'^^^J^;^^ 




^^1* 



THE 

SOCIAL REVOLUTION 



BY 

KARL KAUTSKY 



I. Reform and Revolution 
II. The Day After the Revolution 



TRANSLATED BY 

A. M. AND MAY WOOD SIMONS 



CHICAGO 

CHARLES H. KERR & COMPANY 
CO-OPERATIVE 



TRANSLATOR'S PREFACE 



The greater part of the first half of this trans- 
lation was already completed before the num- 
bers of Justice containing the translation of 
J. B. Askew reached us. Hence little use could 
be made of that work. Some comparisons with 
the first few pages were made in the proofs, 
and a few alterations made in accordance with 
suggestions there received, for which we wish 
to give due credit. The present translation has 
also been compared with the French translation 
of the first part which appeared in Le Mouve- 
mente Socialiste. 

Finally we wish to extend our thanks to 
Comrade Kautsky for his kind permission to 
bring this translation of what we believe to be 
one of the most important contributions made 
to Socialist literature during the last decade 
before American readers. 

A. M. Simons, 
May Wood Simons. 



COPYRIGHT, 1902, BY 

Oharlss H. Ksbr ft Company. 



ERINDALE 
COLLEGE 
LIBRARY 



AUTHOR'S PREFACE 



The following writings owe their existence 
to the action of a Socialist Heading Circle in 
Amsterdam, a society largely composed of 
Academics, who invited me to speak there and 
in Delft. Among the themes that I suggested 
was that of Social Kevolution. But as the com- 
rades in both cities selected the same theme, 
and I did not wish to repeat myself, I divided 
my subject into two essays practically independ- 
ent from one another, but connected in their 
general thought, and called it "Reform and Rev- 
olution" and "On the Day After the Revolu- 
tion." 

The Society wished to publish these essays 
and naturally I had no reason to object to this, 
but in the interest of their circulation I pro- 
posed that they be issued by the German Party 
Publishing House, to which the Holland com- 
rades very gladly agreed. 

It is not a stenographic report of the lectures 
that is here given. I have included many lines 
of thought, in the writing which would have 
been too long to have given in the lectures. 
But in general I have kept within the limits 
of the lecture and have not sought to make a 
book of it. 

The purpose of the work shows for itself 
and needs no explanation. It had a special ap- 
plication for Holland in that shortly before 
3 



author's preface. 



my lectures, which took place on th e 22d and 
24th of April, 1902, the former minister Pier- 
son EM~inl(3!e' an assertion in a public assem- 
blage, and argued for it, that a proletarian 
revolution must, for certain necessary reasons, 
be avoided. Mj lectures form a direct answer 
to this. The Minister was, however, so friendly 
as to attend the second one, where he made in- 
dustrious notes and did not offer a word against 
me. 

Because of the predominating academic 
character of the public that attended, aside from 
local and propagandist reasons, I was led to 
choose the theme of Social Revolution for the 
lecture. The Academics are those among us 
who are least friendly to the idea of revolu- 
tion, at least in Germany. All things consid- 
ered, however, the case appeared somewhat dif- 
ferent in Holland and the applause of my audi- 
ence there very pleasantly surprised me. My 
assertions raised scarcely any antagonism, but 
only approval. I hope that this is not entirely 
because of international politeness. If not, 
Marxism has a body of strong representatives 
among the Academics of Holland. 

I can wish nothing better than that my at- 
tempt should receive the same approval among 
German comrades that it has found among 
those of Holland, and I extend my thanks to 
the latter for the friendly reception they have 
given me in a very agreeable duty. 

K. Kautsky. 



THE 

SOCIAL REVOLUTION 



THE COITCEPT OF SOCIAL EEVOLTJTION. 

There are few conceptions over which there 
has been so much contention, as over that of 
revolution. This can partially be ascribed to 
the fact that nothing is so contrary to exist- 
ing interests and prejudices as this concept, 
and partially to the fact that few things are so 
ambiguous. 

As a rule, events can not be so sharply de- 
fined as things. Especially is this true of 
social events, which are extremely complicated, 
and grow ever more complicated the further 
society advances — the more various the forms 
of co-operation of humanity become. Among 
the most complicated of these events is the 
Social Revolution, which is a complete trans- 
formation of the wonted forms of associated 
activity among men. 

It is no wonder that this word, which every 
one uses, but each one in a different sense, is 
sometimes used by the same persons at dif- 
ferent times in very different senses. Some 
understand by Revolution barricades, «onflagra- 
5 



6 THE S mJIAL revolution. 

tions of castles, guillotines, September mas- 
sacres and a coni bination of all sorts of hideous 
things. Others would seek to take all sting 
away from the word and use it in the sense 
of great hut imperceptible and peaceful trans- 
formations of society, like, for instance, those 
which took place through the discovery of 
America or by the invention of the steam en- 
gine. Between these two definitions there are 
many grades of meaning. 
/ Marx, in his introduction to the ^^Critique 
(of Political Economy," defines social revohi- 
\ tion as a more or less rapid transformation 
J of the foundations of the juridical and political 
superstructure of society arising from a change 
/ in its economic foundations. If we hold close 
I to this definition we at once eliminate from 
the idea of social revolution "changes in the 
economic foundations," as, for example, those 
which proceeded from the steam engine or the 
discovery of America. These alterations are 
the causes of revolution, not the revolution it- 
self. 

But I do not wish to confine myself too 
strictly to this definition of social revolution. 
There is a still narrower sense in which we 
can use it. In this case it does not signify 
either the transformation of the juridical and 

I political superstructure of society, but only 
some particular form or particular method of 
transformation. 

Every socialist strives for social revolution 



J 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. T 

in the wider sense, and yet there are socialists 
who disclaim revolution and would attain so- 
cial transformation only through reform. They 
contrast social revolution with social reform. 
It is this contrast which we are discussing to- 
day in our ranks. I wish here to consider 
social revolution in the narrow sense of a par- 
ticular method of social transformation. 

The contrast between reform and revolution 
does not consist in the application of force in 
one case and not in the other. Every juridical 
and political measure is a force measure which 
is carried through by the force of the State. 
ISTeither do any particular forms of the appli- 
cation of force, as, for example, street fights, 
or executions, constitute the essentials of revo- 
lution in contrast to reform. These arise from 
particular circumstances, are not necessarily 
connected with revolutions, and may easily 
accompany reform movements. The constitu- 
tion of the delegates of the third Estate at the 
Kational Assembly of France, on June 17, 
1789, was an eminently revolutionary act with 
no apparent use of force. This same France 
had, on the contrary, in 1774 and 1775, great 
insurrections for the single and in no way revo- 
lutionary purpose of changing the bread tax in 
order to stop the rise in the price of bread. 

The reference to street fights and executions 
as characteristic of revolutions is, however, a 
clue to the source from which we can obtain im- 
portant teachings as to the essentials of revolu- 



1 



8 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTIOIT. 

tion. The great transformation which began in 
France in 17S9 has become the classical type 
of revolution. It is the one which is ordi- 
narily in mind when revolution is spoken of. 
From it we can best study the essentials of 
revolution and the contrast between it and re- 
form. This revolution was preceded by a se- 
ries of efforts at reform, among which the best 
known are those of Turgot. These attempts 
in many cases aimed at the same things which 
the revolution carried out. What distinguished 
the reforms of Turgot from the corresponding 
measures of the revolution? Between the two 
^ lay the conquest of political power by a new 
"^ class, and in this lies the essential difference 
between revolution and reform. Measures 
which seek to adjust the juridical and political 
superstructure of society, to changed economic 
conditions, are reforms if they proceed from 
the class which is the political and economic 
ruler of society. _„They are reforms whether 
they are given freely or secured by the pressure 
of the subject class, or conquered j:hrough the 
power of circumstances. On the contrary, those 
measures are the results of revolution if they 
proceed from the class which has been economic- 
ally and politically oppressed and who have 
now captured political power and who must in 
their own interest more or less rapidly trans- 
form the political and juridical superstructure 
and create new forms of social co-operation. 
The conquest of the governmental power by 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 



V 



an hitherto oppressed class, iu other words, a 
political revolution, is accordingly the essential 
characteristic of social revolution in this nar- 
row sense, in contrast with social reform. Those \ 
who repudiate political revolution as the prin- / 
cipal means of social transformation or wish 
to confine this to such measures as have been 
granted by the ruling class are social reformers, i 
no matter how much their social ideas may 
antagonize existing social forms. On the con- ^ 
trary, any one is a revolutionist who seeks to ^ 
conquer the political power for an hitherto op- / 
pressed class, and he does not lose this character 
if he prepares and hastens this conquest by 
social reforms wrested from the ruling classes. 
It is not the striving after social reforms but / 
the explicit confi.ning of one's self to them which 
distinguishes the social reformer from the so- 
cial revolutionist. On the other hand, a politi- 
cal revolution can only become a social revo 
lution when it proceeds from an hitherto so- 
cially oppressed class. Such a class is compelled 
to complete its political emancipation by its 
social emancipation because its previous social 
position is in irreconcilable antagonism to its 
political domination. A split in the ranks oA 
the ruling classes, no matter even if it should ( 
take on the violent form of civil war, is notj 
a social revolution. In the following pages we 
shall only discuss social revolution in the sense 
here defined. 



10 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

EVOLUTION AND REVOLUTION. 

A social reform can very well be in accord 
with the interests of the ruling class. It may 
for the moment leave their social domination 
untouched, or, under certain circumstances, can 
even strengthen it. Social revolution, on the 
contrary, is from the first incompatible with 
the interests of the ruling class, since under all 
circumstances it signifies annihilation of their 
power. Little wonder that the present ruling 
class continuously slander and stigmatize revo- 
lution because they believe that it threatens 
their position. They contrast the idea of so- 
cial revolution with that of social reform, which 
they praise to the very heavens, very frequently 
indeed without ever permitting it to become an 
earthly fact. The arguments against revolu- 
tion are derived from the present ruling forms 
of thought. So long as Christianity ruled the 
minds of men the idea of revolution was re- 
jected as sinful revolt against divinely consti- 
tuted authority. It was easy to find proof 
texts for this in the 'New Testament, since this 
was written at the time of the Roman Empire, 
during an epoch in which every revolt against 
the ruling powers appeared hopeless, and all 
independent political life had ceased to exist. 
The revolutionary classes, to be sure, replied 
with quotations from the Old Testament, in 
which there still lived much of the spirit of a 
primitive pastoral democracy. Wlien once the 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 11 

judicial manner of thought displaced the theo- 
logical, a revolution was defined as a violent 
break with the existing legal order. ITo one,' 
however, could have a right to the destruction 
of rights, a right of revolution was an absurd- 
ity, and revolution in all cases a crime. But 
the representatives of the aspiring class placed 
in opposition to the existing, historically de- 
scended right, the right for which they strove, 
representing it as an eternal law of nature and 
reason, and an inalienable right of humanity. 
The re-conquest of these latter rights, that 
plainly could have been lost only through a vio- 
lation of rights, was itself impossible without 
a violation of rights, even if they came as a 
result of revolution. 

To-day the theological phrases have lost their 
power to enslave, and, most of all, among the 
revolutionary classes of the people. E.eference 
to historical right has also lost its force. The 
revolutionary origin of present rights and pres- 
ent government is still so recent that their 
legitimacy can be challenged. ITot alone the 
government of France, but the dynasties of 
Italy, Spain, Bulgaria, England and Holland, 
are of revolutionary origin. The kings of Ba- 
varia and Wurtemburg, the grand duke of 
Baden and Hesse, owe, not simply their titles, 
but a large share of their provinces, to the pro- 
tection of the revolutionary parvenu Napoleon ; 
the Hohenzollems attained their present posi- 
tions over the ruing of thrones, and even the 



12 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

Hapsburgers bowed before the Hungarian revo- 
lution. Andrassy, vrho V7as hung in effigy for 
high treason in 1852, was an imperial minister 
in 1867, without proving untrue to the ideas 
of the national Hungarian revolution of 1848. 

The bourgeoisie was itself actively engaged 
in all these violations of historical rights. It 
cannot, now, since it has become the ruling 
class, well condemn revolution in the name of 
this right to revolution, even if its legal phil- 
osophy does everything possible to reconcile 
natural and historical rights. It must seek 
more effective arguments with which to stigma- 
tize the revolution, and these are found in the 
newly-arising natural science with its accom- 
panying mental attitude. While the bour- 
geoisie were still revolutionary, the catastrophic 
theory still ruled in natural science (geology 
and biology). This theory proceeded from 
the premise that natural development came 
through great sudden leaps. Once the capitalist 
revolution was ended, the place of the catas- 
trophic theory was taken by the hypothesis of a 
gradual imperceptible development, proceeding 
by the accumulation of countless little advances 
and adjustments in a competitive struggle. To 
the revolutionary bourgeoisie the thought of 
catastrophes in nature was very acceptable, but 
to the conservative bourgeoisie these ideas ap- 
peared irrational and unnatural. 

Of course I do not assert that the scientific 
investigation had all their theories determined 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 13 

by the political and social needs of the bour- 
geoisie. It was just the representatives of the 
catastrophe theories who were at the same time 
most reactionary and least inclined to revolu- 
tionary views. But every one is involuntarily 
influenced by the mental attitude of the class 
amid which he lives and carries something Irom 
it into his scientific conceptions. In the case 
of Darwin we know positively that his nat- 
ural science hypotheses were influenced by 
Malthus, that decisive opponent of revolution. 
It was not wholly accidental that the theories 
of evolution (of Darwin and Lyell) came from 
England, whose history for 250 years has 
shown nothing more than revolutionary begin- 
nings, whose point the ruling class have al- 
ways been able to break at the opportune mo- 
ment. 

The fact that an idea emanates from any 
particular class, or accords with their interests, 
of course proves nothing as to its truth or 
falsity. But its historical influence does de- 
pend upon just these things. That the new 
theories of evolution were quickly accepted by 
the great popular masses, who had absolutely 
no possibility of testing them, proves that they 
rested upon profound needs of those classes. 
On the one side these theories — and this gave 
them their value to the revolutionary classes — 
abolished in a much more radical manner than 
the old catastrophic theories, all necessity of 
a recognition of a supernatural power creat- 



14 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

ing a world hj successive acts. On the other 

C side— and this pleased most highly the bour- 
geoisie — ^they declared all revolutions and 
catastrophies to be something abnormal, con- 
trary to the laws of nature, and wholly ab- 
surd. Whoever seeks to-day to scientifically 
attack revolution does it in the name of the 
theory of evolution, demonstrating that nature 
makes no leaps, that consequently any sudden 
change of social relations is impossible; that 
advance is only possible through the accumula- 
tion of little changes and ^slight, improvements, 
called social reforms. Considered from this 
point of view revolution is an unscientific con- 
ception about which scientifically cultured peo- 
ple only shrug their shoulders./ 

It might be replied that the analogy between 
natural and social laws is by no means perfect. 
To be sure, our conception of the one will 
unconsciously influence our conception of the 
other sphere as we have already seen. This is 
however, no advantage and it is better to re- 
strain rather than favor this transference of 
laws from one sphere to another. To be sure, 
all progress in methods of observation and com- 
prehension of any one sphere can and will im- 
prove our methods and comprehension in 
others, but it is equally true that within each 
one of these spheres there are peculiar laws not 
applying to the others. 

First of all must be noted the fundamental 
distinction between animate and inanimate na- 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 15 

ture. Xo one would claim on the ground of 
external similarity to transfer without change 
a law which applied to one of these spheres to 
the other. One would not seek to solve the 
problem of sexual reproduction and heredity by 
the laws of chemical affiliation. But the same 
error is committed when natural laws are ap- 
plied directly to society, as for example when 
competition is justified as a natural necessity 
because of the law of the struggle for sur- 
vival, or when the laws of natural evolutiod. 
are invoked to show the impossibility of sociaj 
revolution. 

But there is still more to be said in reply. 
If the old catastrophic theory is gone forever 
from the natural sciences, the new theory which 
makes of evolution only a series of little, in- 
significant changes meets with ever stronger 
objections. Upon one side there is a growing 
tendency toward quietistic, conservative the- 
ories that reduce evolution itself to a minimum, 
on the other side facts are compelling us to give 
an ever greater importance to catastrophes in 
natural development. This applies equally to 
the geological theories of Lyell and the or- 
ganic evolution of Darwin. 

This has given rise to a sort of synthesis of 
the old catastrophic theories and the newer 
evolutionary theories, similar to the synthesis 
that is found in Marxism. Just as Marxism 
distinguishes between the gradual economic 
development and the sudden transformation of 



16 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

the juridical and political superstructure, so 
many of the new biological and geological the- 
ories recognize alongside of the slow accumula- 
tion of slight and even infinitesimal alterations, 
also sudden profound transformations — catas- 
trophies — that arise from the slower evolution. 

A notable example of this is furnished by 
the observations of de Bries reported at the 
last Congress of ^NTatural Sciences held at Ham- 
burg. He has discovered that the species of 
plants and animals remain unchanged through 
a long period ; some of them finally disappear, 
when they have become too old to longer adapt 
themselves to the conditions of existence, that 
have in the meantime been changing. Other 
species are more fortunate; they suddenly 
^'explode," as he has himself expressed it, in 
order to give life to countless new forms, some 
of which continue and multiply, while the 
others, not being adapted to the conditions of 
existence, disappear. 

I have no intention of drawing a conclusion 
in favor of revolution from these new observa- 
tions. That would be to fall into the same 
error as those who argue to the rejection of 
revolution from the theory of evolution. But 
these observations at least show that the 
scientists are themselves not wholly agreed as to 
the part played in organic and geologic develop- 
ment by catastrophies, and for this reason it 
would be an error to attempt to draw from 
either of these hypotheses any fixed conclusions 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 17 

as to the role played by revolution in social 
development. 

If in spite of these facts such conclusions 
are still insisted upon, then we can reply to 
them with a very popular and familiar illus- 
tration, which demonstrates in an unmistakable 
manner that nature does make sudden leaps : I 
refer to the act of birth. The act of birth is a 
leap. At one stroke a fetus, which had hitherto 
constituted a portion of the organism of the 
mother, sharing in her circulation, receiving 
nourishment from her, without breathing, be- 
comes an independent human being, with its 
own circulatory system, that breathes and cries, 
takes its own nourishment and utilizes its di- 
gestive tract. 

The analogy between birth and revolution, 
however, does not rest alone upon the sudden- 
ness of the act. If we look closer we shall 
find that this sudden transformation at birth is 
confined wholly to functions. The organs de- 
velop slowly, and must reach a certain stage of 
development before that leap is possible, which 
suddenly gives them their new functions. If 
the leap takes place before this stage of de- 
velopment is attained, the result is not the 
beginning of new functions for the organs, but 
the cessation of all functions — the death of the 
new creature. On the other hand, the slow 
development of organs in the body of the 
mother can only proceed to a certain point, they 
cannot begin their new functions without the 



18 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTlt)N. 

revolutionary act of birth. This becomes in- 
evitable when the development of the organs 
has attained a certain height. 

We find the same thing in society. Here 
also the revolutions are the result of slow, 
gradual development (evolution). Here also it 
is the social organs that develop slowly. That 
which may be changed suddenly, at a leap, 
revolutionarily, is their functions. The railroad 
has been slowly developed. On the other hand, 
the railroad can suddenly be transformed from 
its function as the instrument to the enrich- 
ment of a number of capitalists, into a socialist 
enterprise having as its function the serving 
of the common good. And as at the birth of the 
child, all the functions are simultaneously revo- 
lutionized — circulation, breathing, digestion — 
so all the functions of the railroad must be 
simultaneously revolutionized at one stroke, for 
they are all most closely bound together. They 
cannot be gradually and successively socialized, 
one after the other, as if, for example, we 
would transform to-day the functions of the 
engineer and fireman, a few years later the 
ticket agents, and still later the accountants and 
book-keepers, and so on. This fact is perfectly 
clear with a railroad, but the successive social- 
ization of the different functions of a railroad 
is no less abcurd than that of the ministry of 
a centralized state. Such a ministry consti- 
tutes a single organism whose organs must co- 
operate. The functions of one of these organs 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 19 

cannot be modified without equally modifying 
all the others. The idea of the gradual con- 
quest of the various departments of a ministry 
by the Socialists is not less absurd than would 
be an attempt to divide the act of birth into a 
number of consecutive monthly acts, in each 
of which one organ only would be transformed 
from the condition of a fetus to an independent 
child, and meanwhile leaving the child itself at- 
tached to the navel cord until it had learned to 
walk and talk. 

Since neither a railroad nor a ministry can 
be changed gradually, but only at a single 
stroke, embracing all the organs simultaneously, 
from capitalist to socialist functions, from an 
organ of the capitalist to an organ of the labor- 
ing class, and this transformation is possible 
only to such social organs as retain a certain de- 
gree of development, it may be remarked here 
that with the maternal organism it is possible to 
scientifically determine the moment when the 
degree of maturity is attained, which is not 
true of society. 

On the other hand, birth does not mark the 
conclusion of the development of the human 
organism, but rather the beginning of a new 
epoch in development. The child comes now 
into new relations in which new organs are 
created, and those that previously existed are 
developed further in other directions; teeth 
grow in the mouth, the eyes learn to see; the 
hands to grasp, the feet to walk, the mouth to 



20 THE SOCIAL. KEVOLUTION. 

speak, etc. In the same way a social revolu- 
tion is not tlie conclusion of social development, 
but the beginning of a new form of develop- 
ment. A socialist revolution can at a single 
stroke transfer a factory from capitalist to 
social property. But it is only gradually, 
through a course of slow evolution, that one 
may transform a factory from a place of 
monotonous, repulsive, forced labor into an at- 
tractive spot for the joyful activity of happy 
human beings. A socialist revolution can at a 
single stroke transform the great bonanza farms 
into social property. In that portion of agri- 
culture where the little industry still rules, the 
organs of social and socialist production must 
be first created, and that can come only as a 
result o f s]o.w. development. 

It is thus apparent that the analogy between 
birth and revolution is rather far reaching. But 
this naturally proves nothing more than that 
one has no right to appeal to nature for proof 
that a social revolution is something unneces- 
sary, unreasonable, and unnatural. We have 
also, as we have already said, no right to apply 
conclusions drawn from nature directly to so- 
cial processes. We can go no further upon the 
ground of such analogies than to conclude : that 
as each animal creature must at one time go 
through a catastrophe in order to reach a higher 
stage of development (the act of birth or of the 
breaking of a shell), so society can only be 
raised to a higher stage of development through 
a catastrophe. 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 21 

BEVOLUTIONS IN ANTIQUITY AND THE MIDDLE 

AGES. 

Any definite conclusion as to whether revo- 
lution is a necessity or not can be drawn only 
from an investigation of the facts of social 
development, and not through analogies with 
natural science. It is only necessary to glance 
at these earlier stages of development in order 
to see that social revolution, in the narrow sense 
in which we are here using it, is no necessary 
accompaniment of social development. There 
was a social development and a very far-reach- 
ing one before the rise of class antagonisms and 
political power. In these stages the conquest 
of political power by an oppressed class, and 
consequently a social revolution, was as a matter 
of course impossible. 

Even after class antagonisms and political 
power have arisen it is a long time before we 
find, either in antiquity or the Middle Ages, 
anything which corresponds to our idea of revo- 
lution. We find plenty of examples of bitter 
class struggles, civil wars and political catas- 
trophies, but none of these brought about a fun- 
damental and permanent renovation of the 
conditions of property and therewith a new 
social form. 

To my mind the reasons for this are as fol- 
lows: In antiquity and also in the Middle 
Ages the center of gravity of the economic and 
also of the political life lay in the community. 



22 THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTION. 

Each community was sufficient in itself in all 
essential points and was only attached to the 
exterior world through loose bands. The great 
states were only conglomerates of communities 
which were held together only through either a 
dynasty or through another ruling and exploit- 
ing community. Each community had its own 
special economic development corresponding to 
its own peculiar characteristics and correspond- 
ing to these also its special class struggles. The 
political revolutions also at that time were 
chiefly only communal revolutions. It was as 
a matter of course impossible to transform the 
whole social life of a great territory by a 
political revolution. 

The smaller the number of individuals in a 
social movement the less there is of a real 
social movement; the less there is of the uni- 
versal and law creating, and the more the per- 
sonal and the accidental dominate. This in- 
creased the diversity of the class struggles in 
the different communities. Because in the 
class struggle no movement of the masses could 
appear, because the general was concealed in 
the accidental and the personal, there could be 
no deep recognition of social causes and the 
goals of class movements. However great the 
philosophy created by the Greeks, the idea 
of a scientific national economy was foreign to 
them. Aristotle supplies only outlines of such 
a system. The Greeks and Romans on the 
economic field produced only practical instruc; 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. Zo 

tions for domestic economy, or for agricultural 
industries, such as those composed bj Xenophon 
and Varro. 

While the deeper social causes that gave rise 
to the condition of individual classes remained 
concealed and were veiled by the acts of indi- 
vidual persons and local peculiarities, it was 
not to be wondered at that the oppressed classes 
also, as soon as they had conquered political 
power, used it first of all to get rid of indi- 
viduals and local peculiarities ^ndjoot. to estab- 
lish a new socialjDTder. 

The niosf important obstacle in the road to 
any revolutionary movements at this time was 
the slowness of economic development. This 
proceeded imperceptibly. Peasants and artisans 
worked as their grandfathers and great-grand- 
fathers had been accustomed to work. The an- 
cient, the customary, was the only good and 
perfect thing. Even when one sought to create 
something new, he endeavored to prove to others 
that it was really a return to some forgotten 
tradition. Technical progress did not in itself 
compel new forms of property for it consisted 
only in increasing social division of labor, in 
the division of one trade into many. But, in 
each of the new trades, hand work was still fun- 
damental, the means of production were insig- 
nificant, and the decisive element was manual 
skill. To be sure, in the last years of antiquity, 
we find beside the peasants and the artisans 
great businesses (even industrial establish- 



24 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

ments), but these were operated by slaves who 
were considered as aliens outside of the com- 
munity life. These industries produced only 
luxuries and could develop no special economic 
strength, except temporarily in times of great 
wars which weakened agriculture and made 
slave material cheap. A high economic form 
and a new social ideal cannot arise upon a slave 
economy. 

The single form of capital which was devel- 
oped in antiquity and the Middle Ages was 
usury and commercial capital. Both of these 
may, at times, bring about rapid economic 
cfhanges. But commercial capital could only 
further the division of the old trades into count- 
less new ones and the advance of the great in- 
dustry dependent on slave labor. Usurious 
capital operated simply to stunt existing forms 
of production without creating new ones. The 
struggle against usurious capital and against the 
great agricultural industries which were operat- 
ed by slaves led to occasional political struggles 
Yerj similar to the social revolutions of our 
time. But the goal of these was always only 
the restoration of an earlier condition and not 
a social renovation. Such was the case in the 
liquidation of debts brought about for the Greek 
peasants, by Solon, and in the movements of 
the Roman peasants and proletarians from 
which the Gracchi receive their name. To all 
of these causes — slowness of economic develop- 
ment, lack of recognition of deeper social rela- 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 25 

tioiis, division of political life into countless 
differing communities, must be added the fact 
that in classical antiquity and many times also 
in the Middle Ages, the means for the suppres- 
sion of a rising class were relatively insignifi- 
cant. There were no bureaucracies, or at least 
never where there was the most active political 
life, and where the class struggle was most 
fiercely waged. In the Roman world, for ex- 
ample, bureaucracy was first developed under 
the empire. The internal relations of com- 
munities as well as their commerce with each 
other were simple, easy to comprehend and pre- 
supposed no expert knowledge. The governing 
classes could easily secure the necessary govern- 
ing officials out of their own number, and this 
is all the more true in that at that time the 
governing class was also accustomed to engage 
in artistic, philosophic and political activity. 
The ruling class did not simply reign, it also 
governed. 

On the other side the mass of the people were 
not wholly defenceless. It was in just the 
golden age of classical antiquity that the militia 
system was the rule, under which every citizen 
was armed. Under those conditions a very 
slight alteration in the balance of power of 
classes was sufficient to bring a new class into 
control. Class antagonisms could not well 
reach such a height that the idea of a complete 
transformation of all existing institutions could 
become firmly rooted in the minds of an 



26 THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTIOjjq". 

oppressed class, and, moreover, in these op- 
pressed classes, stubborn clinging to all privi- 
leges was the rule. As has already been noted 
this operated to confine political revolution 
almost wholly to the abolition of individual 
abuses and the removal of individual persons. 
This condition also assisted in the avoidance 
through compromise of all forms of revolution. 

Among the great nations of modern times 
England is the one which most resembles the 
Middle Ages, not economically, but in its politi- 
cal form. Militarism and bureaucracy are there 
the least developed. It still possesses an aris- 
tocracy that not only reigns but governs. Cor- 
responding to this, England is the great modern 
nation in which the efforts of the oppressed 
classes are mainly confined to the removal of 
particular abuses instead of being directed 
against the whole social system. It is also the 
State in which the practice of protection against 
revolution through compromise is farthest de- 
veloped. 

If the universal armament of the people did 
not encourage great social revolutions, it did 
make it much easier for armed conflict between 
the classes to arise at the slightest opportunity. 
There is no lack of violent uprisings and civil 
wars in antiquity and the Middle Ages. The 
ferocity with which these were fought was often 
so great as to lead to the expulsion, expropria- 
tion and oftentimes to the extermination of the 
conquered. Those who consider violence as a 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 27 

sign of social revolution will find plenty of 
such revolutions in earlier ages. But those 
who conceive social revolution as the conquest 
of political power by a previously subservient 
class and the transformation of the juridical 
and political superstructure of society, particu- 
larly in the property relations, will find no so- 
cial revolution there. Social development pro- 
ceeded piece-meal, step by step, not through 
single great catastrophies but in countless little 
broken-up, apparently disconnected, often inter- 
rupted, ever renewing, mostly unconscious 
movements. The great social transformation of 
the times we are considering, the disapperance 
of slavery in Europe, came about so impercept- 
ibly that the contemporaries of this movement 
took no notice of it, and one is to-day compelled 
to reconstruct it through hypotheses. 

SOCIAL REVOLUTION UNDER CAPITALISM. 

Things took on a wholly different aspect as 
soon as the capitalist method of production 
was developed. It would lead us too far and . 
would be only to repeat things well known if j 
I were here to go into the mechanism of capital- j 
ism and its consequences. Su fiice it to s ayjthat I 
the capitalist meth.oAoX„pXQdlict^io the \ 

modern State, made _aij,_£nd to the poliScal | 

independence, of communities and at the same 
time their economic indejien^ence ceased, each 
became part ^f a. 3£9-fe*^^ftnd lost its special 



28 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

"; rights and special peculiarities. All were re- 
duced to the same level, all were given the same 

p laws, the same taxes, same courts, and were 
made subject to the same government. The 
modern State was thus forced to become a JTa- 
tional State and added to the other equalities the 
equality of language. 

The influence of governmental power upon 
the social life was now something wholly dif- 
ferent from what it was through antiquity or 
the Middle Ages. Every important political 
change in a great modern State influences at 
once with a single stroke and in the profoundest 
manner an enormous social sphere. The con- 
quest of political power by a previously subject 
class must, on this account, from now on, have 
wholly different social results than previously. 
As a result the power at the disposal of the 
modern State has grown enormously. The tech- 
nical revolution of capitalism reaches also to 
the technique of arms. Ever since the Reforma- 
tion the weapons of war have become more and 
more perfect, but also more costly. They thus 
become a privilege of governmental power. This 
fact alone separates the army from the people, 
even in those places where universal conscrip- 
tion prevails, unless this is supplemented by 
popular armament, which is not the case in any 
great State. Most important of all, the leaders 
of the army are professional soldiers separated 
from the people, to whom they stand opposed 
as a privileged class. 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 29 

The economic powers also of the modern cen- 
tralized State are enormous when compared 
with those of the earlier States. They compre- 
hend the wealth of a colossal sphere whose 
technical means of production leave the higher 
culture of antiquity far behind. 

The modern State also possesses a bureaucracy x 
far more centralized than that of any previous ] 
State. The problems of the modern State have / 
grown so enormously that it is impossible to / 
solve them without an extensive division of I 
labor and a high grade of professional knowl- I 
edge. The capitalist manner of production robs \ 
the ruling class of all the leisure that they pre- \ 
viously had. Even, if they do not produce but \ 
are living from the exploitation of the pro- I 
ducing classes, still they are not idle exploiters. / 
Thanks to competition, the motive force of / 
present economic life, the exploiters are con- j 
tinuously compelled to carry on an exhausting \ 
struggle with each other, which threatens the | 
vanquished with complete annihilation. / 

The capitalists have therefore neither time 
nor leisure, nor the previous culture necessary 
for artistic and scientific activity. They ladk 
even the necessary qualifications for regulai 
participation in governmental activities. Not 
only in art and science but also in the govern- 
ment of the State the ruling class is forced to 
take no part. They must leave that to wage- 
workers and bureaucratic employees. Xb-Q 
capitalist^laBS_iNeignsJbT^^ It 



30 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

is satisfied, however, to rule the government. 

In the same way the decaying feudal nobility 
before it, satisfied itself by taking on the forms 
of a royal nobility. But while with the feudal 
nobility the renunciation of its social functions 
was the product of corruption, with the capi- 
talists this renunciation arises directly from 
their social functions and is an essential part 
of their existence. 

With the help of such a powerful govern- 
ment a class can long maintain itself, even if 
it is superfluous. Yes, even if it has become 
injurious. And the stronger the power of the 
State, just so much the more does the govern- 
ing class rest upon it, just so much more stub- 
bornly will it cling to its privileges and all the 
less will it be inclined to grant concessions. 
The longer, however it maintains its domina- 
tion in this manner, the sharper become class 
antagonisms, the more pronounced must be the 
political collapse when it finally does come, and 
the deeper the social transformation that arises 
out of it, and the more apt the conquest of 
political power by an oppressed class to lead 
to revolution. 

Simultaneously the warring classes become 
more and more conscious of the social conse- 
quences of their political struggle. The capi- 
talist system of production tends to greatly 
accelerate the march of economic evolution. The 
economic transformation for which the century 
of invention has prepared the way is continued 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 31 

by the introduction of machines into industry. 
Since their introduction our economic relations 
are subject to continual change, not only by th(j 
rapid dissolution of the old but by the con- 
tinuous creation- of the new. The idea of the 
old, of the past, ceases to be equivalent to the 
tested, to the honorable, to the inviolable. It 
becomes synonymous with the imperfect and 
the outgrown. This idea is transplanted from 
the economic life into the field of art and 
science and politics. Just as in earlier days 
people clung without reason to the old, so to-day 
one gladly throws the old aside without reason 
just because it is old. And the time which is 
necessary in order to make a machine, an insti- 
tution, a theory outgrown becomes ever shorter. 
And if in former days men worked with the 
intention of building for eternity with all the 
devotedness that flows from such a conscious- 
ness, so to-day one works for the fleeting effect 
of a moment with all the frivolity of this con- 
sciousness. So that the creation of to-day is 
within a short time not simply unfashionable 
but also useless. 

The new is, however, just that thing that one 
observes, criticizes and investigates the most 
closely. The ordinary and the commonplace 
pass as a matter of course." Mankind studied 
the causes of eclipse much earlier than the ris- 
ing and setting of the sun. In the same way 
the incentive to investigate the laws of social 
(vhenomena was very slight so long as these phe- 



32 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

nomena were the ordinary, tlie matter-of-course, 
the "natural." This incentive must at once be 
strengthened as soon as new, hitherto unheard 
of formations appeared in the social life. It 
was not the old hereditary feudal economics, 
hut rather the newly appearing capitalist econo- 
mics that first roused scientific observation at 
the beginning of the seventeenth century. 

Economic science was encouraged still more 
by another motive. Capitalist production is 
mass production, social production. The typi- 
cal modern capitalist state is the great state. 
Modem economics, like modern politics, must 
deal with mass phenomena. The larger the 
number of similar appearances that one ob- 
serves, the greater the tendency to notice the 
universal — those indicating a social law — and 
the more the individual and the accidental dis- 
appear, the easier it is to discover the laws of 
social movements. The mathematical mass- 
observation of social phenomena, statistics, and 
the science of society that rises from political 
economy and reaches its highest point in the 
materialistic conception of history, has only 
been possible m the capitalist stage of produc- 
tion. Now for the first time classes could come 
to the full consciousness of the social signifi- 
cance of their struggles, and for the first time 
set before themselves great social goals, not as 
arbitrary dreams and pious wishes destined to 
be shattered on the hard facts, but as results 
of scientific insight into economic poSBibibities 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION". 33 

and necessities. To be sure this scientific 
thought can err, many of its conclusions can be 
shown to be illusions. But however great these 
errors may be, it cannot be deprived of the char- 
acteristic of every true science, the striving after 
a uniform conception of all phenomena under 
an indisputable whole. In social science this 
means the recognition of the social whole as a 
single organism in which one cannot arbitrarily 
and for itself alone change any single part. The 
socially oppressed class no longer directs its 
theoretical criticism against individual persons 
and tendencies, but against the total existing so- 
ciety. And just because of this fact every op- 
pressed class which conquers political power is 
driven to transform the whole social founda- 
tions. ' 

The capitalist society which sprang from the 
revolution of 1789 and its outcome was foreseen 
in its fundamental outlines by the physiocrats 
and their English followers. 

Upon this distinction between the modern 
states and society and the organizations of an- 
tiquity and the Middle Ages rests the difference 
in the manner of their development. The for- 
mer was predominantly unconscious, split up 
into local and personal strifes and the rebellion 
of countless little communities at different 
stages of development ; the latter grows more and 
more self-conscious and strives towards a great 
recognized social goal which has been deter- 
mined and is propagated by scientifically criti- 



34 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

cal work. Political revolutions are less fre- 
quent, but more comprehensive and their social 
results more extensive. 

The transition from the civil wars of an- 
tiquity and the Middle Ages to social revolu- 
tions in the previously used sense of the word 
was made by the Keformation, which belonged 
half to the Middle Ages and half to modern 
times. On a still higher stage was the English 
revolution of the middle of the seventeenth cen- 
tury, and finally the great French revolution 
becomes the classical type of social revolution, 
of which the uprisings of 1830 and 1848 were 
only faint echoes. 

Social revolution in the sense here meant is 
peculiar to the stage of social development of 
capitalist society and the capitalist state. It 
does not exist previous to capitalism, because 
the political boundaries were too narrow and 
social consciousness too undeveloped. It will 
disappear with capitalism because this can only 
be overthrown by the proletariat, which as the 
lowest of all social classes can use its domina- 
tion only to abolish all class domination and 
classes and therewith also the essential condi- 
tions of social revolution. 

There now arises a great question, a question 
that to-day affects us profoundly, because it has 
the greatest influence upon our political rela- 
tions to the present : Is the time of social revo- 
lufinn past, or j^n^/i Have we already the 
political conditions which can bring about a 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 35 

transition from capitalism to socialism without- 
political revolution, without the conquest of po- 
litical power by the proletariat, or must we still 
expect an epoch of decisive struggles for the 
possession of this power and therewith a revo- 
lutionary epoch ? Does the idea of social revolu- 
tion belong with those antiquated ideas which 
are held only by thoughtless echoers of out- 
grown conceptions or by demagogical specula- 
tors upon the applause of the unthinking masses, 
and which every honest modern person who 
dispassionately observes the facts of modern 
society must put aside ? 

That is the question. Certainly an import- 
ant question which a couple of phrases will not 
serve to dismiss. 

We have discovered that social revolution is 
a product of special historical conditions. They 
presuppose, not simply a highly developed class- 
antagonism, but also a great national state rising 
above all provincial and communal peculiarities, 
built upon a form of production that operates 
to level all local peculiarities, a powerful mili- 
tary and bureaucratic state, a science of politi- 
cal economy and a rapid rate of economic prog- 
ress. 

^one of these factors of social revolution have 
been decreasing in power during the last decade. 
Many of them, on the contrary, have been much 
strengthened. Kever was the rate of economic 
development more rapid. Scientific economics 
make, at least, a great extensive, if not intensive 



I 



36 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

growth, thanks to the newspapers. Kever was 
economio insight so broadly dispersed; never 
was the ruling class, as well as the mass of 
people, so much in a condition to comprehend 

j( the far-reaching consequences of its acts and 
strivings. This alone proves that we shall not 

A make the tremendous transition from capitalism 
to socialism unconsciously, and that we cannot 
slowly undermine the dominion of the exploit- 
ing class without this class being conscious of 
this, and consequently arming themselves and 

A using all their powers to suppress the strength 

I and influence of the growing proletariat. 

^ If, however, the insight into social relations 
was never so extensive as to-day, it is equally 
true that the governmental power was never so 
strong as now, nor the military, bureaucratic 
and economic forces so powerfully developed. 
It follows from this that the proletariat, when 
it shall have conquered the governmental pow- 
ers, will have thereby attained the power to at 
once bring about most extensive social changes. 
It also follows from this that the personal gov- 
erning class with the help of these powers can 
continue its existence and its plundering of the 
laboring class long after its economic necessity 
has ceased. The more, however, that the ruling 
classes support themselves with the State ma- 
chinery and misuse this for the purposes of ex- 
ploitation and oppression, just so» much more 
must the bitterness of the proletariat against 
them increase, class hatred grow, and the effort? 



THE SOCIAL EEVOI.UTION. 37 

to conquer the machinery of State increase in 
intensity. 

To be sure it has been claimed that this com- 
prehension of the newest socialist phenomena 
does not take account of the undeniable fact 
that the development proceeds in other direc- 
tions also. It is claimed also that the contrast 
between proletariat and bourgeoisie is not in- 
creasing, and in every modern State there are 
enough democratic arrangements to make it pos- 
sible for the proletariat, if not to gain the 
power, still to gain power gradually, step by 
step and steadily increasing, so that the neces- 
sity of a social revolution ceases. Let us see in 
how far these exceptions are justified. 

THE SOFTENING OF CLASS ANTAGONISMS. 

Let us turn next to the first objection that the 
social antagonism between bourgeoisie and pro- 
letariat is diminishing. I do not here refer to 
the question of industrial crises whose ameliora- 
tion was claimed a few years ago. This idea has 
been so energetically confuted since then by no- 
torious facts that I only need to refer to it here 
without attempting to enter upon a discussion 
which would lead us too far away. I do not 
wish either to make any further contribution to 
the debate over the already over-discussed, so- 
called theory of increasing misery, which, with 
a sort of cleverness, when one desires, can be 
endlessly spun out and which with us has more 
and more tended to turn on the definition of 
the word "misery- ^ than on the determination of 



88 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

definite facts. Socialists are all agreed that the 
capitalist manner of production when unhin- 
dered has as a result an increase of physical 
misery. They are also agreed that in present 
society the organization of the laboring class and 
the capture of governmental powers has attained 
a height where it is able to somewhat amelio- 
rate this misery. Finally they are agreed that 
the emancipation of the laboring class is not to 
be expected from its increasing demoralization, 
but from its increasing strength. 

The question of the antagonism between the 
bourgeoisie and proletariat is a wholly different 
one. It is primarily a question of increasing 
exploitation. 

That this does increase Marx proved a genera- 
tion ago, and to my mind no one has yet con- 
futed him. Whoever denies the increasing 
exploitation of the proletariat must, first of all, 
set about a refutation of Marx's Capital. 

To be sure it will be at once replied that this 
is purely theory and that for us nothing is to 
be held as true and proven that we cannot grasp 
with the hands. We are not given economical 
laws, but only statistical figures. These are not 
so easily to be discovered for, as yet, no one has 
been pleased to set forth the amounts, not simply 
of the wages, but also of the profits in a statis- 
tical form, because of the fact that the fire-proof 
safes are a castle which even the cowardly and 
benevolent bourgeois will defend like a lion 
against every administrative attack. 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 



39 



Meanwhile, there are calculations upon tjie 
growth of wages and other incomes. One of 
these, the latest that I know of, is given here- 
with : 









-^ — a 

Income Not Arising From Wages. 




ToTAii Ankttai, 

WaQ« IJ4COMB. 






i 


Subject to 


Not Subject to 






Income Tax. 


Income Tax. 


>* 




Per Cent of 




Percenter 




Per Cento' 




Million 


Total 


Million 


Total 


Million 


Total 




Pounds 


Social In- 


Pounds 


Social In- 


Pounds 


Social In. 




Sterling. 


come. 


Sterling. 


come. 


Sterlingr. 


come. 


I860 


392 


47 


376 


45^ 


64 


7H 


1866 


464 


45 


485 


47 


SI 


8 


1870 


486 


iiV, 


521 


48 


85 




1874 


609 


45Ji 


635 


i7H 


100 


1877 


591 


43 


652 


47 Yt 


130 


m 


1880 


687 


42 


652 


48 H 


126 




1883 


609 


UH 


696 


<9 


123 


iSi 


1886 


6.)5 


42 


715 


idVt 


125 


1891 


699 


43 V4 


782 


48/. 


130 


8 



Many observations can be offered against this 
presentation. It appears to me too optimistic 
and gives the appearance of a much greater in- 
crease in wages than actually exists. In the 
reckoning of the total wages the compiler took 
no notice of the unemployed and besides this he 
omitted to note a whole list of important varia- 
tions inside of the laboring class which, if con- 
sidered, would greatly change the result. As a 
statistician, to be sure, he undoubtedly has the 
right to do this, but these are just the factors 
that change things to the disadvantage of the 
laboring class. Such are, for example, the rela- 
tion between male and female labor and between 
skilled and unskilled labor. 

Of still greater consequence is the fact that 



40 



THE SOCIAI. REVOLUTION. 



the calculation confines itself to a few branches 
of labor, all of which, with the exception of the 
farm laborers, are extremely well organized 
economically. The author has then, without 
further consideration, concluded that the condi- 
tion of the whole laboring class has risen at the 
same average rate as that of these organized 
laborers which, even in England, did not include 
at the highest calculation more than one-fifth 
of all laborers. So it is not without interest 
that we observe the changes in wages in each of 
these categories of labor : — 



Agricultural Laborers 

Building Trades 

Cotton Workers 

Woolen Workers 

Iron Workers 

Machinists 

Gas Workers 

Sailors 

Miners 

Arerage 



1860 



18661870 



100 



113 



1874 



113 



1877 



132 



124 



1893 



1886ll;«l 

111' 118 
1.. 

11 : 

IS 



12 



LSI 

IC 
12 



130 



130, 14r 
IIW 1 
100 150 

IZSilio 



We see that the increase in wages of 40 per 
cent from 1860 to 1891 that Bowley calculates 
for the whole laboring class of England, does 
not even hold for the whole aristocracy of labor. 
With the exception of the cotton workers who 
have not vainly been the conservatives of Eng- 
land and the model children of all dreamers of 
"social peace," the average of 1891 was only 
exceeded by the gas workers, the sailors and the 
miners. The gas workers owe their increase, in 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 41 

part, at least, to politicians, for in the larger 
cities municipalization has brought many im- 
provements. With the gas workers also consider- 
ations of competition and exploitation bj pri- 
vate capital are of least importance. In part, 
also, the upward leap of 1891 as well as the 
sudden appearance of the "new Unionism'' 
which gave rise to such far-reaching hopes has 
now run into the ground. More even than with 
the gas workers the rise of wages in 1891 for 
the sailors and miners appears wholly abnormal 
and temporary. With the miners the wages of 
1886 were the same as those of 1860, but by 
1891 they were 50 per cent higher. One can- 
not consider this as a secure advance. With the 
wood workers, the woolen workers and the la- 
borers in the iron industry, the increase of wages 
since 1860 is far less. Bowley would also 
have us believe that the wages of the unorgan- 
ized laborers of England had risen 40 per cent 
during the same time in which the well organ- 
ized iron workers had only increased 25 per 
cent. 

But let us take the table as it is. What does 
it really prove ? Even by this extraordinarily 
optimistic presentation wages are becoming an 
ever smaller portion of the social income. Erom 
1860 to 1874 the average rate of increase was 
45 per cent; from 1877 to 1891 only 42% per 
cent. If we place in opposition to this, in lack 
of more reliable figures, the total of the income 
tax that did not arise from wages but from sur- 



4S THB 80GLAJL. BBVOLUTIOS. 

plus values then in 1860 Khis would be eighty 
million dollars less than the siun of the wages. 
In 1891 the amount of surplus values exceeded 
the sum of wages by the significant sum of not 
less than four hundred millicr. dollars. 

This certainly signifies a considerable in- 
crease in exploitation. The rate of surplus 
value, that is to say, the rate of exploitation of 
the laborer, has accordingly risen during this 
time from 96 per cent to 112 per cent. Actu- 
ally, even according to Bowley's figures, ex- 
ploitation has at least grown very fast among 
the best organized laborers. The exploitation 
of the masses of unorganized must have reached 
a much higher degree. 

We do not lay any great stress upon these 
figures. But as far as they show anything, they 
speak for, not against, the claim of the increas- 
ing exploitation of labor power, that Marx has 
proven in another way, by examination of the 
laws of movements, the capitalist system of pro- 
duction, and which has not yet been disproved. 
To be sure, one can say : Granted that exploita- 
tion increases, but wages increase also, even if 
not to the same degree as surplus values. How 
then shall the laborer discover this increasing 
exploitation if it is not plainly evident, but is 
only to be discovered by painstaking investiga- 
tion ? The mass of the laborers do not study 
statistics or think about theories of value and 
profit. 

This may be granted. But there is a way in 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTIOJS'. 43 

which the increase of exploitation can be made 
perceptible to the laborers. In the same degree 
that the mass of profit rises, the standard of 
living of the bourgeoisie rises also. But the 
classes are not divided from one another by im- 
penetrable walls. The rising standard of life of 
the upper class oozes down through to those be- 
neath and wakens in them new needs and de- 
mands to the satisfaction of which the slowly 
growing wage is by no means satisfactory. The 
bourgeoisie whine about the disappearance of 
modesty in the lower classes and about their 
increasing enviousness, and forget that the 
growing demands from below are only the reflex 
of the rising standard of life above, which fur- 
nishes the example and rouses the envy of the 
lower class. 

That the capitalist standard of living grows'^ 
faster than that of the proletariat is self-evi- 
dent. The laborer's dwelling has not been 
greatly improved in the last fifty years. But 
the dwelling places of the bourgeoisie are gor- 
geous in comparison with the average capitalist 
house of fifty years ago. The third-class rail- 
road carriage of to-day and the one of fifty years 
ago differ but little in their interior equipments. 
But when we compare the first-class railroad 
carriage of the middle of the nineteenth century 
with the palace car of the modern train ! I do 
not believe that the sailors in the Transatlantic 
•hips are much better cared for to-day than fifty 
years ago, while the luxuries to be found in the 



44 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

salon of the modem passenger steamer would 
have been unheard of fifty years ago even in a 
royal pleasure yacht. 

So much for the increasing exploitation of the 
proletariat. But is not this economic factor 
counterbalanced by the increasing political ap- 
^proach of the classes? Do not the bourgeoisie 
more and more recognize the laborer as their 
political and social equals ? 

There is no doubt that the proletariat is gain- 
ing rapidly in political and social respects. 

If its rise in economic relations remains be-' 
hind that of the bourgeoisie, this gives rise to a 
continually increasing enviousness and discon- 
tent. Perhaps the most striking phenomenon 
of the last fifty years is the rapid and unbroken 
rise of the proletariat in moral and intellectual 
relations. *^- 

'Not many decades ago the proletariat was 
so low that there were even socialists that ex- 
pected the worst results for culture from the 
conquest of the proletariat. In 1850 Eodbertus 
wrote: "The most threatening danger at pres- 
ent is that we shall have a new barbarian in- 
vasion, this time coming from the interior of 
society itself to lay waste custom, civilization 
and wealth." 

At the same time Heinrich Heine declared 
that the future belonged to the communist. 
"This confession, that the future belongs to the 
communist, I make in sorrow and greatest 
anxiety. This is in no way a delusion. In fact, 



THE SOCIAL BEVOLUTION. 45 

it is only with fear and shuddering that I think 
of the epoch when these dark iconoclasts come to 
power; with their callous hands they will de- 
stroy all the marble statues of beauty, etc." 

Undeniably it has now become wholly differ- 
ent. It is not by the proletariat that modern 
civilization is threatened. It is those very com- 
munists who to-day constitute the safe refuge of 
art and science, for which they stand in the 
most decisive manner. 

So it is that the fear is rapidly disappearing, 
which after the Paris Communu dominated the 
whole capitalist class ; the fear that the conquer- 
ing proletariat would come into our culture like 
the Vandals in their race migrations and on its 
ruins found a government of barbaric ascetics. 

It is partially owing to the disappearance of 
this fear that sympathy with the proletariat and 
with socialism is on the increase umong the 
bourgeois intellect' .als. 

Like the proletariat, class intelligence is a 
peculiarity of the capitalist system of produc- 
tion. I have already shown that this system 
makes such dem* nds upon the ruling class that 
they have neither the interest nor the leisure to 
care for the business of government, or to cul- 
tivate art and science, as did the aristocracy of 
Athens or the clergy of the best days of the 
Catholic Church. The whole sphere of the 
higher intellectual activity, that was formerly a 
privilege of the ruling classes, is now left by 
tb-rtse to paid laborers, and the number of these 



46 THE SOCIAL BEVOLUTION". 

professional scholars, artists, engineers and 
functionaries is increasing rapidly. 

Taken as a whole these constitute the so-called 
"intellectuals," the "new middle class,'' but they 
are distinguished from the old middle class 
above all by the lack of any especial class con- 
sciousness. Certain divisions of them have a 
peculiar caste consciousness, very often a blind- 
ness of caste, but the interests of each one of 
these divisions is too peculiar for any common 
class consciousness to develop. Its members 
unite with various classes and parties and fur- 
nish the intellectual fighters for each. One 
portion defends the interests of the ruling class 
for whom many of the intellectuals serve profes- 
sionally. Others have championed the cause of 
the jjroletariat. The majority, however, have 
up to the present time remained entangled in 
the little bourgeois circles of thought. This is 
not alone because many of them sprung from 
this class, but also because their social position 
as "middle class" is like that of the small bour- 
geois, a midway position between the proletariat 
and the ruling class. 

It is in these divisions of the intellectuals, as 
remarked above, that a continually increasing 
sympathy for the proletariat is evident. Because 
they have no especial class interest, and are most 
accessible through their professional, scientific 
point of view, they are easiest won for our party 
through scientific considerations. The theoreti- 
cal bankruptcy of bourgeois economics, and the 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 



47 



theoretical superiority of Socialism must become 
clear to them. Through this they must continu- 
ally discover that the other social classes con- 
tinuously strive to still further debase art and 
science. JVIany others are finally impressed by 
the fact of the irresistible advance of the Social 
Democracy, especially when they compare this 
with the continuous deterioration of Liberalism. 
So it is that friendship for labor becomes popu- 
lar among the cultured classes, until there is 
scarcely a parlor in which one does not stumble 
over one or more "Socialists." 

If these circles of the cultured class were syn- 
onomous with the bourgeoisie, then to be sure 
we would have won the game, and a social revo- 
lution would be superfluous. With this class it 
is easy to discuss things, and from them a quiet 
gradual development will meet no forcible hin- 
drance. 

Unfortunately, however, they are only a por- 
tion of the bourgeoisie, though, to be sure, just 
those who speak and write in the name of the 
bourgeoisie, but not those who determine their 
acts. And men as well as classes must be judged, 
not by their words, but by their deeds. 

It must also be remembered that it is the least 
effective fighters and least combative portion of 
the bourgeoisie in which sympathy for the pro- 
letariat is developing. 

Heretofore, while socialism was branded 
among all cultured classes as criminal or insane, 
capitalist elements could only be brought into 



48 THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTION. 

the Socialist movement hj a complete break with 
the whole capitalist world. Whoever came into 
the Socialist movement at that time from the 
capitalist elements had need of great energy, 
revolutionary passion, and strong proletarian 
convictions. It was just this element which 
ordinarily constituted the most radical and revo- 
lutionary wing of the Socialist movement. 

It is wholly different to-day, when Socialism 
has become a fad. It no longer demands any 
especial energy, and no break with capitalist 
society to assume the name of Socialist. It is 
no wonder then that more and more these new 
Socialists remain entangled in their previous 
manner of thought and feeling. 

The fighting tactics of the intellectuals are 
at any rate wholly different from those of the 
proletariat. To wealth and power of arms the 
latter opposes its overwhelming numbers and its 
thorough organization. The intellectuals are an 
ever diminishing minority with no class organi- 
zation whatever. Their only weapon is per- 
suasion through speaking and writing, the battle 
with "intellectual weapons" and "moral superi- 
ority," and these "parlor Socialists" would set- 
tle the proletarian class struggle also with these 
weapons. They declare themselves ready tc 
grant the proletariat their moral support, but 
only on condition that it renounces the idea of 
the application of force, and this not simply 
where force is hopeless — ^there the proletariat 
has already renounced it — ^but also in those 



THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTION. 49 

places where it is still full of possibilities. Ac- 
cordingly thej seek to throw discredit on the 
idea of revolution, and to represent it as a use- 
less means. They seek to separate off a social 
reform wing ixom. the revolutionary proletariat, 
and they thereby divide and weaken the prole- 
tariat. 

Up to the present time this is practically the 
only result of the beginnings of the conversion 
of the ^'Intellectuals" to Socialism. 

At the side of this "new middle class" the 
old one, the small capitalist class, still vege- 
tates. This portion of the middle class was at 
one time the back bone of the revolution ; eager 
for battle and full of fight, they arose on slight 
provocation whenever the conditions were favor-' 
able, against every form of servitude and ex- 
ploitation from above, against the tyranny of 
bureaucracy and militarism, against feudal and 
clerical privileges. They constituted the picked 
troops of the bourgeois democracy. At one time 
this class, like a portion of the "new middle 
class" at present, was very sympathetic towards 
the proletariat, co-operated with it, gave to it 
and received from it intellectual support and 
material strength. But old or new the present 
middle class is a very unreliable ally, and this 
just because of its intermediate position between 
the exploited and the exploiting classes. As 
Marx has already noted, the little capitalist is 
neither wholly proletarian, nor wholly hour- 



50 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

geois, and considers himself, according to the 
occasion, first one and then the other. 

Out of this contradictory position there comes 
a division in the class of small property owners. 
One portion identifies itself with the proletariat, 
the other with its enemies. 

The small industry is doomed to ruin, its ruin 
is now proceeding uninterruptedly. This shows 
itself but slowly in the actual diminution of the 
number of small industries, but rapidly in their 
demoralization. A portion of their owners are 
in absolute dependence upon capital, being noth- 
ing more than home and wage-workers, who la- 
bor for a master in their houses instead of in a 
factory. Others, especially small merchants and 
innkeepers, remain independent, but find their 
customers only in laboring circles, so that their 
existence is absolutely dependent upon the pros- 
perity or adversity of the laboring classes. They 
have despaired of ever rising by their own exer- 
tions, they expect everything from above, and 
look only to the upper classes and the govern- 
ment for assistance. And as all progress 
threatens them they place themselves in opposi- 
tion to all advance. Servility and dependence 
upon reaction make them not simply the willing 
supporters, but the fanatical defenders of the 
monarchy, the church and the nobility. With 
all this they remain democratic, since it is only 
through democracy that they can exercise any 
political influence, and obtain the assistance of 
the public powers. 



THE SOCIAL BEVOLUTION". 61 

It is this division of the little property own- 
ers that is mainly responsible for the decadence 
of the bourgeois democracy. One of these divi- 
sions turns toward the proletarian Social De- 
mocracy; the other toward the reactionary de- 
mocracy, where it appears under the most diverse 
colors as anti-semitism, nationalism, Christian 
democracy — factions of the conservative and 
central parties, but always with the same social 
content. This reactionary democracy has taken 
many of its ideas and arguments from the 
socialist thought, and many have therefore come 
to consider these as but beginnings which indi- 
cate an especial transition form from liberalism 
to socialism. The untenableness of this posi- 
tion is clear to-day. Socialism has no bitterer 
enemy than the reactionary democracy. If the 
socialists demand any advance in civilization, 
whether that advance be a direct benefit to pro- 
letarian class interests or not, the reactionary 
democracy is driven by its whole being to op- 
pose it, even if it does not directly threaten the 
interests of the small property owner. Just as 
the Socialist party is the most progressive party, 
so the reactionary democracy is the most retro- 
grade party, in that to the hatred of progress 
which they share with other reactionary par- 
ties they add the most gross ignorance of every- 
thing that takes place outside their narrow 
circle of thought. Another reason for this fact 
is that the little capitalists can maintain their 
position as exploiters only by the most inhuman 



52 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

torture of the weakest and most unresisting of 
the possessors of labor power — ^the women and 
children. As a consequence they are natu- 
rally the first opponents of the Socialists, when 
the latter seek by means of organization and 
compulsory legislation to abolish this brutal 
destruction of human life. 

So it is that the class of small property own- 
ers, so far as it does not become Socialist, be- 
comes, instead of an ally, or a conciliatory ele- 
ment midway between the proletariat and the 
ruling classes, a bitter enemy of the proletariat. 
In place of a softening of class antagonisms we 
see here the most harsh climax of class an- 
tagonism, and moreover a rapidly increasing 
one, for it is only within the last few years that 
it has become clearly noticeable. 

What we have said of the class of small 
property owners applies with but few changes 
to the farming class. They are also divided into 
two camps, one the proletarian, composed of 
small farmers, and the other of capitalist 
proprietors. It is our task to accelerate this 
process of division, in order that we may make 
clear the overwhelming proletarian interests of 
the first class, and thereby lead them to social- 
ism. The reactionary democracy in the country 
is as hostile to our existence as is the one in the 
cities even if this opposition is not always 
clearly recognized. Those comrades who look 
upon the agrarian confusion as only a transition 
state of the farmers from the old parties to th< 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 63 

social democracy are as badly deceived as those 
who expect the same thing from the anti-semi- 
tism in the cities. The medium and large farm- 
ers hate the Socialists, just because they 
struggle to secure a shorter work-day and higher 
wages for the laborers, and thereby furnish the 
principal cause for the farm laborers moving 
to the city and leaving the farmer in the lurch. 

In the country also the social antagonism be- 
tween the possessors and the proletariat grows 
sharper. 

This is even more true of the antagonism be- 
tween the great land owners and the wage- 
worker than of that between the farmer and the 
wage-worker. 

In the great agricultural industries the wage- 
worker plays a more important role than in or- 
dinary farming. For the great farmer also, the 
high price of provisions is much more import- 
ant than for the farmer who consumes a large 
portion of his product. The antagonism be- 
tween the producer and consumer of provisions 
is, to be sure, not the same as between the la- 
borer and exploiter, but rather like that be- 
tween the city and country. But in the city 
the proletariat is to-day the most numerous and 
the most combative class and consequently the 
seller of provisions sees in the proletariat his 
most energetic enemy. 

It is therefore no wonder that the ^reat land 
owner looks at the industrial laborer to-day 
from a wholly different point of view from 



54 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION". 

what he did. Formerly he was indifferent to 
the struggle between the industrial capitalist 
and his laborer and indeed he often followed 
them with malignant rejoicings at the predica- 
ment of the capitalists with which indeed there 
was often a certain sympathy for the prole- 
tariat. It was not the latter that then stood 
in his road, but rather the capitalist who de- 
manded protection while he needed free trade, 
and who on the other hand saw in ground rents 
an invasion of his profits and who sought to 
take away from the land owners the monopoly 
of the higher places in the army and bureau- 
cracy. 

To-day things are wholly different. The day 
of the labor friends, such as the Tories and 
Junkers, of Disraeli, Rodbertus, Vogelsang, is 
long gone by. Like the class of little property 
owners and the class of medium and large farm- 
ers, the class of land owners is becoming more 
and more antagonistic to the laborers. 

But the capitalist class f They are to-day the 
deciding class. Are they not at least like the 
"intellectuals" becoming more and more friend- 
ly to labor ? 

I regret to say that I can see no sign of this 
friendship. 

Certainly the capitalist class also is chang- 
ing. It does not remain always the same. But 
what are the most important changes that it 
has undergone in the last decade? 

Upon the one side we find a diminution, in^ 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 55 

deed, in some places the complete abolition, b/ 
means of agreements, cartels and trusts, of the 
competition which the capitalists had formerly 
to meet in the individual branches of industry. 
On the other side we see the intensification of 
international competition through the rise of 
new capitalist powers, particularly Germany 
and the United States. 

The agreements abolish competition amonp: 
< capitalists not only as opposed to the buyers of 
their products, but also as opposed to their 
laborers. Instead of numerous buyers of labor 
power they now stand as a unit opposed to the 
workers. IIow greatly this increases their su- 
periority and how much it sharpens their an- 
tagonism to the laborers needs no further 
explanation. 

According to the last census of the United 
States the wages of laborers in American indus- 
tries have absolutely decreased during the ten 
years from 1890 to 1900. If this is correct it 
is not too much to say that it is one of the re- 
sults of the trust. 

The sharpening of international competition 
works in the same direction. Here also we find 
the laborers suffering together with the con- 
sumers from this development. Alongside of 
the increase in the price of goods through pro- 
tective tariff, which also aid the formation of 
trusts and combines, we find an increased ex- 
ploitation of the laborers by which the capital- 
ists seek to meet foreign competition. The con- 



56 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

sequence of this is the intensification of their 
struggle against the fighting organizations of 
the laborers, both political and economic, which 
stand in the way of such exploitation. 

Here also we find not a softening but a sharp- 
ening of class antagonism. 

A third force working in the same direction 
is the increasing amalgamation of industrial 
capital with money capital, or '^high finance." 
The industrial capitalist is a manager that 
possesses an industry in the sphere of produc- 
tion, taking this word in its widest sense (in- 
cluding transportation) in which he exploits 
salaried wage-workers and draws a profit from 
them. The money capitalist, on the contrary, 
is the modernized form of the ancient usurer. 
He draws his income from interest on the 
money which he loans, not only, as formerly, to 
indigent private individuals, but also to capi- 
talist managers, institutions. States, etc. 

Between the industrial capitalist and the 
money capitalist a great antagonism exists, sim- 
ilar to that between the first and the land own- 
ers. Interest on borrowed capital like ground 
rent constitutes a reduction from industrial 
profits. The interests of both forms of capital 
are here contradictory. Politically also they 
are in opposition. The great land owner stands 
to-day for a strong and preferably monarchical 
form of government because as a part of the 
nobility he can personally influence the mon- 
arch through them and through him the govern- 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 57 

mental power. Furthermore he is a military 
fanatic because this offers increased opportuni- 
ties for officers, careers to which the sons of the 
bourgeois were little inclined. Again, he for- 
merly demanded a forcible policy in both for- 
eign and internal affairs. In this same way, 
the financier finds militarism and a strong 
active governmental policy, both external and 
internal, very agreeable. The kings of finance 
need not fear a strong governmental power, in- 
dependent of people and Parliament, because 
they can rule such a power either directly as 
bondholders, or else through personal and social 
influences. In militarism, war and public debts 
they have a direct interest, not only as credi- 
tors, but also as government contractors, since 
the sphere of their influence, their exploitation, 
their power and their wealth is thereby in- 
creased. 

It is wholly different with industrial capital. 
Militarism, war and public debts signify high 
taxes which the wealthy must assist in bearing, 
or else the cost of production is increased. War 
signifies besides this a stagnation in the produc- 
tion of commodities, a break in trade, economic 
difficulties and frequently ruin. Where the 
financier is rash, extravagant and violent the 
industrial manager is frugal, timid and peace- 
loving. A strong governmental power arouses 
anxiety in him and all the more because he can- 
not directly control it. His interests demand 
rather a strong parliament than a strong gov- 



68 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

emment. In opposition to the great land owner 
and to the financier, he inclines rather to liber- 
alism, because its half-heartedness accords with 
his own position. His profits are limited upon 
the one side by ground rent, interest and taxes, 
and upon the other side an aspiring proletariat 
threatens the whole profit system. When the 
proletariat becomes too threatening, he prefers 
to adopt the peaceable method of "divide and 
govern," of corruption, and of compromise by 
benevolent establishments, etc., rather than the 
method of forcible suppression. Where the pro- 
letariat has not yet entered the field of inde- 
pendent politics the industrial capitalist will- 
ingly serves it as bellwether in order to increase 
his own political power. To the little bour- 
geois Socialist the opposition between industrial 
capital and the proletariat appears less than 
that between profit upon the one side and 
ground rent and interest upon the other. For 
him the solution of the social question consists 
in the abolition of interest and ground rent. 

The opposition between finance and industry 
continually decreases since with the progressive 
concentration of capital, finance ever more 
and more dominates industry. A powerful 
means to this end is the continuous replacement 
of private employers by stock companies. Well 
meaning optimists have seen in this a means of 
"democratizing" capital so that after a while, in 
the most peaceable manner without any one no- 
ticing it, capital would be traw»frtrmed into 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 59 

social property. In fact, this movement really 
means tlie transformation of all the money of 
the middle and lower classes, which is not used 
by them for immediate consumption, into 
money capital and as such placing it at the dis- 
posal of the great financiers for the buying out 
of industrial managers and thereby assisting in 
the concentration of industry in the hands of 
a few financiers. Without the system of stocks 
the great financiers would only control those 
businesses which they have bought with their 
own money. Thanks to stocks, they can make 
countless industries dependent upon them and 
thereby accelerate the conquest of those which 
they have not the necessary money to purchase. 
The whole fabulous power of Pierpont Morgan 
& Co., that within the last few years has united 
in one hand countless railroads, mines, and a 
majority of the iron works, and now has also 
monopolized the greatest Transatlantic steam- 
ship line — this sudden acquisition of dominion 
over the industry and commerce of the greatest 
of civilized worlds would have been impossible 
without stock companies. 

According to the London Economist, five 
men, John D. Rockefeller, C. H. Harriman, 
Pierpont Morgan, W. M. Vanderbilt and G. 
D. Gould together possess seven hundred and 
fifty million dollars; while the total capital 
of the banks, railroads and the industrial 
companies of the United States is seventeen 
thousand five himdred million dollars. Thanks 



60 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

to the stock system they control half of this capi- 
tal, upon which in turn the entire economic 
wealth of the Union depends. 

As has always been the case, so again when 
the inevitable crisis comes in America, the little 
stockholders will be expropriated and the posi- 
tions of the great ones enlarged and strength- 
ened. 

The greater the power of the financier in in- 
dustry, the greater the tendency of industrial 
. capital to adopt the methods of finance. For 
( the private business man who lives by the side 
\ of his laborers, these are still men to whose 
«ivelfare he cannot be wholly indifferent unless 
he has become utterly callous. For the stock- 
/holder, nothing exists but dividends, and the 
/ laborers are simply figures in a mathematical 
( calculation in the result of which he is in the 
highest degree interested, for it can usually 
bring him increased well being and increased 
power, or retrenchment and social degradation. 
The remnant of consideration for the laborer 
which was still preserved in the private em- 
ployer is here wholly lost. 

Money capital is that form of capital which 
mostly inclines toward violence, which easiest 
leads to monopoly and thereby attains bound- 
less power over the laboring class, which is most 
estranged from the laborer, which most threat- 
ens the capital of the private industrial capi- 
talist, and more and more comes to rule the 
whole capitalist system of production. 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 61 

The necessary result of this is a sharpening 
of social antagonisms. But England! it will 
be at once responded. Do we not find in Eng- 
land a perceptible softening of class antago- 
nisms, and has not Marx said that England is 
the classic land of capitalist production, which 
to-day shows what our future will be ? Is not 
the present condition of England the one 
toward which we are moving ? 

It is always to England that the fanatics 
of social peace refer us and it is significant 
that it is these same people who taunt us ortho- 
dox Marxians the loudest on the obstinate tenac- 
ity with which we cling to every Marxian sen- 
tence and who most frequently throw the above 
Marxian sentence at us. 

As a matter of fact, however, conditions have 
greatly changed since the writing of Capital. 
England has ceased to be the classic land of 
capitalism. Its development comes more and 
more to a standstill, it is more and more becom- 
ing subordinate to other nations, especially 
Germany and America, and now the conditions 
begin to be reversed. England ceases to show 
us our future. On the contrary, our present 
state rather shows England^s future in capi- 
talist production. The thing which shows that 
the investigator of actual relations is really an 
orthodox Marxian is not that he thoughtlessly 
follows Marx, but that he applies his methods 
in order to understand facts. 

England was the classic ground of capital- 



62 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

ism, the one upon which industrial capital first 
gained the mastery. English capitalism came 
into power the economic master not only of the 
upper class of its own land but also of foreign 
lands. So it was that all of the characteristics 
that I have above designated as peculiar to it 
could most freely develop. It gave up violent 
suppression of the laboring class and depended 
much more upon peaceful diplomacy, for a 
while granted political privileges to the power- 
fully organized, and sought to purchase and 
corrupt its leaders by friendly advances in which 
it was too often successful. At the same time 
it renounced all violence towards the external 
world. Peace and free trade were its watch- 
words. It adopted a peaceful attitude toward 
the Boers, and finally feigned to be about to 
right the century-long injustice of England 
towards Ireland by granting it home rule. 

Meanwhile foreign competition grows power- 
ful, indeed sometimes overpowering, and this 
compelled the capitalists to resist all opposition 
to exploitation within, while the most violent 
means are used to secure external markets. 
Hand and hand with this goes the usurious 
growth of the domination of high finance in 
the process of production. Since then Eng- 
land has taken on another appearance. "The 
spirit of the times," declare the Webbs in 
"Socialen Praxis" for March 20th, 1902, "has 
during the last ten years been turned against 
the 'corporative self-help' in the relations of 



THE SOCIAL BEVOLUTION. 6S 

employer and employee, that was characteristic 
of a generation ago. Indeed, the public opin^ 
ion of the wealthy and professional classes is 
actually hostile to all that concerns trades'- 
unions and strikes, as was not the case a gen- 
eration ago.'' 

As a result of this sudden change the unions 
are most seriously hindered in their activity by 
the courts. In place of free trade we see the 
cost of living enhanced by taxation ; the policy 
of colonial conquest begins anew, together with 
coercive legislation against Ireland. All that 
is needed is the establishment of a standing 
army on the Prussian model and England will 
be fully launched upon the road of German 
policy, with the same Polish, commercial, social, 
foreign and military policy. 

Does this not clearly show that England's 
future can today be studied in Germany (and 
also in the United States), and that England's 
condition has ceased to represent our future? 
The stage of "softening of class antagonisms" 
and the building the road to "social peace" is 
confined to England, and today is even there a 
thing of the past. Gladstone was the foremost 
representative of the policy of concessions for 
the softening of antagonisms, which correspond- 
ed to the industrial capitalism of England at 
the time when it dominated in an overwhelming 
manner all other classes and countries. The 
foremost representative of the domination of the 
violent, conquering, money capital is Chamber- 



04: THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

lain. It is one of the strangest ironies of 
history that the Gladstonian stage should have 
been looked upon in Germany as foretelling 
our future and most loudly praised as a firmly 
acquired conquest, at just the moment when the 
Gladstonian heritage was being scattered to the 
winds and Chamberlain was becoming the hero 
of the English populace. 

I will freely grant that I, too, formerly had 
great hopes of England. While I did not ex- 
pect that the Gladstonian stage would ever be 
transported to Germany, still I did hope that 
because of the peculiarity of English conditions 
the development from capitalism to Socialism 
might be peaceably accomplished, not through 
a social revolution, but by means of a series of 
progressive concessions by the ruling class to 
the proletariat. The experience of the last 
few years has destroyed these hopes for England 
also. The English internal policy now begins to 
shape itself on the model of its German com- 
petitor. May it have a corresponding reaction 
upon the English proletariat. 

We now see in just how far the acceptance of 
the idea of a softening of class antagonisms 
and a drawing together of the bourgeoisie and 
proletariat is justified. To be sure, it is not 
wholly built on air, it is supported by certain 
facts, but its defect consists in having accepted 
as universal, facts that are really confined to a 
narrow sphere. It considers a few divisions of 
the Intellectuals as the whole bourgeoisie, and 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 65 

news a peculiar social tendency of England, 
which now belongs to a past age, as a univei*sal, 
ever increasing tendency of the whole capitalist 
system of production. 

DEMOCEACY. 

But does not democracy provide the founda- 
tion for a gradual, imperceptible transforma- 
tion of capitalism into Socialism without any 
violent break with existing things if we but 
jDresuppose the conquest of political power by 
the proletariat? 

There are some politicians who assert that 
only despotic class rule necessitates revolution; 
that revolution is rendered superfluous by de- 
mocracy. It is claimed that we have today 
sufficient democracy in all civilized countries 
to make possible a peaceable revolutionless de-' 
velopment. Above all it is possible to found 
cooperatives for consumption whose extension' 
will introduce production for use, and so slowly 
but surely drive capitalist production out of 
one sphere after another. Most important of 
al), it is possible to organize unions that shall 
eoatinually limit the power of the capitalist in 
his business, until constitutionalism shall sup- 
plant absolutism in the factory, and thus 
the way will be prepared for the slow transi- 
tion to the republicanized factory. Still 
further, the socialists can penetrate into 
the municipal councils, influence public labor 
in the interest of the laboring class, extend 



lY 



66 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

the circle of municipal activities, and by tli<> 
continuous extension of the circle of municipal 
production narrow the field of private produc- 
tion. Finally the socialists are pressing into 
, parliament, where they are ever gaining more 
y influence, and push through one reform after 
the other, restrict the power of the capitalists 
by labor legislation, and simultaneously extend 
t/ ever wider the circle of governmental produc- 
tion, while they work for the nationalization of 
the great monopolies. So by the exercise of 
democratic rights upon existing grounds the 
capitalist society is gradually and without any 
shock growing into Socialism. Consequently 
-^ the revolutionary conquest of political powers 
by the proletariat is unnecessary, and the ef- 
forts towards it directly hurtful, since they can 
operate in no other way than to disturb thia 
\ slowly but surely advancing process. 

So much for the opponents of revolutionary 
development. 

It is an attractive picture they have painted 
for us, and again it cannot be truthfully said 
that it is wholly built in the air. The facts 
upon which it is founded actually exist. But 
the truth that they tell is only a half-truth. A 
little dialectical reflection would have shown 
them the whole. 

This idyl becomes true only if we grant that 
but one side of the opposition, the proletariat, 
is growing and increasing in strength, while 
the other side, the bourgeoisie, remains immov- 



y 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 67 

ably fixed to the same spot. Granting this, it 
naturally follows that the proletariat will grad- 
ually, and with no revolution, outstrip the 
bourgeoisie and imperceptibly expropriate it. 

But things take on another aspect when the "^ 
other side is considered, and it is seen that the / 
bourgeoisie is likewise gaining in strength and *v 
is goaded on by every advance of the proletariat f 
to develop new powers, and to discover and I 
apply new methods of resistance and repres- ' 
sion. That which from a one-sided observation 
appears as a gradual peaceable growth into 
Socialism is then seen as the organization of 
ever larger fighting bodies, as the development 
and application of ever more powerful re- 
sources for conflict, as a continuous widening 
of the battle field. Instead of being a gradual 
winning of the class struggle through the ex- 
haustion of capitalism, it is rather a reproduc- 
tion of the struggle upon ever wider stages, and 
a deepening of the consequences of every victory 
and every defeat. 

Most harmless of all are the cooperatives, of 
which today the cooperatives of consumption 
are practically the only ones to be considered. 
Because of their purely peaceable character 
these are always highly esteemed by all oppo- 
nents of revolutionary development. There is 
no doubt but that they can aiford numerous 
important advantages to the laboring class, but 
it is laughable to expect even a partial expro- 
priation of the capitalist class from them. So 



68 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTIOX. 

far as thej are expropriating any class today it 
is that of little merchants and numerous grades 
/of handworkers, that have been able to main- 
tain their existence until now. Correspond- 
ingly it is noticed that nowhere do the great 
capitalists attack the cooperatives which it is 
pretended threaten them. On the contrary it 
is the little property ovniers whose rage is 
aroused against the cooperatives, and those who 
are injured are just the ones who are most 
dependent upon the laboring class, and who can 
be most easily won to the proletarian political 
cause. While the workingmen's cooperatives 
bring some material advantages to certain divi- 
sions of the laboring class, they also drive away 
from our movement many classes who stand 
very close to the proletariat. These means to 
the peaceable absorption of capitalism and the 

y abrogation of the class struggle tend rather to 
introduce a new bone of contention and to 
arouse a new class hatred. Meanwhile the 
, power of capital remains wholly untouched. 
i The cooperative for consumption has so far 
\ been victorious only in its battle with the little 
] merchant ; the struggle with the great stores is 
/ still in the future. This will not be so easy a 
V victory. 

The idea that the dividends of the coopera- 
tives, even if not divided, but kept intact, can 
increase faster than the accumulation of capital 
so as to overtake it and contract the sphere of 
capitalism, is absolutely foolish. 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION". 61) 

The cooperative can play an important part 
in the emancipation of the proletariat only 
where the latter is engaged in an active class 
struggle. The cooperative can then become a 
means to supply the battling proletarians with 
resources. Even then they are wholly depend- 
ent upon the condition of legislation and the 
attitude of the state. So long as the proletariat 
has not yet attained political power, the impor- 
tance of cooperatives for the class struggle of . 
the proletariat will always be very limited. X 

Much more important for the proletariat than ^ 
the cooperatives are the trade unions. This is 
true, however, only when these are fighting 
organizations, and not when they are organi- 
zations for social peace. Even where they 
conclude contracts with employers, either as 
individuals or as organizations, they can only 
secure and maintain these through their fighting 
ability. 

However important, or indeed indispensable, 
unions may be for the battling proletariat, they 
must sooner or later reckon with the union of 
employers, which, when it takes the form of a 
close agreement, of a cartel, or of a trust, will y 
find it only too easy to become irresistible to t/ 
the union. But unions of employers are not 
the only things that threaten the unions — more 
important is the governmental power. We in 
Germany could tell a tale on this point. That, 
however, even in such a democratic country as 
England, the unions have not yet overcome all 



70 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

their difficulties in this direction, has been 
shown by the recent well-known decision of the 
courts which threatens to completely incapaci- 
tate the unions. 

On this point the already mentioned article 
of the Webbs in "Socialen Praxis'' offers an 
interesting example which throws a significant 
light upon the future of the unions. They 
refer there to the great irregularity of the de- 
velopment of unions in England. Generally 
speaking, the strong have grown stronger, while 
those that were formerly weak are now weaker 
than before. The unions of coal miners, cotton 
workers, and in the building trades and the 
iron industry have grown. Those of the farm 
workers, sailors, clothing trades and unskilled 
laborers have gone backwards. The whole union 
world, however, is now threatened by the in- 
creasing opposition of the possessing classes. 
The English laws lend themselves remarkably 
well to the suppression of undesirable organiza- 
tions, and the danger that they now offer to the 
unions "has grown, and the fear of them is 
increasing with the hostility against the unions 
and strikes which the judges and officials share 
with the remainder of the upper and middle 
classes." The existing laws are of a character 
"to deliver the laborers into the hands of the 
employers with hands tied." So that the Webbs 
are forced to reckon with a position "in which 
the collective bargain with its undeniably favor- 
able conditions, the collective cessation of labor 



THE SOCIAL BEVOLUTION. 71 

and the opportune interruption of industry, is, 
through the legal operation of law, made im- 
possible or at least costly and difficult." 

This places the unions in a decidedly embar- 
rassing position in opposition to the capitalists, 
so that one can scarcely expect any effective 
restriction of exploitation from them. One 
may well reflect upon what action the govern- 
mental power will take in this former El 
Dorado of the unions, England, if the unions 
attempt any forcible restraint upon capital. 

In the same way the so-called Municipal 
Socialism is limited to those States and so- 
cial organizations where universal suffrage in 
the municipality rules. It must always remain 
bound to the general economic and political con- 
ditions, and can never proceed independently. 
To be sure, the proletariat may find the munici- 
pal government in the individual industrial 
communities in their hands before they have 
the strength to conquer the general government, 
and they can by means of this control, or at 
least restrain, action hostile to the proletariat 
and carry through individual betterments which 
could not be expected from a bourgeois regime. 
But such municipal governments find them- 
selves limited not alone by the power of the 
State, but also by their own economic helpless- 
ness. They are mostly poor municipalities, 
almost exclusively made up of proletarians, that 
are first conquered by the social democracy. 
Where shall these obtain the means to carry 



72 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTIOIT. 



out great reforms ? Ordinarily the taxin;^ 
power of the municipality is restricted by State 
laws, and even where this is not the case the 
taxation of the well-to-do and the rich cannot 
exceed certain bounds without these residents, 
the only ones from whom anything can be 
taken, being driven out of the municipality. 
Every decisive work of reform demands at once 
new taxes which are unfavorably received not 
only by the upper classes but also by wider 
circles of the population. Many a municipal 
government which has been captured by social- 
ists, or so-called socialistic reformers, has been 
taken away from them because of the taxation 
question, in spite of the fact that their actions 
have been exceedingly efficient. This was true 
in London and also in Roubaix. 

But the political sphere! that knows no 
bounds ! Shall we not find there an unbroken 
advance for the protection of laborers, and does 
not every session of Parliament bring us new 
restrictions on capitalism, and does not every 
recurring election increase the number of our 
representatives in Parliament? And is not 
thereby our power in the State and our influ- 
ence upon the government slowly and surely 
but interruptedly growing, and does not this 
carry with it a corresponding dependence of 
capital upon the proletariat? Certainly the 
number of laws for the protection of labor grow 
from year to year. But when one looks closely 
at this he will see that in the last ten years they 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. io 

have been only an extension to new spheres of 
already existing protection. Taking children 
out of the factory, protecting clerks, bookkeep- 
ers, house industries, sailors, etc., an extension 
of a superficial and doubtful character, and not 
in any way an increasing strengthening of pro- 
tection where it already existed. When one 
considers, on the other hand, how remarkably 
fast the capitalist system of protection extends 
its sphere, how quickly it leaps from one call- 
ing to another, and from one man to another, 
it will be found that the extension of the pro- 
tection of labor follows at a much slower pace ; 
that it can never overtake the extension of capi- 
talism, but always comes limping slowly on 
behind. And while the extension of the latter 
continually takes on a more rapid pace, the 
former tends ever more and more to come to a 
standstill. 

If the advance of the protection of labor 
extensively is so unsatisfactory, intensively we 
shall find absolutely nothing. In England in 
1847, under the pressure of the Chartist move- 
ment and the rapid degradation of the textile 
industry, the ten-hour day was secured for 
women and children — that is, actually for the 
whole laboring class of the textile industry. 
Where have we today an improvement on the 
ten-hour day ? 

The Second Republic of France in 1848 fixed 
the laboring day at ten hours for all the labor- 
ers in Paris, and in the remainder of France 



74 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUXION. 

at eleven hours. When lately Millerand an- 
nounced in the Chamber the ten-hour day, and 
that only upon paper and with many restric- 
tions, for those industries in which women and 
children worked with laborers, and this not for 
all industries, this was praised as an admirable 
act of which only a socialist minister was ca- 
pable. And yet he offered less than the bour- 
geois lawmakers of a half century ago, for he 
extended the ten-hour day only to the children 
for which in England a labor day of six and a 
half hours had been fixed in 1844. 

At the Geneva Congress of 1866 the "Inter- 
national" had already declared the eight-hour 
day to be the preliminary condition to any fruit- 
ful social reform. Thirty-six years later, at 
the last French Socialist Congress at Tours, a 
delegate could still arise and declare that the 
eight-hour day must be placed as our next 
demand. He only wished to demand "measures 
preparatory for the eight-hour day," and yet 
this man was not laughed from the room. On 
the contrary, he was able to be a candidate at 
the last election in Paris. 

It appears that the only thing in social re- 
form that makes rapid progress is the modesty 
of the social reformers. 

But how is this possible in spite of the in- 
crease of socialist representatives in parliamen- 
tary bodies ? It becomes perfectly clear if one 
does not look at the matter wholly from one 
side, but studies the reverse of the medal. 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 75 

There is no doubt that the number of socialist 
representatives increases, but simultaneously 
therewith the bourgeois democracy falls to 
pieces. Very often this is shown openly in the 
diminution of- their vote at election. More 
frequently it is seen in the falling off of any 
results. They are ever more cowardly, char- 
acterless, and resist reaction only to prepare the 
way to carry on a reactionary policy themselves 
as soon as they come to the helm. Indeed, that 
is the method by which Liberalism seeks nowa- / 
days to conquer political power. 

As Bismarck saw his power waning he de- 
manded that the terms of the German Reichs- 
tag should be extended from three to five years. 
This was an undoubtedly reactionary measure 
that raised a storm of indignation. In France, 
however, the last radical ministry of the repub- 
lican defense, in which there was a Socialist 
minister, demanded an extension of the legisla- 
tive term from four to six years, and the 
republican majority consented to grant this. 
Had it not been for the Senate, this reactionary 
measure would have become a law. 

It is not alone that bourgeois liberalism dis- 
appears in the same degree that social democ- 
racy increases. At tho same time that th« 
influence of social democracy grows in Parlia- 
ment the influence of Parliament decreases, n^ 
These two phenomena proceed simultaneously / 
without, however, having any direct connection y 
with each other. On the contrary, the parlia- ( 



76 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

ments in which there are no Social Democrats, 
as, for example, the Saxon and Prussian Cham- 
bers, lose their influence and their creative 
power much more rapidly than the others. 

The demoralization of Parliaments has va- 
rious different causes. The most essential 
causes are not those that belong to Parliamen- 
tary tactics, which through an alteration in the 
order of business, or of the sphere of Parlia* 
ment, abolish its efficiency. The most essential 
lies in the character of the classes which are 
able through Parliament to significantly influ- 
ence government. If Parliamentarism is to 
prosper, two preliminary conditions are neces- 
y sary: the first, a single strong majority, and 
the second, a great social goal toward which 
V' this majority energetically strives and toward 
which they can force the government also. 
Both of these existed in the Golden Age of 
Parliamentarism. So long as capitalism repre- 
sented the future of the nation, all classes of the 
people that possessed any Parliamentary sig- 
nificance, and especially the mass of the intel- 
lectuals, stood for freedom of capitalism. This 
was true of a majority of the small capitalists, 
and even the laborers followed the bourgeois 
leadership. 

Liberalism thus stood as a united party with 
great aims. The struggle of the Liberalists 
for Parliament and in Parliament gave the 
latter its significance. Since then, as I have 
described above, a new development has risen. 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 



71 



A special class consciousness has developed in 
the proletariat, so that a portion of the intel- 
lectuals, of the little property owners and of 
the small farmers are driven into the socialist / 
camp. The rest of the small bourgeoisie and 
the farmers become wholly reactionary, while 
the powerful elements of industrial capital 
unite with the high finance which cares nothing / 
for Parliament except when it can use it for ^ 
its purposes — ^vide Panama. 

The Liberal Party then dissolves into its 
elements without another great Parliamentary 
party with its united character rising from the 
governing class to take its position. The more 
reactionary the possessing classes become, the 
less are they a united body, and the more they 
split into little individual pieces, the harder it 
is to bring a united Parliamentary majority 
together. The more is it true that a majority 
is possible only through bringing together the 
different tendencies for a momentary coalition 
resting upon most uncertain foundations, be- 
cause no interior bond, but only considerations 
of external opportuneness, controls them. Such 
coalitions are from the beginning doomed to 
unfruitfulness because their elements are so 
diverse that they are only held together through 
disclaiming just that decisive action which 
would give them life. It is a peculiar misun- 
derstanding of the nature of these coalitions 
which arise from the downfall of Parliamen- 
tarism and signify its social and political im- 



78 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

potency, that participation in them should be 
considered the means to a slow, step-by-step in- 
troduction of the proletariat to political power. 

Social evolution does not, however, lead 
merely to the dissolution of the great united 
Parliamentary parties into countless, diverse 
and indeed often hostile factions. It leads also 
to the result that very often the Parliamentary 
majorities are more reactionary and more hos- 
tile than the government. Even if the gov- 
ernments are but agents of the ruling classes, 
still they have more insight into the sum of 
political and social relations, and, however 
willing a servant the official bureaucracy is to 
the government, it nevertheless develops its 
own life and its own tendencies that react upon 
the government. Moreover, the bureaucracy is 
recruited from the intellectuals, in which, as 
we have already seen, an understanding of the 
significance of the proletariat is advancing, 
even though timidly. 

All this operates so that not seldom the gov- 
ernment, with all its reactionary attitudes and 
hostility to labor, still does not proceed with 
such blind rage as does the ruling class, with its 
little bourgeois and agrarian tail, which stands 
behind the government. The Parliament which 
was formerly the means of pressing the govern- 
ment forward upon the road to progress be- 
comes ever more and more the means to nullify 
the little progress that conditions compel the 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. Id 

government to make. In the degree that the 
class which rules through Parliamentarism is 
rendered superfluous and indeed injurious, the 
Parliamentary machinery loses its significance. 

When, on the other hand, consideration of 
the proletarian body of voters compels the rep- 
resentative body to move towards friendship 
for labor and democracy and thereby to over- 
reach the government, the latter easily finds 
means to circumvent Parliament. 

In the United States the battle against the 
unions is carried on much less through the 
representative bodies than through the courts. 
In the same way it is the decisions of the House 
of Lords, and not the legislation of the popu- 
larly elected House of Commons, whereby the 
road to an attack upon the unions has recently 
been opened in England; and how the spirit 
of the abolished laws of exception still lives in 
the German courts, the German laborers can 
tell many a tale. 

So the candle is burning from both ends, and 
the ruling parties as well as the government 
more and more doom Parliament to sterility. 
Parliamentarism is continually more incapable 
of following a decisive policy in any direction. 
It becomes ever more senile and helpless, and 
can only be reawakened to new youth and 
strength when it, together with the total gov- 
ernmental power, is conquered by the rising 
proletariat and turned to serve its purposes. 
Parliamentarism, far from making a revolu- 



80 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 

tion useless and superfluous, is itself in need of 
a revolution in order to vivify it. 
, I do not wish to be understood as holding 

/ democracy superfluous, or to take the position 

\ that cooperatives, unions, the entrance of social 
democracy into municipalities and parliaments, 

< or the attainment of single reforms, is worth- 
less. l^Tothing would be more incorrect. On 
the contrary, all these are of incalculable value 
to the proletariat. They are only insignificant 

\ as means to avoid a revolution. 

This conquest of political power by the prole- 
tariat is of the highest value exactly because it 
makes possible a higher form of the revolu- 
tionary struggle. This struggle is no longer, 
as in 1789, a battle of unorganized mobs with 
no political form, with no insight into the rela- 
tive strength of the contending factors, with no 
profound comprehension of the purposes of the 
struggle and the means to its solution ; no longer 
a battle of mobs that can be deceived and be- 
wildered by every rumor or accident. It is a 
battle of organized, intelligent masses, full of 
stability and prudence, that do not follow every 
impulse or explode over every insult, or collapse 
under every misfortune. 

J On the other hand, the elections are a means 

\ to count ourselves and the enemy, and they 
^ grant thereby a clear view of the relative 

/ strength of the classes and parties, their ad- 
/ vance and their retreat. They prevent pre- 
y^ mature outbreaks and they guard against de- 



THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTIOM. 31 

feat s. They also grant the possibility that the 
opponents will themselves recognize the unten- 
ability of many positions and freely surrender 
them when their maintenance is no life-and- 
death question for them. So that the battle 
demands fewer victims, is less sanguinary and 
depends less upon blind chance. 

JSTeither are the political acquisitions that are 
gained through democracy and the application 
of its freedom and rights to be undervalued. 
They are much too insignificant to really re- 
sLrict^the dominion^^o capitalism and to bring 
about its imperceptible transition into social- 
ism. The slightest reform or organization may 
be^of great significance for the physical or in- ^ 
tellectual re-hbih of the proletariat that, with- 
out them, would be surrendered helpless to 
capitalism and left alone in the misery that 
cpntinuously threatens it. But it is not alone 
the relief of the proletariat from its misery that 
makes the activity of the proletariat in Parlia- 
ment and the operation of the proletarian organ- 
izations indispensable. They are also of value as 
a means of practically familiarizing the prole- 
tariat with the problems and methods of na- 
tional and municipal government and of great 
industries, as well as to the attainment of 
that intellectual maturity which the proletariat 
needs if it is to supplant the bourgeoisie as 
ruling class. 

j jemocr acy is^ also indispensable as a means 
of_ri£ening~tlie proletariat for the "socTal revblu- 



82 THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTIOIT. 

tioDu But it is not capable of preventing tHs 
revolution. Democracy is to the proletariat 
/ what light and air are to the organism ; without 
\/ them it cannot develop its powers. But we 
must not be so occupied with observing the 
growth of one class that we cannot see the simul- 
taneous growth of its opponent. Democracy 
does not hinder the development of capital, 
/ whose organization and political and economic 

V powers increase at the same time as does the 
power of the proletariat. To be sure, the co- 
operatives are increasing, but simultaneously 
and yet faster grows the accumulation of capi- 
tal; to be bure, the unions are growing, but 
simultaneously and faster grows the concentra- 
tion of capital and its organization in gigantic 
monopolies. To be sure, the socialist press is 
growing (to only mention here a point which 
cannot be further discussed), but simultane- 
ously grows the partyless and characterless press 
that poisons and unnerves ever wider popular 
circles. To be sure, wages are rising, but still 
faster rises the mass of profits. Certainly the 
number of socialist representatives in Parlia- 
ment is growing, but still more sinks the signifi- 
cance and efficaciousness of this institution, 
while simultaneously Parliamentary majorities, 
like the government, fall into ever greater 
dependence on the powers of the high finance. 

r So beside the resources of the proletariat 

Y develop also those of capital, and the end of this 
* development can be nothing less than a great, 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 06 

decisive battle that cannot end until the prole- r 
tariat has attained the victory. * 

The capitalist class is superfluous, and the 
proletariat, on the other hand, has become an 
indispensable social class. The capitalist class 
is not in a condition either to elevate the prole- 
tariat nor to root it out. After every defeat ] 
the latter rises again, more threatening than / 
before. Accordingly the proletariat, when it ( 
shall have gained the first great victory over / 
capital that shall place the political powers in \ 
its hands, can apply them in no other way than^ 
to the abolition of the capitalist system. So 
long as this has not yet happened, the battle 
between the two classes will not and cannot 
come to an end. Social peace inside of the 
capitalist system is a Utopia that has grown out 
of the real needs of the intellectual classes, but 
has no foundation in reality for its develop- 
ment. And no less of a Utopia is the imper- 
ceptible growth of capitalism into socialisna. 
We have not the slightest ground to admit that 
things will end differently from what they 
begun. ISTeither the economic nor the political 
development indicates that the era of revolution 
which characterizes the capitalist system is 
closed. Social reform and the strengthening 
of the proletarian organizations cannot hinder 
it. They can at the most operate to the end 
that the class struggle in the higher developed 
grades of the battling proletariat will be trans- 
formed from a battle for the first conditions of 



84 THE SOCIAI, EEVOLUT?ION. 

existence to a battle for the possession of 
dominion. 

FORMS AND WEAPOITS OF SOCIAI, REVOLUTION'. 

What will be the precise form tinder which 
the decisive battles between the ruling class and 
the proletariat will be fought out ? When may 
we expect them to occur ? What weapons will 
be at the service of the proletariat ? 

To these questions it is hard to give definite 
answers. We can to a certain degree suggest 
the direction of the development but not its 
form nor its velocity. The investigation of the 
direction of evolution concerns itself only with 
relatively simple laws. Here one can only iso- 
late from the whole confused manifold, the phe- 
nomena which we recognize as not regular or 
necessary, or which appear to us as accidental. 
These latter on the contrary play an important 
part in the determination of the form and the 
velocity of the movement. For example, in all 
modern civilization the direction of capitalist 
development during the last century has been 
the same, but in every one of them the form and 
the velocity was very different. Geographical 
peculiarities, racial individualities, favor and 
disfavor of the neighbor, the restraint or assist- 
ance of great individualities, all these and many 
other things have had their influence. Many 
of these could not be foreseen, but even the most 
easily recognizable of these factors operate upon 
each other in such diverse ways that the result 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 85 

is SO extremely complicated as to be impossible 
of determination from a previous stage. So it 
came about that even the people who through 
fundamental and comprehensive knowledge of 
the social relations of other civilized countries 
and bj methodical and fruitful methods of re- 
search far exceeded all their contemporaries, as 
for example, Marx and Engels, were able to de- 
termine the direction of economic development 
for many decades in a degree that the course of 
events has magnificently justified. But even 
these investigators could strikingly err when it 
came to the question of predicting the velocity 
and form of the development of the next month. 
There is only one thing I think that one can 
certainly say to-day about the approaching revo- 
lution. It will be wholly different from any of 
its predecessors. It is one of the greatest mis- 
takes that revolutionists as well as their oppo- 
nents frequently commit to present the coming 
revolution according to the model of past ones 
for there is nothing easier than to prove that 
such revolutions are no longer possible. The 
conclusion is then at hand that the idea of a 
social revolution is an entirely outgrown one. 
It is the first time in the history of the world 
that we are confronted with a revolutionary 
struggle to be fought out under the application 
of democratic forms by organizations created 
upon the foundation of democratic freedom 
against resources such as the world has not yet 
seen, prominent among which are organizations 



1 



86 THE SOCIAL EEVOLUT?ION. 

of employers before which even monarchs bow, 
and whose power will be strengthened by the 
governmental powers of bureaucracy and mili- 
tarism, which the modern great nations have in- 
herited from absolutism. 

One of the peculiarities of the present situa- 
tion consists in the fact that, as we have already 
pointed out, it is no longer the governments 
which offer us the harshest resistance. Under 
absolutism, against which former revolutions 
were turned, the government was supreme and 
class antagonisms could not clearly develop. 
The government hindered not alone the ex- 
ploited but also the exploiting classes from 
freely defending their interests. On the side 
of government there stood only a portion of 
the exploiting class; another and a very con- 
siderable part of the exploiters, namely, the 
industrial capitalists, were in the camp of the 
opposition, togethe? with the whole mass of the 
laboring class — ^not simply proletarians, but alsf 
the small bourgeois and the peasants — except in 
some backward localities. Government was also 
isolated from the people. It had no hold on 
the broad masses of the populace ; it represented 
the most highly favored strength of the oppres- 
sion and the exploitation of the people. A coup 
d'etat could under certain circumstances suffice 
to overthrow it. 

In a democracy not alone the exploited but 
the exploiting class can more freely develop 
their organization, and it is necessary that they 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLyTIOIT. 87 

do this if thej are to be able to resist their oppo- "1 
nents. The strength not only of the former but / 
of the latter as well is greater than under abso- K 
lutism. They use their forces recklessly and ( 
more harshly than the government itself, which \ 
no longer stands above them, but rather beneath ^ 
them. 

The revolutionary circles have also to deal 
not only with the government but also with the 
powerful organizations of the exploiters. And 
the revolutionary circles no longer represent as 
in the early revolutions an overwhelming ma- 
jority of the people opposed to a handful of 
exploiters. To-day they represent in reality 
only one class, the proletariat, to which not only 
the whole body of the exploiting class, but also 
the great mass of the farmers, and a great 
majority of the intellectuals stand opposed. 

Only a fraction of the intellectuals and the 
very small farmers and the little bourgeois who 
are actually wage-workers and dependent on 
their custom unite with the proletariat. But 
these are decidedly uncertain allies; they are 
all greatly lacking in just that weapon from 
which the proletariat draws all its strength — or- 
ganization. 

While the former revolutions were uprisings 
of the populace against the government, the 
"coming revolution with the exception perhaps 
of Russia will have more of the character of 
the struggle of one portion of the people against 
another, and therein, and only therein, resemble 



88 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION". 

/' more the struggles of the Reformation than the 
^ type of the French Revolution. I might almost 
say that it will be much less of a sudden up- 
rising against the authorities than a long drawn 
out civil war, if one does not necessarily join to 
these last words the idea of actual slaughter 
y and battles. We have no ground to think that 
n/ barricade battles and similar warlike accom- 
paniments will play a decisive role to-day. The 
reasons for this have been given so often that I 
have no need of dallying longer concerning 
them. Militarism can only be overthrown by 
rendering the military itself faithless to the 
rulers, not through its being conquered by 
popular uprisings. 

We have just as little to expect from a finan- 
cial crisis as from an armed uprising in produc- 
ing a collapse of existing conditions. In this 
respect the situation is also wholly different 
from that of 1789 and 1848. At that time capi- 
talism was still weak, the accumulation of 
capital still slight and capital difficult to obtain. 
In this relation capital was partially hostile to 
absolutism or at least distrustful of it. The 
government was dependent upon capital and es- 
pecially upon industrial capital and its develop- 
ment was impossible w^ithout it, or at least 
against its will. The dying feudalism, how- 
ever, led to the drying up of all material sources 
of help so that the government received even less 
money from its lands and was ever more depen- 
dent upon the money lenders. This finally led 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 89 

to financial collapse or to concessions to the 
struggling class either of which events were 
able to bring about a political collapse. ^ 

It is wholly .different to-daj. Capitalism > 
does not, like feudalism, lead to under-produc- ( 
tion, but to over-production, and chokes in its / 
own fat. It is not a lack of capital, but super- j 
fluitj of capital which to-day demands profita- 
ble investment and in pursuit of dividends 
draws back from no risk. The governments are 
completely dependent upon the capitalist class <^ / 
and the latter has every reason to protect and f^ 
support them. The increase of public debts can/ 
only become a revolutionary factor in so far as ] 
it increases the pressure of taxes and therewith / 
leads to an uprising of the lower classes, but j 
scarcely (Kussia perhaps must be excepted) to 
a direct financial collapse, or even to a serious 
financial embarrassment of the government. We 
have just as little cause to expect a revolution 
from a financial crisis as from an armed insur- 
rection. 

One means which is peculiar to the pro- 
letariat for battle and the exercise of influ- 
ence is the organized withholding of labor — the 
strike. The more the capitalist manner of pro- 
duction develops and capital concentrates, the 
more gigantic the dimensions of the strike, and 
the more the capitalist manner of production 
presses the small industries, the more will the 
whole of society become dependent upon the un- 
disturbed continuance of capitalist production 



90 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

and the more will every important disturbance 
of this latter, as for instance, a strike of great 
dimensions, bring with it national calamities 
and political results. At a certain height of 
economic development the thought will at once 
occur to use the strike as a means for political 
struggle. It has already appeared as such in 
France and Belgium and has been used with 
good results. In mj opinion it will play a great 
role in the revolutionary battles of the future. 

That has been my view for a long time. In 
my articles on the new party programme of 
1891 (l^eue Zeit, 1890-1891, 'No. 50, page 757) 
I pointed out the possibility that "under certain 
conditions, when a great decision is to be made, 
when great events have moved the labor masses 
to their depths an extensive cessation of labor 
may easily have great political results." 

i^aturally, I am not using the idea of a gen- 
eral strike in the sense that the anarchists and 
the French trade unionists use the word. To 
these latter the political and especially the Par- 
liamentary activity of the proletariat is to be 
supplemented by the strike and it is to become 
a means to throw the social order overboard. 

That is foolish. A general strike in the sense 
that all the laborers of the country at a given 
sign shall lay down their labor presupposes a 
unanimity and an organization of the laborers 
which is scarcely possible in present society, and 
which if it were once attained would be so irre- 
sistible that no general strike would be neces- 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION-. 91 

sary. Such a strike would, however, at one 
stroke render impossible the existence not sim-\ 
ply of existing society but all existence, and 
That of the proletarians long before that of the 
capitalist, and must consequently collapse use- 
lessly at just the moment when its revolutionary 
virtue began to develop. 

The strike as a political weapon will scarcely 
ever, certainly not in any time now visible, take 
on the form of a strike of all the laborers of a 
country. It can also not have the purpose of 
displacing the other means of political struggle 
but only of supplementing and strengthening 
them. We are now entering upon a time where 
opposed to the overwhelming power of organ- 
ized capital an isolated non-political strike will 
be just as hopeless as is the isolated parliamen- 
tary action of the labor parties opposed to the 
pressure of the capitalistically dominated gov- 
ernmental powers. It will be ever more neces- 
sary that both should grow and draw new 
strength from co-operation. 

As is the case with all new weapons the best 
manner to use a political strike must first be 
learned. It is not a cure-all as the anarchists 
announce it, and it is not an infallible means, 
under all conditions, as they consider it. It 
would exceed my purposes to investigate here 
the conditions under which it is applicable. 
Considering the latest events in Belgium I 
might observe that these have shown how very 
much it demands its own peculiar methods 



92 TPIE SOCIAL REVOLUTION". 

which do not favorably combine with other 
methods, as for example, with alliances with 
Liberals. I do not necessarily reject such an 
V alliance under all conditions. It would be fool- 
ish for us not to utilize the disagreements and 
divisions of our opponents. But one should not 
expect more from the Liberals than they are 
able to grant. In the field of proletarian activ- 
ity it may be easily possible under certain con- 
ditions that the opposition between them and 
us in regard to this and that measure may be 
less than between them and our bourgeois oppo- 
nents. At such a time an alliance may have a 
place. But outside of the parliamentary field 
any effort for a revolutionary demand cannot 
be fought with Liberal aid. To seek to 
strengthen proletarian powers in such a struggle 
by a Liberal alliance is to attempt to use the 
weapons for a purpose that are ordinarily used 
to defeat that purpose. The political strike is 
n/ a powerful proletarian weapon that is applica- 
ble only in a battle which the proletariat fights 
alone and in which it enters against the total 
bourgeois society. In this sense it is perhaps 
the most revolutionary weapon of the prole- 
tariat. 

Moreover it is probable that still other means 
and methods of battle will develop of which we 
do not even dream to-day. There is this differ- 
ence between the understanding of the methods 
and organs and of the direction of the social bat- 
tle that the latter can be theoretically investi- 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 93 

gated in advance while the former are created 
in practice and can only be observed by the 
logicians afterwards, who can then investigate 
their significance for further evolution. Unions, 
strikes, corporations, trusts, etc., have sprung 
from practice and not from theory. In this 
field many surprises for us may yet appear. 

As a means of hastening the political develop- 
ment and of bringing the proletariat into a po- 
sition of political power war may play a part. 
War has already often shown itself to be a very 
revolutionary factor. There are historical situ- 
ations in which revolution is necessary to the 
further progress of society but where the revo- 
lutionary classes are still too weak to overthrow 
the ruling powers. The necessity of revolution, / 
does not always imply that the aspiring classes 
should have just the right strength at just the 
right moment. Unfortunately the world is not 
yet so purposefully planned as this. There are 
situations where revolution is undoubtedly de- 
manded, where one ruling class should be dis- 
placed by another, but where the latter is still 
held in firm subjection by the former. If this^/ 
situation continues too long the whole society* 
collapses. Very often in such a situation war 
fulfills the function to which the aspiring class 
has not yet grown. It fulfills this in two ways.^^' 
War can be carried on only by the exercise of 
all the powers of a people. If there is a deep 
division in the nation war will compel the gov- 
erning class to grant concessions to the aspiring 



94 THE SOCIAL EEVOLVTION. 

class which thej would not have attained with- 
out the war. 

If the governing class is not capable of such 
a sacrifice or yields too late for it to be effective 
then war can easily lead to defeat f rona without^ 
which carries with it a collapse within. A gov- 
ernment resting mainly upon an army is over- 
thrown as soon as the army is defeated. 

So it has not unf requently happened that war 
has been an extremely efiicient means, even if 
brutal and destructive, to bring about a progress 
of which other means were incapable. 

The German bourgeois, for example, was ren- 
dered too weak by the transference of the econo- 
mic center of Europe to the sea coast of the 
Atlantic Ocean, and by the thirty years' war 
and its results to overthrow by its own strength 
the feudal absolutism. It was freed from this 
only through the Napoleonic wars and then 
later through the wars of the Bismarckian era. 
The legacy of 1848 was realized upon mainly 
through the wars of the counter-revolutionary 
forces as these forces had themselves been for- 
merly established. 

Today we are in a period of external and 
internal political antagonisms analogous to that 
which existed in the 50's and 60's. Once more 
a mass of social tinder has accumulated. The 
problems of external and internal politics de- 
manding solution become ever more tremendous. 
But none of the ruling classes or parties dare 
earnestly to attempt their solution because this 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 95 

is not possible without great upheavals and they 
shrink back from these because they have 
learned to know the gigantic power of the pro- 
letariat which every such great upheaval threat- 
ens to set free. 

I have referred above to the decay of the in- 
ternal political life which finds its most striking 
expression in the increasing decadence of Par- 
liaments. But hand in hand with this is the 
decay of external politics. One fears every en- 
ergetic policy that may lead to an international 
conflict, not from an ethical dislike of war, but 
for fear of the revolution, whose forerunner it 
may be. Accordingly the statesmanship of our 
rulers consists simply, not alone internally, 
but also externally, in placing every question 
upon the shelf and thereby increasing the num- 
ber of unsolved problems. Thanks to this policy 
there now exists a row of shadow States such 
as Turkey and Austria, which an energetic revo- 
lutionary race of a half century ago placed on 
the list of extinct States. On the other side, 
and for the same reason, the interest of the bour- 
geoisie has completely ceased to stand for an 
independent Polish national state. 

But these social craters are not put out, they 
may burst out again any day in devastating war, 
like Mt. Pelee at Martinique. Economic evolu- 
tion itself continually creates new craters, new 
causes of crises, new points of friction and new 
occasions for warlike developments, in that it 
awakens in the ruling classes a greed for the 



96 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTxON. 

monopolization of the markets and the conquest 
of foreign colonies and in that it substitutes for 
the peaceful attitude of the industrial capitalist, 
the violent one of the financier. 

The single security for freedom is found to* 
day in the fear of the revolutionary proletariat. 
We have yet to see how long this will restrain 
the ever increasing causes of conflict. And there 
are also a number of powers who have no in- 
dependent revolutionary proletariat to fear and 
many of these are completely dominated by an 
unscrupulous, brutal clique of men of the "high 
finance." These powers, hitherto insignificant 
or peace-loving in international politics, are 
continuously becoming more prominent as in- 
ternational disturbers of peace. This is true 
most of all of the United States, but also of 
England and Japan. Russia has figured pre- 
viously in the first place in the list of interna- 
tional disturbers ; her heroic proletariat has 
momentarily restrained her. But just as over- 
confidence of a government in unrestricted in- 
terior power with no revolutionary class at its 
back, so also can the despair of a tottering gov- 
ernment kindle a war. This was the case with 
]^apoleon III. in 1870 and perhaps may yet 
be the case with IN'icholas II. The great danger 
to the peace of the world to-day is from these 
powers and their antagonisms and not from 
such as exist between Germany and France, or 
between Austria and Italy. We must reckon 
on the possibility of a war within a perceptible 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 97 

time and therewith also the possibility of poli- 
tical convulsions that will end directly in prole- 
tarian uprisings or at least in opening the way 
to them. 

Let no one misunderstand me. I am investi- 
gating here, not prophesying and still less am I 
expressing wishes. I investigate what may hap- 
pen; I do not declare what will happen, least 
of all do I demand what should happen. When 
I speak here of war as a means of revolution, 
that does not say that I desire war. Its horrors 
are so terrible that to-day it is only military 
fanatics whose ghastly courage could lead them 
to demand a war in cold blood. But even 
when a revolution is not a means to an end but 
an end in itself, which even at the most bloody 
price could not be too dearly purchased, still 
one cannot desire war as a means to release 
revolution for it is the most irrational means to 
this end. It brings such terrible destruction 
and creates such gigantic demands upon the 
State that any revolution springing from it is 
heavily loaded with tasks that are not essential 
to it but which momentarily absorb all its means 
and energy. Consequently a revolution which 
rises from war is a sign of the weakness of the 
revolutionary class, and often the cause of fur- 
ther weakness, just because of the sacrifice that 
it brings with it, as well as by the moral and 
intellectual degradation to which war gives rise. 
It also increases enormously the tasks of the 
revolutionary regime and simultaneously weak- 



«8 THE SOCIAL EEVOLU^ION. 

ens its powers. Accordingly a revolution spring- 
ing from a war is easier wrecked or sooner loses 
its motive force. How wholly different were 
the results of the bourgeois revolution in France 
where it sprung from an uprising of the people, 
from those in Germany, where it was imported 
through a number of wars. And the prole- 
tarian cause would have received much greater 
justice from the uprising of the Parisian prole- 
tariat if it had not been prematurely brought 
about by the war of '70 and '71, but had waited 
imtil a later period in which the Parisians 
would have had sufficient strength to have 
driven out Louis ^^Tapoleon and his band with- 
out a war. 

We also have not the slightest ground to wish 
for an artificial acceleration of our advance by 
a war. 

But things do not move according to our 
wishes. To be sure men make their own his- 
tory, but they do not choose according to their 
desires the problems which they have to solve, 
nor the conditions under which they live, nor 
the means through which these problems are to 
be solved. If it came according to our wishes 
who of us would not prefer the peaceable to the 
violent road for which our present strength has 
•oerhaps not sufficiently grown and which per- 
iiaps would swallow us up. But it is not our 
task to express pious wishes and to demand of 
the world that it move in accordance with 
them, but to recognize the tasks, conditions and 



THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTION. 99 

means which arise and to use the latter purpose- 
fully to a solution of the former. 

Investigation of existing facts is the founda- 
tion of any rational policy. If I have arrived 
at the conviction that we are entering upon a 
revolutionary epoch, concerning whose conclu- 
sions everything is not yet clear, I am driven 
thereto by the investigation of actual conditions 
and not by my desires. I desire nothing more 
than that I may be wrong and that those may be 
right who maintain that the greatest difficulties 
of the transition period from capitalism to so- 
cialism lie behind us, and that we have all the 
essential foundations for a peaceful advance to 
socialism. Unfortunately I see no possibility 
of accepting this view. The greatest and the 
most difficult of the battles for political power 
still lies before us. It will be decided only 
after a long and hard struggle that will test 
all our powers to the utmost. 

One can do nothing worse to the proletariat 
than to advise him to rest upon his arms in or- 
der to encourage a favorable attitude of the bour- 
geoisie. Under present conditions this means 
nothing less than to deliver the proletariat over 
to the bourgeoisie and bring it into intellectual 
and political dependence upon the latter, to en- 
ervate and degrade it and make it incapable of 
fulfilling its great historical purposes. 

The proof that this is not exaggerated is fur- 
nished by the English laborers. Nowhere is the 
proletariat more numerous, nowhere is its econo- 



100 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION?". 

mic organization better developed, nowhere in 
its political freedom greater than in England, 
and nowhere is the proletariat politically more 
helpless. It has not simply lost all indepen- 
dence in the higher politics. It no longer knows 
how to even preserve its immediate interests. 

Here also we may again refer to the pre- 
viously cited article of Webb, which certainly 
cannot be suspected of being consciously revolu- 
tionary. "During the upward movement of the 
last ten years,'' he says, in the previously men- 
tioned article, "the participation of the English 
laborers in labor politics has gradually de- 
creased. The eight-hour law and the construct- 
ive Socialism of the Fabians to which the unions 
turned so eagerly in the period of '90 and '93 
ceases more and more to occupy their thoughts. 
The number of labor representatives in the 
Lower House does not increase." 

Even the latest scourgings of their opponents 
have not served to rouse the proletariat of Eng- 
land. They remain dumb, even when their 
hands are rendered powerless, dumb when their 
bread is made more costly. The English la- 
borers to-day stand lower as a political factor 
than the laborers of the most economically back- 
ward country in Europe — ^Russia. It is the 
real revolutionary consciousness in these latter 
that gives them their great political power. It 
is the renunciation of revolution, the narrowing 
of interest to the interests of the moment, to 



THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTION^. 101 

the so-called practical politics, that have made 
file tatter a cipher in actual politics. 

~^lit in this practical politics the loss of politi- 
cal power goes 'hand in hand with, moral and 
political degradation. 

I have referred above to the moral re-birth of 
the proletariat which has transformed them 
from the barbarians of modern society into the 
most significant factor in the maintenance and 
furtherance of our culture. But they have only 
so risen when they have remained in sharpest 
antagonism to the bourgeoisie ; where the strife 
for political power has kept alive in them the 
consciousness that they are called to raise them- 
selves together with the whole of society. Here, 
again, England oifers us an illustration of a 
laboring class who renounce revolution and care 
only for practical politics, laughing scornfully 
at their ideals hung on a peg at one side and 
casting from them every goal of battle that they 
cannot express in pounds and shillings. From 
the mouths of the bourgeois themselves come 
complaints of that moral and intellectual decay 
of the elite of the English laborers which they 
share with the bourgeoisie itself and to-day in- 
deed they are scarcely more than little bourgeois 
and are distinguished from them only by a 
somewhat greater lack of culture. Their highest 
ideal consists in aping their masters and in 
maintaining their hypocritical respectability, 
their admiration for wealth, however it may be 
obtained, and their spiritless manner of killing 



102 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION". 

their leisure time. The emancipation of their 
class appears to them as a foolish dream. Con- 
sequently, it is foot-ball, boxing, horse racing 
and opportunities for gambling which move 
them the deepest and to which their entire leis- 
ure time, their individual powers, and their 
material means are devoted. 

One seeks hopelessly to rouse by political 
preaching the English laborers to a higher way 
of life, to a mind capable of nobler considera- 
tions. The ethic of the proletariat flows from 
its revolutionary efforts and it is these which 
have strengthened and ennobled it. It is the 
idea of the revolution which has brought about 
that wonderful elevation of the proletariat from 
its deepest degradation, which elevation stands 
as the greatest result of the second half of the 
nineteenth century. 

To this revolutionary idealism we must above 
all cling fast, then come what will, we can bear 
the heaviest, attain the highest, and remain 
worthy of the great historical purpose that 
awaits us. 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 103 



Part IL On the Day After the Social 
Eevolution. 

I must first of all clear away a suspicion 
which will be roused in many people by the 
title of this work. "On the Day after the Revo- 
lution!" Does not that mean that we "ortho- 
dox" Marxists are only disguised Blanquists 
who expect by a coup d' etat to make ourselves 
dictators, and is not it a return to Utopianism 
when I attempt to describe a movement of 
which we can know nothing as to the circum- 
stances under which it will take place? 

I hasten then to remark that I consider the 
revolution an historical process that may easily / 
draw itself out into a decade of hard battles. ^ 
On the other side I am thoroughly convinced 
that it is not our task to invent recipes for the 
kitchens of the future, and when more than ten 
years ago the German Social democracy pro- 
posed to include in its program demands for 
such measures as would accelerate the trans- 
formation from a capitalist to a socialist man- 
ner of production, I opposed this because I 
maintained that the party could not lay out a 
definite road for conditions of which we can 
have only a dim presentiment and which may 
easily surprise us with much that is wholly un- 
expected. 

But I maintain that it is a help to political 



104 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

clearness to examine the problems that wi'l 
grow out of the conquest of political power by 
us. This is also valuable for propaganda since 
our opponents frequently assert that our vic- 
tory will give us unsoluble problems, and we 
have in our own ranks also people who are un- 
able to paint the results of our victory black 
enough. According to these people the day of 
our victory is also the day of our downfall. 
Therefore it is important to investigate and 
know how far this is the case. 

But if one wishes to attain definite results 
in this direction and not get lost in endless 
windings, then we must investigate these prob- 
lems in a simple form such as never exists in 
reality and abstracted from all complications. 
This is a customary process in science whereby 
one remains entirely conscious that in reality 
things are never so simple, or develop so 
smoothly as is the case in the abstraction. I 
have already said that the social revolution 
is a process of many years. But to reduce 
things to their simplest forms we must pro- 
ceed from the idea that on some fine day 
the proletariat captures entire political power 
without restrictions at one stroke and is 
enabled to exercise it in strict accord with 
its class interests. The first certainly could 
not occur and the latter can never be com- 
pletely the case. The proletariat itself is not 
sufficiently united nor enough of a. uniform 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 105 

mass to permit such a condition. The pro- 
letariat divides into perceptibly different 
grades, different in their rate of development, 
different also in their intellectual and economic 
stage of evolution. It is also very probable 
that simultaneous with the rise of the pro- 
letariat other social grades close to them will 
be raised, such for example as a portion of the 
small bourgeoisie, or the small farmers, whose 
intellectual attitude is not yet fully proletarian. 
Friction and mistakes of manifold forms will 
rise from this, so that we shall never come to 
just what we wish and shall never have exactly 
that which we should have. We must however 
at this time leave these disturbing factors out 
of consideration. 

On the other hand we must proceed through- 
out this investigation from certain assumptions. 
We cannot accept as our foundation a picture 
of the conditions as they may develop in the 
future for this would lead us into fantasies. 
And yet it is certain that we shall not gain our 
victory under present conditions. Revolution 
itself presupposes a long and profound struggle 
that will in itself greatly change our present 
social and political structure. After the con- 
quest of political power by the proletariat, prob- 
lems will arise of which we know nothing and 
many with which we are occupied to-day will 
by that time be solved. IN'ew means to the so- 
lution of these different problems will also arise 
of which we to-day have no suspicion. 



106 THE SOCIAL BEVOLITTION. 

Just as in natural philosophy the laws of fall- 
ing bodies are investigated in a vacuum and 
not in moving air so here we investigate the 
situation of the conquering proletariat under 
presumptions which cannot occur in their com- 
plete purity; that is under the postulate that 
some morning we shall at a single blow come 
into complete domination while the means 
which will be at hand for the solution of our 
task will be those that exist to-day. We can by 
this means attain results that will be differ- 
entiated from the actual course of coming 
events in exactly the same way as the laws of 
falling bodies differ from the actual fall of 
various substances. But in spite of these varia- 
tions the laws of falling bodies actually exist 
and govern the fall of every single substance 
and the rate of fall of these can only be de- 
termined when we have first understood these 
laws. 

So it is that the outlooks and obstacles for 
the conquering proletariat actually will be dis- 
covered in the road we shall take (taking it for 
granted that we apply our method correctly) 
and they will undoubtedly play an important 
role in the social revolution and its resultants, 
even if the actuality is something wholly dif- 
ferent from that we here consider it. And it is 
only in this way that one can come to scientific- 
ally definite judgments concerning the outcome 
of the revolution. Those to whom this road ap- 
pears too uncertain to form a basis for prognos- 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 107 

tication must remain silent whenever this sub- 
ject is under discussion and simply declare: 
''Whoever lives will know how it will come out 
and what is undeniably the proper road." 

Only such problems of the social revolution 
are capable of discussion as can be determined 
in this manner. Concerning all others no judg- 
ment can be made either in this or in any other 
direction. 

THE EXPKOPKIATION" OF THE EXPKOPKIATORS. 

Let us imagine then that this fine day has 
already come, in which at one stroke all power 
is thrown into the lap of the proletariat. How 
would it begin ? N^ot how would it begin upon 
the grounds of this or that theory, or opinion, 
but must begin, driven thereto by its class in- 
terests and the compulsion of economic neces- 
sity. 

In the first place it is self-evident that it 
would recover what the bourgeoisie has lost. It 
would sweep all remnants of feudalism away 
and realize that democratic programme for 
which the bourgeoisie once stood. As the lowest 
of all classes it is also the most democratic of 
all classes. It would extend universal suffrage 
to every individual and establish complete 
freedom of press and assemblage. It would 
make the State completely independent of the 
church and abolish all rights of inheritance. It 
would establish complete autonomy in all indi- 
vidual communities and abolish militarism. 



108 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 

This last could be brought about in two ways: 
through the introduction of universal armament 
and the dissolution of the army. Universal 
armament is a political measure and dissolution 
of the army a financial one. The former can 
under certain conditions cost as much as a 
standing army. But it is essential to the se- 
curity of democracy, in order to take away from, 
the government its most powerful means of op- 
posing the people. Dissolution again aims 
mainly at a diminution of the military budget. 

It can, however, be carried through in such 
a manner as to strengthen still further the power 
of the government, if in place of an army built 
on universal compulsory military service an 
army of characterless slum proletariat is substi- 
tuted which will lend itself to anything for 
money. A proletarian regime would neces- 
sarily find a way to unite both methods so as to 
arm the people and to simultaneously make an 
end of the disturbance brought about by the in- 
stallation of new weapons, cannons, warships 
and fortresses. 

Undoubtedly the victorious proletariat would 
also make fundamental reforms in taxation. It 
would endeavor to abolish all the taxes that to- 
day rest upon the laboring population — first of 
all the indirect ones that increase the cost of 
living, and would draw the sums necessary to 
the covering of governmental expenses from the 
great properties by means of a progressive in- 
come tax supplemented by a property tax. T 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 109 

shall /eturn to this point later. This must suf- 
fice lor the present suggestion. 

A particularly important field for us is that 
of education. Popular schools have always oc- 
cupied the attention of proletarian parties and 
they even played a great role in the old com- 
munistic sects of the Middle Ages. It must al- 
ways be one of the aims of the thinking prole- 
tariat to deprive the possessing classes of the 
monopoly of culture. It is self-evident that the 
new regime would increase and improve the 
schools and pay their teachers better. But we 
would go still further. To be sure the victorious 
proletariat, no matter how radically minded it 
may be, cannot at a single stroke abolish class 
differences, for these have risen from many cen- 
turies of development and these causes and 
their results are not swept away as easily as a 
chalk mark is wiped from a slate with a sponge. 
But the school can prepare the road in this di- 
rection and contribute very essentially to the 
abolition of class differences in that all children 
will be equally well nourished and clothed, and 
instructed in the same manner while at the same 
time the possibility of a diverse development of 
their intellectual and bodily activities is re- 
tained. 

We must not overvalue the influence of the 
school. Life is mightier than it and where it 
comes in opposition to actuality it will certainly 
be forced to give way. When, for example, the 
effort is made to-day to abolish class difference 



110 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

through the schools not much progress can be 
made. But the school can, when it works in 
the direction of the existing social development, 
powerfully assist this movement. Where these 
social conditions are also operating in the direc- 
tion of class interests the school can co-operate 
and, at least within a limited sphere, realize for 
the generation which is growing up in this 
period what the whole society of this generation 
is simultaneously growing toward. 

All these are means that bourgeois radicalism 
has already placed before itself, but a certain 
power, and a disregard of capital of which no 
bourgeois class is capable are essential to such 
an attainment. Such a school as is here outlined 
would, in Germany, for example, according to 
the reckoning which I have made in my Agrar- 
frage demand one and a half or two million 
marks yearly. Almost double the present mili- 
tary budget! Such a sum for school purposes 
can only be obtained by a proletarian ruled com- 
munity that does not maintain a respectful atti- 
tude towards great incomes. 

But the revolution would naturally not stop 
at these transformations. It would not be sim- 
ply a bourgeois democratic, but a proletarian 
revolution. We shall not, as we have already 
stated, investigate what the proletariat would 
do upon the basis of this or that theory, for we 
do not know what theories may appear or under 
what circumstances the next revolution will be 
carried through. We will only investigate what 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. Ill 

a victorious proletariat, if it is to advance pur- 
posefully, will be compelled to do by the pres- 
sure of economic conditions. 

There is one problem above all others with 
which the proletarian regime must primarily 
occupy itself. It will in all cases be compelled 
to solve the question of the relief of the unem- 
ployed. Enforced idleness is the greatest curse 
of the laborer. For him it signifies misery, 
humiliation, crime. The laborer lives only from 
the sale of his labor power and when he can find 
no purchaser for this he is delivered up to hun- 
ger. And even when the laborer has found his 
labor the unemployed still torture him, for he is 
never secure from the loss of his labor and con- 
sequent misery. A proletarian regime would 
in every case make an end to this condition 
even if the proletarians were not Socialists but 
simply Liberals as in England. In just what 
manner the problem of the unemployed would 
be solved we shall not here attempt to investi- 
gate. There are many different methods, and 
many plans to this end have been made by soci- 
ologists. For example it has been sought from 
the bourgeois point of view to insure against 
the necessity of unemployment by taxation, and 
in part this has been done. But a bourgeois so- 
ciety can only create the most insufficient patch- 
work in this field because it is itself the bough 
from which unemployment hangs. Only the 
proletariat and the victorious proletariat can 
and will enact the measures which are capable 



112 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

of completely abolishing the necessity of the 
unemployed whether this be through sickness 
or otherwise. An actually effective main- 
tenance of all the unemployed must completely 
alter the relative strength of the proletariat 
and capitalist. It will make the proletariat 
master in the factory. That the laborer of 
to-day is compelled to sell himself to the em- 
ployer and that the latter can exploit and en- 
slave him is because of the ghost of the unem- 
ployed and the hunger whip that swings above 
his head. If the laborer can once be secure of 
existence even when he is not working, nothing 
would be easier than for him to overthrow capi- 
tal. He no longer needs capitalists, while the 
latter cannot continue his business without him. 
Once things have gone thus far the employer 
would be beaten in every conflict with his em- 
ployes and be quickly compelled to give in to 
them. The capitalists could then perhaps con- 
tinue to be the directors of the factories, but 
they would cease to be their masters and ex- 
ploiters. Once the capitalists recognized, how- 
ever, that they had the right to bear only the 
risk and burdens of capitalist business, these 
men would be the very first ones to renounce the 
further extension of capitalist production and 
to demand that their undertakings be purchased 
because they could no longer carry them on with 
any advantage. We have already had similar 
results. This was the case, for example, in 
Ireland at the time the anti-rent movement 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 113 

reached its highest point and the land owners 
were not in a position to forcibly collect their 
rents. Accordingly it was the landlords them- 
selves who demanded that the State purchase all 
their landed possessions. We could expect the 
same from the capitalist undertakers under a 
proletarian regime, even if this regime was not 
dominated by socialist theories and did not pro- 
ceed directly from the point of view of bringing 
the capitalist means of production into social 
possession. Capitalists would themselves de- 
mand that their means of production be pur- 
chased. The political domination of the prole- 
tariat and the continuation of the capitalist 
system of production are irreconcilable. Who- 
ever concedes the possibility of the first must 
also grant the possibility of the disappearance 
of the latter. 

The question then arises as to what pur- 
chasers are at the command of capitalists when 
they wish to sell their undertakings. A por- 
tion of the factories, mines, etc., could be sold 
directly to the laborers who are working them, 
and could be henceforth operated co-opera- 
tively; another portion could be sold to co- 
operatives of distribution, and still another to 
the communities or to the states. It is clear, 
however, that capital would find its most ex- 
tensive and generous purchaser in the States 
or municipalities, and for this very reason the 
majority of the industries would pass into the 
possession of the States and municipalities. 



114 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

That the Social Democrats when they came 
into control would strive consciously for this 
solution is well recognized. On the other side, 
even a proletariat which was not governed by 
socialist ideas would proceed from the point 
of view of transforming into State or municipal 
property those industries which for natural 
reasons — for example, mines — or through the 
form of their organization — as, for example, 
trusts — have become monopolies. 

These private monopolies have become un- 
bearable, not simply for the wage-workers, but 
for all classes of society who do not share in 
their ownership. It is only the weakness of 
the bourgeois world, as opposed to capital, 
which hinders it from taking effective action 
against these monopolies. A proletarian revo- 
lution must from its very necessity lead to the 
abolition of private property in these monopo- 
lies. They are to-day very extensive and 
dominate in a high grade the whole economic 
life and develop with great rapidity. Their 
nationalization and communalization signifies 
simply the domination of the whole productive 
process by society and its organs, — the State 
and municipalities. 

The industries which are most prepared for 
nationalization are the national means of trans- 
portation, railroads and steamships, together 
with those which produce raw material and 
partially produced goods; for example, mines, 
forests, iron foundries, machine manufactures 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 115 

etc. These are also the very spheres where the 
great industries and trustification are highest 
developed. The manufacture of raw material 
and partially produced articles for personal 
consumption as well as small trading have many 
local characteristics, and are still largely de- 
centralized. In these spheres the municipality 
and co-operatives will come more to the front, 
leaving the national industries to play a second- 
ary role. But with the increasing division of 
labor, production for direct personal consump- 
tion becomes of less and less importance 
compared with the production of means of 
production, and therewith also the sphere of 
governmental production increases. On the 
other side this field is extended by the develop- 
ment of commerce and of the great industries, 
which bursts the local bonds of the market for 
each branch of production one after another, 
and transforms one after another from a local 
into a national industry. For example, gas 
lighting is clearly a municipal business. The 
development of electric lighting and the trans- 
formation of power in mountainous regions 
makes the nationalization of water power nec- 
essary. This operates also to transform illu- 
mination from a municipal to a national 
business. Again, the business of the shoemaker 
was formerly confined to the local market. The 
shoe factory does not supply simply the com- 
munity, but the whole nation, with its produc- 
tion, and is ripe not for communalization, but 



116 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

for nationalization. The same is true of sugar 
factories, breweries, etc. 

The trend of evolution under a proletarian 
regime would be towards making the national 
form of industry predominant. 

So much then concerning the property in the 
means of production of the great industries, 
including those in agriculture. What then is 
to happen to money capital and landed prop- 
erty f Money capital is that portion of capital 
taking the form of interest-bearing loans. The 
money capitalist fulfills no personal function 
in the social life, and can without difficulty be 
at once expropriated. This will be all the 
more readily done as it is this portion of the 
capitalist class, the financier, who is most su- 
perfluous, and who is continually usurping 
domination over the whole economic life. He 
is also the master of the great private monopo- 
lies, the trusts, etc., and it is therefore impos- 
sible to expropriate industrial capital without 
including money capital. They are too com- 
pletely bound up in each other. The socializa- 
tion of capitalist industry (as one may desig- 
nate for short the transference to national, mu- 
nicipal and co-operative possession) will carry 
with it the socialization of the greater part of 
the money capital. When a factory or a piece 
of landed property is nationalized, its debts 
will be also nationalized, and private debts will 
become public debts. In the case of a corpo- 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 11 



ration the stockholders will become holders of 
government bonds. 

In this connection comes the consideration 
of landed propisrtj. I refer here to property 
in land, and not agricultural industry. The 
great capitalistic socially operated agricultural 
industries will be subject to the same evolution 
as the other great industries. They will lose 
their wage-slaves and be compelled to offer 
their possessions to the State or municipality 
for purchase, and will thereby become social- 
ized. The little farming industries may well 
remain private property. But I shall return 
to this subject later. 

But we are not here discussing agricultural 
industry, but the ownership of land, independ- 
ent of industry, the private property in the 
ground that yields to its possessor ground rent, 
through leasing or renting or interest on a 
mortgage, whether the property be urban or 
rural. 

What we said of the money capitalist holds 
true also of the land owner. He likewise has 
no longer any personal function to fulfill in 
the economic life, and can easily be shoved to 
one side. As noted above in the instance of 
private monopoly, so with regard to private 
property in land, we find much opposition even 
in bourgeois circles, which expresses itself in 
a demand for socialization, since this private 
land monopoly is constantly growing more op- 
pressive and injurious, especially in the cities. 



118 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

Here also nothing is lacking but the necessarv 
power to bring about socialization. The vic- 
torious proletariat will furnish this power. 

The expropriation of the exploiting classes 
presents itself purely as a question of power. 
It proceeds essentially from the economic ne- 
cessities of the proletariat, and will be the 
inevitable result of their victory. 

CONFISCATION OR COMPENSATION. 

The question of the possibility and necessity 
of the expropriation of the exploiters can be 
answered with much greater degree of certainty 
than the question which naturally arises there- 
from: Will the expropriation proceed as a 
process of confiscation or compensation; will 
the previous possessors be indemnified or not? 
This is a question which it is impossible to 
answer to-day. We are not the ones who will 
have to complete this development. It is now 
impossible to determine any force inherent in 
conditions which will make either one answer 
or the other necessary. In spite of this, there 
are, however, a number of reasons which indi- 
cate that a proletarian regime will seek the 
road of compensation, and payment of the capi- 
talists and landowners. I will here mention 
but two of these reasons which appear the 
most important to me. Money capital, as al- 
ready stated, has become an impersonal power, 
and every sum of money can to-day be trans- 
fcarmed into money capital without the owner 



THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTION 119 

actively functioning as a capitalist. We know 
that when a man has saved a mark to-day he 
can put it out at interest without thereby 
becoming a capitalist. As is well known, this 
phenomenon has been widely utilized by the 
optimistic representatives of the existing order. 
They conclude that this gives an easy way for 
the expropriation of the capitalist by the 
laborers depositing their total of saved pennies 
in the saving banks or purchasing shares in 
the corporations with them, and thereby be- 
coming partners in capital. At other times 
these optimists say that if we were to confiscate 
capital to-day we must confiscate not alone the 
capital of the rich, but that of the laborers 
also, in which case we would be taking away 
the scanty savings of the poor, the widows and 
the orphans. In this manner we would arouse 
great discontent among the laborers themselves, 
another reason which would tend to provoke 
them to the overthrow of their own domination, 
a result which these glorifiers of the existing 
order await with greatest certainty. 

The first assumption I do not need to discuss 
further. It is too foolish. The people who 
expect to see capital expropriated by the in- 
crease of savings are blind to a much more 
rapid increase of large private capitals. On 
the other hand, it is not wholly unjustifiable 
to say that a proletarian regime pledged to 
universal confiscation would also confiscate the 
savings of small traders. That would not be 



120 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

a reason why the laborers should find their own 
rule unnecessary. (One must be hard up. for 
plausible arguments against a social revolution 
when he makes use of such anticipations. ) But 
it might become a reason for the conquering 
proletariat to stop in the confiscation of the 
means of production. 

If, however, that should happen, one could 
ask. What justice has the laboring class re- 
ceived from expropriation? It works simply 
to make all capital become simple money capi- 
tal ; and all the capital being transformed into 
national, state and co-operative bonds, any 
surplus value which the capitalists have drawn 
directly from the laborers will flow to them 
from the nations, states and co-operatives. Is 
this in any way to change the condition of the 
laborer ? 

This question is wholly justifiable. But 
even if a proletarian regime should permit the 
same amount of profit to flow to capital that 
it had formerly received, the expropriation 
through a continuance of proletarian rule would 
have brought great advantages with it, in that 
a further increase of exploitation from then 
on would be impossible. Any new application 
of capital as well as every increase would be 
excluded together with all increase in ground 
rent. This alone would be a significant result 
of proletarian transformation. Every further 
increase of social wealth would from then on 
inhere to the good of all society. 



THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTION. 121 

But together with this there would come still 
another advantage. As soon as all the capital- 
ist wealth had taken the form of bonds of states, 
municipalities and co-operatives, it would be 
possible to raise a progressive income, property 
and inheritance tax to a height which until then 
was impossible. It is one of our demands at 
the present time that such a tax shall be sub- 
stituted for all others especially for an indirect 
tax. But even if we had to-day the power to 
carry through such a measure with the support 
of other parties, which is plainly impossible be- 
cause no bourgeois party would go so far, we 
would at once find ourselves in the presence of 
great difficulties. It is a well known fact that 
the higher the tax the greater the efforts at tax 
dodging. But when a condition exists where 
any concealment of income and property is im- 
possible even then we could not be in a position 
to force the income and property tax as high 
as we wish because the capitalists, if the tax on 
their income or property pressed them too 
closely, would simply leave the State. There 
have already been instances of this. The State 
then has the income and property tax without 
either income or property. Above a certain 
measure such taxes cannot rise to-day even if 
we had the political power. The situation how- 
ever is completely changed when all capitalist 
property takes the form of public debts. The 
.property that to-day is so hard to find then lies 
in broad daylight. It would then only be neces- 



122 THE SOCIAT. REVOLUTION-. 

sary to declare that all bonds must be public and 
it would be known exactly what was the value 
of every property and every capitalist income. 
The tax could then be raised as high as desired 
without the possibility of tax frauds. It would 
then also be impossible to avoid taxation by 
emigration for it is then a public institution of 
the country and above all of the nation itself 
from which all interest must flow and the tax 
could simply be taken from the interest before 
it was paid out. Under such conditions it would 
be possible to increase the progressive income 
and property tax as high as desired. If neces- 
sary it might be put so high as to be equivalent, 
or nearly so, to a confiscation of the great prop- 
erties. 

It might well be asked what advantage is 
offered by this roundabout way of confi.scation 
of great property instead of taking the direct 
road. Is it not mere jugglery simply for the 
purpose of avoiding the appearance of confisca- 
tion if capital is first compensated for at its full 
value and then confiscated through tax legisla- 
tion ? The difference between this mode* and 
that of direct confiscation appears to be but 
formal. 

But the difference is not so trifling. Direct 
confiscation of all capitalists would strike all, 
the small and the great, those utterly useless to 
labor and those the most essential to labor in the 
same manner. It is difficult, often impossible, 
in this method to separate the large possessions 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 123 

from the small when these are united in the 
form of money capital in the same undertaking. 
Direct confiscation would complete this quickly, 
often at one stroke, while confiscation through 
taxation permits the disappearance of capitalist 
property through a long drawn out process pro- 
ceeding in the exact degree in which the new 
order is established and its benevolent influence 
made perceptible. It makes it possible to ex- 
tend the process of confiscation over a decade 
so that it will only be fully operative in the 
new generation that will have grown up under 
the new conditions and is therefore not accus- 
tomed to reckon with capital and interest. 
Confiscation in this way loses its harshness, it 
becomes more acceptable and less painful. The 
more peaceably the conquest of the political 
power by the proletariat is attained and the 
more firmly organized and enlightened it is, 
the more we can expect that the primitive forms 
of confiscation will be softened. 

I have lingered some>/hat longer with this 
question because it constitute,: one of the main 
objections of our opponents and not because 
its carrying out is the greatest difficulty that we 
will meet. The greatest difficulties begin rather 
after all of the above events. The expropria- 
tion of the means of production is relatively the 
simplest incident among the great transforma- 
tions of the social revolution. It requires only 
the necessary power and it is one of the inevita^ 
ble presumptions of our whole investigation. 



124 THE SOCIAL EEVO'LUTION. 

The difficulties for the proletarian regime lie 
not so much in the sphere of property as in that 
of production. 

THE II^CENTIVE OF THE LABORER TO LABOR. 

We have seen that the social revolution makes 
the continuation of the capitalist manner of 
production impossible, and that the political 
domination of the proletariat is necessarily 
bound up with the economic uprising against the 
capitalist manner of production by which its 
progress is hindered. Production however must 
continue. It cannot pause even for a few weeks 
without the whole of society going down. So 
it is that the victorious proletariat has the im- 
perative task of ensuring the continuance of 
production in spite of all disturbances, and to 
lead the laborer back to the factories, or other 
places of labor upon which they have turned 
their backs and to keep them there in order that 
production may go on undisturbed. 

What are the means at the disposal of the 
new regime for the solution of this problem ? 
Certainly not the whip of hunger and still less 
that of physical compulsion. If there are peo- 
ple who think that the victory of the proletariat 
is to establish a prison regimentation where 
each one will be assigned his labor by his su- 
perior then they know the proletariat very 
poorly. The proletariat which will then make 
its own laws has a much stronger instinct for 
freedom than any of the servile and pedantic 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 125 

professors who are crying about the prisonlike 
character of the future state. 

The victorious proletariat will never be sat- 
isfied with any- prison or barrack-like regula- 
tions. Moreover it has no need of anything of 
the kind since it has other means at its com- 
mand to hold the laborer to his labor. 

In this connection the great power of custom 
must not be forgotten. Capital has accustomed 
the modern laborer to work day in and day out 
and he will not long remain wholly without 
labor. There are people who are so much ac- 
customed to their work that they do not know 
what to do with their free time and that feel 
themselves unhappy when they are not working, 
and there will be few people who will feel them- 
selves happy for any length of time without any 
work. I am convinced that when once labor 
loses the repulsive character of over-work and 
when the hours of labor are reduced in a reason- 
able degree, custom alone will suffice to hold 
the great majority of workers in regular work 
in factories and mines. 

But it is self-evident that we cannot trust to 
this motive alone as it is the weakest. Another 
much stronger motive force is the discipline of 
the proletariat. We know that when the union 
declares a strike the discipline of organized 
labor is sufficiently strong to make the laborers 
freely take upon themselves all the dangers and 
horrors of unemployment and to remain hungry 
for months in order to secure a victorious con- 



126 THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTION. 

elusion for the common cause. !N'ow I believe 
that when it is possible by the strength of dis- 
cipline to keep the laborers out of the factories 
it will also be possible to hold them in by the 
same force. If the union once recognizes the 
necessity of the unbroken regular progress of 
labor we may be sure that the interest of the 
whole will be so great that scarcely a single 
member will leave his post. The same force 
that the proletariat uses to-day as a weapon to 
destroy production will then become an effec- 
tive means to secure the regular continuance of 
social labor. The higher the economic organiza- 
tion develops to-day the better the outlook for 
the undisturbed progress of production after the 
conquest of political power by the proletariat. 

But the discipline which lives in the prole- 
tariat is not military discipline. It does not 
mean blind obedience to an authority imposed 
from above. It is democratic discipline, a free 
will submission to a self-chosen leadership, and 
to the decisions of the majority of their own 
comrades. If this democratic discipline oper- 
ates in the factory, it presupposes a democratic 
organization of labor, and that a democratic 
factory will take the place of the present aristo- 
cratic one. It is self evident that a socialist 
regime would from the beginning seek to or- 
ganize production democratically. But even if 
the victorious proletariat did not have this point 
in view from the beginning they would be 
driven to it bv the necessity of ensuring the 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 127 

progress of production. The maintenance of 
social discipline in labor could only be secured 
by the introduction of union discipline into the 
processes of production. 

This would, however, not be everywhere car- 
ried out in the same manner, for each industry 
has its own peculiarities according to which the 
organization of the laborers must conform. 
There are, for example, industries which can- 
not be operated without a bureaucratic organiza- 
tion, as for example railroads. The democratic 
organization can be so formed that the laborers 
choose delegates, who will constitute a sort of 
parliament, which will fix the conditions of 
labor and control the government of the bureau- 
cratic machinery. Other industries can be 
given over to the direction of the unions, and 
others again can be operated co-operatively. 
There are also many forms of democratic or- 
ganizations of industry which are possible, and 
we need not expect that the organization of all 
industry would be according to one and the 
same pattern. 

We have seen how the various forms of prop- 
erty would vary and that there would be na- 
tional, municipal and co-operative property. 
At the same time, as we saw, private property 
can still exist in many means of production. 
J^ow we see also that the organization of in- 
dustry takes on manifold forms. 

But however powerful motives democratic 
discipline and the custom of labor may be, they 



128 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION". 

are perhaps not sufficient to ensure that the en- 
tire labor class would continuously take part 
in production. We need not expect that at any 
time in present society the economic organiza- 
tion and discipline will include more than the 
majority of the laboring class. When these 
shall come into control only a minority of the 
members will probably be organized. It will 
be necessary to look for other motives to labor. 
There is one especially strong motive that is 
peculiar to a proletarian regime, that is, the at- 
tractive power of labor. It will be necessary to 
make labor, which to-day is a burden, a joy, 
so that it will be a pleasure to work, so that the 
laborer will go to his work with pleasure. To 
be sure that is not so simple a thing, but at 
least a beginning to it can be made by the pro- 
letariat at the beginning of its rule in that it 
will shorten the hours of labor. At the same 
time it will endeavor to make the place of labor 
more hygienic and friendly and to take from 
the labor process as much as possible its dis- 
agreeable repulsive side. 

All of this is simply a continuation of efforts 
that to-day are somewhat developed in all labor 
legislation. But great advances in this direc- 
tion demand building and technical change? 
which cannot be brought about between one day 
and the next. It will be neither an easy or 
rapid task to make the work in factories and 
mines very attractive. Beside the attractive- 
ness of labor another power of attraction will 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 129 

come into operation through the wages of labor. 

I speak here of the wages of labor. What, 
it will be said, will there be w^ages in the new 
society ? Shall we not have abolished wage- 
labor and money ? How then can one speak of 
the wages of labor ? These objections would be 
sound if the social revolution proposed to im- 
mediately abolish money. I maintain that this 
would be impossible. Money is the simplest 
means known up to the present time which 
makes it possible in as complicated a mechan- 
ism as that of the modern productive process, 
with ii3 tremendous far-reaching division of 
labor, to secure the circulation of products and 
their distribution to the individual members of 
society. It is the means which makes it pos- 
sible for each one to satisfy his necessities ac- 
cording to his individual inclination (to be sure 
within the bounds of his economic power). As 
a means to such circulation money will be found 
indispensable until something better is discov- 
ered. To be sure many of its functions, es- 
pecially that of the measure of value, will dis- 
appear, at least in internal commerce. A few 
remarks concerning value will not be out of 
place here since they relate to what will be of 
much importance in our future discussion. 

There could be no greater error than to con- 
sider that one of the tasks of a socialist society 
is to see that the law of value is brought into 
perfect operation and that only equivalent 
values are exchanged. The law of values is 



130 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTIOlSr. 

rather a law peculiar to a society ot production 
for exchange. 

Production for exchange is that manner of 
production in which with a developed division 
of labor independent producers produce for one 
another. But no manner of production can 
exist without a definite proportionality in pro- 
duction. The number of labor powers at the 
disposal of society is limited, and production 
can only be continued when a corresponding 
number of productive forces are active in each 
branch of existing production. In a commun- 
istic society labor will be systematically regu- 
lated and the labor power be assigned to the 
individual branches of production according to 
a definite plan. In the production for exchange 
this regulation is obtained through the law of 
value. The value of each product is determined 
not by the labor time actually applied to it but 
by the socially necessary time for its production. 
With the modification that this law receives in 
capitalist production by profits we are not con- 
cerned because this would only unnecessarily 
complicate the analysis without bringing any 
new knowledge to the question. The socially 
necessary labor time in each branch of labor is 
determined on the one side bv the heisrht of its 
technique in any society and the customary ex- 
ertion of labor, etc., in short through the average 
productive power of the individual laborers; 
on the other side, however, by the number of 
products demanded by the social necessity of a 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 131 

particular branch of labor, and finally by the 
total number of labor powers at the disposal of 
society. Free competition sees to it to-day that 
the price of products, that is to say the amount 
of money that one can exchange for them, is con- 
tinually tending towards the value determined 
by the socially necessary labor time. In this 
manner the result is attained that the produc- 
tion in each department of labor, in spite of the 
fact that it is not regulated from any central 
point, never goes very far, or continues long 
away from the proper level. Without the law 
of value the anarchy that rules in the produc- 
tion for exchange would soon end in an inextric- 
able chaos. 

An example will make this plain. We will 
make it as simple as possible. As the sum of 
social production only two different forms of 
goods are necessary, so far as I am concerned — 
trousers and suspenders. 

Considering then that a society demands as 
the socially necessary labor within a definite 
time for the production of trousers 10,000 labor 
days and for suspenders 1,000, that is to say, 
this amount of labor is necessary in order to 
satisfy the social need for trousers and suspend- 
ers at the present stage of the productivity of 
labor. If the product of the labor day is worth 
one dollar, the value of the trousers will be 
$10,000 and of the suspenders $1,000. 

If the individual laborer deviates from the 
social form in his production and produces for 



132 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

example one-lialf as many products in a labor 
day as his colleagues, then, the price of his 
product for a day's labor would be only the half 
of that inhering to what was produced by the 
others in a day of labor. This is well known. 
This happens also if the proportionality of 
labor is abnormal, for example, if the manufac- 
turers of trousers attract more labor power to- 
day than is socially necessary this labor power 
must be taken away from other places so that 
the number of labor powers at the disposal of 
society in this line would be diminished. Take 
it in the simplest possible form, that they are 
all drawn away from the tailors. In place of the 
socially necessary time of 10,000 labor days 
here and the 1,000 there, we find only 8,000 
actual labor days here and 3,000 there. The 
\vorld is swamped with suspenders and we do 
not have enough trousers. What will be the 
result ? The price of suspenders sinks and that 
of trousers rise. The 3,000 actual salable 
labor days in the manufacture of suspenders 
will then represent only the value of the 1,000 
socially necessary and the value of the indi- 
vidual suspenders will sink to one-third of their 
former value. The prices will correspondingly 
sink below these one-third. The value of the 
trousers will, however, be determined as before 
by the socially necessary 10,000 and not by the 
actually supplied 8,000 labor days and as a re- 
sult the individual producers will be worth five- 
fourths of their previous price. As a result of 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 133 

this the manufacture of suspenders will be un- 
profitable and the number of labor powers de- 
voted to it will decrease and flow again to the 
manufacture of trousers which has become so 
extraordinarily profitable. 

It is in this manner that the law of value 
under free competition regulates production. 
It is not the best conceivable way to regulate 
production but it is the only one possible with 
private property in the means of production. 
With social property in the means of production 
we shall have instead social regulation of pro- 
duction and the necessity of regulating produc- 
tion by the exchange of equal values will cease. 
Therewith also will disappear the necessity of 
money as a measure of value. In place of me- 
tallic money we can easily have token money. 
The price of products themselves can now be 
determined independent of their value. Mean- 
while the amount of labor time embodied will 
always have an important bearing in determin- 
ing its value and it is probable that the inherited 
price would be approximated. 

While labor gives value and price to the 
product and labor must be paid with money 
there will be wages. In spite of this it would 
be false if one were to speak of a continuation 
of the present wage system as is done by many 
Fabians who say that the object of socialism is 
not to abolish the wage system but rather to 
make it universal. That is only superficially 
correct. As a matter of fact wages under the 



134 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTIOiq-. 

proletarian regime would be something wholly 
different from under capitalism. To-day it is 
the price of the commodity — ^labor power. This 
is determined in the last analysis by the cost of 
subsistence of the laborer, while its minor 
variations depend upon the operation of supply 
and demand. In a society ruled by the prole- 
tariat this would stop, as the laborer would no 
longer be compelled to sell his labor power. 
This labor power would cease to be a commodity 
whose price is determined by its cost of re-pro- 
duction, and its price would become independ- 
ent of the relation between supply and demand. 
That which to-day determines in the last 
analysis the height of wages is the number of 
products to be divided among the laboring class, 
the larger this number the higher can and will 
the general level of wages rise. All things con- 
sidered the proportioning of the wages of labor 
among the different branches of industry is 
largely influenced by supply and demand, and 
since the laborers cannot be assig-ned by military 
discipline and against their wishes to the vari- 
ous branches of industry, so it may happen that 
too many laborers rush into certain branches of 
industry while a lack of laborers is the rule in 
others. The necessary balance can then only be 
brought about by the reduction of wages where 
there are too many laborers and the raising of 
them in those branches of industry where there 
is a lack of laborers until the point is reached 
where every branch has as many laborers as it 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 135 

can use. But the relation between supply and 
demand has really no influence upon a universal 
levelling of the wages of the entire laboring 
class which is determined only by the amount of 
existing product. A universal decline in wages 
aa the result of over-production is impossible. 
The more there is produced the higher in gen- 
eral are the wages. 

]^ow the following question arises. If the 
continuous progress of production is to be se- 
cured it will then be necessary to hold the labor- 
ers to production by a universal raising of 
wages. Whence then shall this increase of 
wages be paid and whence shall come the neces- 
sary amount of product ? 

If we accept the most favorable conditions for 
the new regime, which we have not done, with 
all property confiscated, and with the total in- 
come of the capitalists flowing to the laborers, 
this in itself would give a very handsome rise 
in wages. I have pointed out in my writings on 
"Reform and Eevolution" the statistics of Eng- 
land in the year 1891 where the amount of the 
income of the laborers was seven hundred mil- 
lion pounds sterling and where the amount of the 
income of the capitalists was in the neighbor- 
hood of eight hundred million pounds sterling. 
I have further shown that these statistics in my 
opinion were painted too rosily. I have reason 
to believe that they calculate the wages too high 
and the capitalist income too low. If we take, 
however, these figures of 1891 they will show 



136 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION". 

that if the income of the capitalist was directed 
to the laborers wages would be doubled. But 
unfortunately things are not to be done so sim- 
ply. When we expropriate capital we must at 
the same time take over its social functions. 
The most important of these is the accumulation 
of capital. Capitalists do not consume their en- 
tire income. A portion they lay aside for the 
extension of production. A proletarian regime 
would be obliged to do the same since it too 
must extend production. Accordingly for this 
reason even the most radical confiscation of 
capital could not turn its entire previous in- 
come to the laboring class. Even from the sur- 
plus value that the capitalists pocket they must 
again give up a portion in the form of taxes to 
the State. This share would increase enorm- 
ously when the progressive income and property 
tax are the only forms of state and municipal 
taxation. And the burden of taxation would 
not diminish. I have pointed out above at what 
cost the re-arrangement of the school system 
alone could be brought about and besides this 
an old age insurance for all incapable of labor, 
etc., would be instituted. 

We shall see that there is none too much re- 
maining over from the present income of the 
capitalist to be applied to the raising of wages 
even if we confiscate capital at one stroke. 
There is even less if we wish to compensate the 
capitalist. It would then be absolutely neces- 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION". 137 

sary if we were to raise the wages of labor to 
raise production above its present amount. 

It will be one of the imperative tasks of the 
social revolution not simply to continue but to 
increase production. The victorious proletariat 
must extend production rapidly if it is to be 
able to satisfy the enormous demands that will 
be made upon the new regime. 

INCREASE 11^ PRODUCTIOIT. 

There are various means by which produc- 
tion can be increased. Two of the most im- 
portant of these have already attained great 
significance. Both have been applied with 
great results by the trusts of America from 
which verj' much can be learned concerning the 
methods of the social revolution. They show 
us how at a single stroke the productivity of 
labor can be increased simply by concentrating 
the total production in the most perfect indus- 
trial plants and throwing all those out of opera- 
tion which do not attain a definite standard. 
The Sugar Trust, for example, a few years ago 
consigned all but about one-fourth of the in- 
dustrial plants which it possessed to idleness 
and in this one-fourth it has produced as much 
as previously in the whole number. The 
whiskey trust also obtained eighty large dis- 
tilleries and, at once put out of operation sixty- 
eight out of the eighty. It is only operating 
twelve distilleries but in these twelve it produces 
even more than hitherto in the eighty. A prole- 



188 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

tarian regime could proceed in the same manner. 
It could do this even easier because it would 
not be hindered bj private property. Where 
individual industries are private property, the 
culling out of the inefficient by way of free com- 
petition is a very slow process. The trusts can 
only displace the less productive industries 
through the fact that they have destroyed 
private property in them by uniting all under 
one head. The method which the trusts can 
only apply to a relatively small sphere of pro- 
duction may be extended by a proletarian re- 
gime to the whole sphere of social production, 
since it will have totally abolished capitalistic 
private property. This method of increasing 
productivity by the culling out of inefficient in- 
dustries will not be distinguished from the sim- 
ilar operation by the trusts of to-day simply 
by the extent of the operation but also in that 
it will include other methods and other pur- 
poses. The new regime will carry out this 
change principally in order to increase wages. 
The Trust on the other hand goes its way with- 
out regard to the laborers. Those laborers who 
are rendered superfluous by reduction of surplus 
industries it simply discharges. It utilizes 
them mainly as a means of pressing do^vn the 
wages of the laborers who are at work and in 
increasing their dependence. Very naturally a 
victorious laboring class would proceed differ- 
ently. It would transfer the laborers rendered 
•su^'jei^uous by the closing of industries to other 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 139 

industries where their activity would continue. 
The trusts rather make the laborers superfluous 
because it is not their intention to perceptibly 
increase production. The greater the increase 
in the amount of products the greater the supply 
and the lower, under otherwise equal conditions, 
is the price. The trusts fight against all decline 
in prices. They would much rather limit pro- 
duction than extend it. When they produce 
only in the most efficient plants, this is done 
simply to reduce the cost of production and to 
increase profits, with the same or even an in- 
creased price, and not for the purpose of ex- 
tending production. A proletarian regime, 
however, would act for the purpose of extending 
production, for it does not desire to raise profits 
but rather wages. It also would increase the 
number of laborers in the best industrial plants 
and it would thereby increase production, be- 
cause in each plant more classes of laborers 
would work together. How possible this is and 
how much production will be influenced thereby 
I can explain by an example whose figures are 
taken wholly from the imagination and have no 
equivalent in reality but that nevertheless are 
not simply fantastic pictures but a real repre- 
sentation of things which find their counterpart 
in the trusts. Take, for example, the German 
textile industry which includes to-day a round 
million laborers (in 1895 993,257). Of these 
the great majority (in 1895 587,579) were oc- 
cupi<»d in plants which employed not more than 



140 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

50 laborers. We take it for granted that the 
larger and the more comprehensive plant is al- 
ways technically the more perfect. To be sure 
this is not true in all cases. It is possible that 
a factory with 20 laborers may be technically 
better organized than one in the same branch of 
industry with 80 laborers. But on an average 
the former statement would hold true and we 
can accept it all the more readily as we use it 
only as an example for the purpose of illustra- 
tion and not as a proposition. Let us take it 
for granted that the most imperfect factories 
are those employing less than 50 laborers. All 
these would be closed and the work in them 
transferred to those factories in which more 
than 50 laborers were employed. These could 
then be divided into two shifts working one 
after the other. If the hours of labor are ten 
to eleven a day now each shift could then have 
its hours reduced to eight. From that time on 
the industry would run daily six hours more 
and its machinery would be so much the better 
used, while at the same time the hours of labor 
for each laborer would be shortened by two 
hours. We can take it for granted that the 
production of each individual would not be de- 
creased thereby as we have had countless ex- 
amples showing that the advantages of the 
shortened labor time generally, at least, out- 
weigh the disadvantages. Considering that a 
laborer in the most imperfect industry to-day 
produces an amount of product which represents 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 141 

the value of 2,000 marks and that labor in the 
great industries is 100 per cent more produc- 
tive (Sinzheimer makes a similar estimate of 
the productivity of the large and small indus- 
tries) so that each laborer in a great industry 
would produce the value of 4,000 marks. The 
half million laborers in the small factories of 
the textile industries produce an amount of 
products having a value of a billion marks. The 
other half million laborers in the great indus- 
tries produce in the same time an amount of 
products valued at two billion marks. The mil- 
lion of laborers can produce a product of the 
value of three million marks. 

Under the new regime when the laborers 
were all concentrated in the great factories with 
more than fifty laborers, each laborer would 
produce to the value of 4,000 marks a year and 
the total production of the textile laborers 
would amount to four billion marks or one bil- 
lion more than they formerly produced. For 
the purpose of comparison we consider that 
values would still be produced. 

We can go still further and close not simply 
the small but the medium sized factories and 
concentrate the total textile production in the 
great factories employing more than 200 labor- 
ers. The total number of laborers employed in 
such factories in 1895 amounted to 350,306, or 
almost one-third of the total textile workers. 
Under these conditions it would be necessary to 
work the laborers in three shifts in order to em- 



142 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTIOIT. 

ploy all the laborers in the great factories alone 
and in order to avoid the night work while 
shortening the labor time of a day to five hours 
or half of the present time. To-day the laborer 
in the great industry produces perhaps four 
times as much as the one in the small industry, 
or according to our previous wholly arbitrary 
illustration about 8,000 marks a year. By the 
shortening of the labor time his product would 
not be reduced in equal degree because the bet- 
ter rested laborer wdll produce more than the 
over-worked one. We may accept the hy- 
pothesis that he could produce as much in eight 
hours as he to-day produces in ten. We would 
not be reckoning things too optimistically if we 
went further and considered that by shortening 
the labor time from eight to five hours the pro- 
duction of the laborer would not be lowered 
more than 25 per cent, certainly not as much as 
37 per cent. Accordingly each laborer would 
produce at least 5,000 perhaps 6,000 marks in 
each year, and all together would produce five to 
six billion. The total production would there- 
fore, as compared with the present, be doubled 
and the wages could be correspondingly doubled 
and this absolutely without any reference to 
confiscation of capital while at the same time 
the labor time would be reduced one-half. In- 
deed under certain conditions the increase of 
wages on the basis of the figures here given 
could be still greater. Let us assume that of the 
present yearly product of the textile industry, 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 143 

which we have called three billion, one billion 
is applied to wages and the second to the pur- 
chase of raw materials, machines, etc., and the 
third to the profit of capital. Now under the 
new regime six billion would be produced. Of 
this two would be applied to raw materials, 
machines and such like. One would serve for 
compensation to the expropriated capitalists 
and the completion of the previously mentioned 
social activity. This would leave three bil- 
lion for wages. This would permit a tripling 
of wages. And all this without any new plans 
or new machinery, but simply through the clos- 
ing of the little industries and transference of 
their laborers to the large ones. We simply 
need to do on a large scale what the trusts are 
doing on a small. It is only the private owner- 
ship of the means of production that hinders 
the development of modern production. 

This method develops still another side. Our 
critics are very ready to tell us that for a long 
time it will be impossible to socialize produc- 
tion because the number of existing productive 
establishments is much too great and it will 
take too long a time for competition to crush out 
all the little industries and therewith create a 
possibility of socialist production. If the num- 
ber of all the industrial plants in the German 
empire amounts to 2i million and those of the 
textile alone to over 200,000, how could one 
possibly manage such a number of industries 
nationally ? 



144 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

Certainly the task appears alarming but it 
is very much reduced when we consider that 
the proletarian regime will apply the methods 
of the trust, and while it will expropriate all 
the industries at once, only the best equipped 
large industries will be further operated. Of 
the 200,000 textile industries there are only 
3,000 which employ more than 50 workingmen. 
It is clear that the concentration of industry in 
these latter plants would very much simplify 
the task of the social regulation of production. 
It will be still simpler when we consider that 
the new regime will have closed up all plants 
employing less than 200 laborers. Of the 200,- 
000 there would then only remain 800. To 
control and supervise this number of industries 
is certainly no longer an impossibility. 

Here again there is another significant point 
of view. Our opponents and the pessimists in 
our own ranks measure the ripeness of our pres- 
ent society for social production by the number 
of ruins which are still strewn round it and of 
which it is still incapable of ridding itself. 
Over and over again the great number of little 
industries that still exist is triumphantly 
pointed out. But the ripeness for Socialism does 
not depend on the number of little industries 
that yet remain, but upon the number of great 
industries which already exist. Without a de- 
veloped great industry socialism is impossible. 
Where, however, a great industry exists to a 
considerable degree it is easy for a socialist so- 



THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTIOIS^. 145 

ciety to concentrate production and to quickly 
rid itself of the little industry. The socialist 
birds of ill omen, that simply know enough to 
announce the coming of ill luck by their warn- 
ing croaks, continuously raise an obstinate 
clamor about the fact that the number of little 
industries in the German empire has increased 
li per cent from 1882 to 1895. But they are 
blind to the fact that in the same period the 
number of large industries with more than fifty 
employes increased about 90 per cent, while the 
gigantic industries employing over 1,000 per- 
sons increased in the neighborhood of 100 per 
cent. It is this increase that is the preliminary 
condition of socialism and this is richly ful- 
filled. Even if the small industry does not ab- 
solutely decrease, that simply shows that the 
number of ruins which the proletarian regime 
will have to sweep away is still considerable. 
Meanwhile the trusts promise to greatly assist 
us in this respect. 

In other directions also they offer us a fore- 
cast. The present trusts increase their profits 
not merely through increasing the productivity 
of their employes but also by economies of dif- 
ferent forms. Socialist production must make 
use of these same methods in still higher de- 
gree. Among these economies are those relat- 
ing to machinery, by products and cost of trans- 
portation. Taking an example from the textile 
industry, which demands a wholly different ex- 
penditure to transport the raw material and ac- 



146 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION". 

cessories to production for 200,000 than for 
800,000 industrial plants. The same is the 
case with the cost of the supervision of indus- 
tries. Of the 200,000 industries, the smallest 
to be sure demands practically no supervision. 
In this class are those with less than five labor- 
ers. Here the manager is also a worker. Over 
12,000 exceed this limit. But their super- 
vision also demands considerably more directive 
power than those of 800. Other savings are at- 
tained in that the trusts abolish the struggle of 
competing industries for markets. Since their 
appearance in the United States the number of 
commercial travelers employed has decreased. 
One of the most striking of these cases is in- 
stanced by J. W. Jenks in his treatise concern- 
ing the trust. The extension of production has 
so increased that the number of unskilled labor- 
ers employed in these plants have increased 51 
per cent and of the skilled 14 per cent. At the 
same time the number of commercial travelers 
has decreased 75 per cent. Jenks also states 
that many trusts have, according to their own 
statements, saved from 40 to 85 per cent of their 
advertising expenses. 

Finally the raising of wages in industry 
would set free a large number of labor powers 
whose existence to-day is merely parasitic. They 
maintain a wretched existence to-day in theii? 
little shops, not because these shops are a neces- 
sity but because their possessors are in despair 
of finding their bread in any other place or be- 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 147 

cause they cannot earn enough by wage labor 
and seek a supplementary occupation. 

Of the almost two million people who are oc- 
cupied to-day in the German Empire in trade 
and commerce (exclusive of the post office and 
railroads) and hotel keeping perhaps a million 
would, with a sufficiently high wage in in- 
dustry and sufficient demand for labor powers, 
be transferred from parasitic to productive 
activity. . 

These are the two methods for increasing the 
productive powers of the laboring class: The 
abolition of parasitic industry and the concen- 
tration of industries in the most perfect plants. 
By the application of these two means a prole- 
tarian regime can raise production at once to 
so high a level that it would be possible to con- 
siderably increase wages and simultaneously 
reduce the hours of labor. Every increase in 
wages and reduction of hours must again in- 
crease the attractiveness of labor and draw new 
laborers to production who were formerly para- 
sitic, such for example as servants, small 
luerchants, etc. The higher the wages the more 
laborers. But in a socialist society one can 
transform this saying into "the more workers 
the fewer the illdoers in society, the more pro- 
duced and the greater the wages.'^ This law 
wovild be absurd in a society of free competition 
wlr '^re the greater the supply of laborers, under 
of rwise equal conditions, the lower the de- 



148 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

scent of wages. It is a law of wages for the 
socialist system of production. 

THE ORGANIZATION OF THE PRODUCTIVE 
PROCESS. 

The application of the two above mentioned 
methods of the trust to production have not ex- 
hausted the resources of the proletarian regime 
in relation to the increase of production. The 
productive process considered as a continuous 
transaction, as a reproductive process demands 
an undisturbed continuation, not simply of pro- 
duction, but also of circulation. If production 
is to go on without interruption it is necessary 
not simply that there be laborers for the crea- 
tion of products, but it is also necessary that 
there be no break in the securing of raw ma- 
terials and essentials of production, the neces- 
sary tools and machines, and the means of sus- 
tenance for the laborers, and that no interrup- 
tion occur and that the finished product find a 
sale. 

A stoppage in circulation signifies an 
economic crisis. It stops in some cases because 
too much is produced of some wares. In this 
case the industrial plants from which these 
products came cannot further function in their 
full capacity because of the lack of sale for their 
products. They receive no money for their 
products and the result of this is they lack the 
means to buy raw materials, to pay wages and 
so forth. 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTIOI^. 149 

IBut crises can also occur because too little of 
many of certain wares have been produced, as 
for instance was the case in the crisis of the 
English cotton industry at the time of the w^ar 
of the Rebellion in the United States, which 
for some time greatly disturbed the production 
of cotton. 

The crises are the worst scourges of the 
modern productive system. To abolish them is 
one of the most important tasks of a proletarian 
regime. This can be done only through the 
systematic regulation of production and circula- 
tion as well as of re-production. 

It has already been admitted that the object 
of socialism is the organization of production. 
But a portion of this problem is already solved 
by capital in that it substitutes for a number of 
little independent industries the organization 
of production into one great industry in which 
thousands of laborers are employed. The trusts 
have already accomplished the organization of 
whole branches of industry. 

What, however, only a proletarian regime can 
accomplish is the systematic regulation and 
circulation of products, the exchange between 
industry and industry, between producers and 
consumers, in which the idea of consumption is 
taken in its highest sense, so as to include not 
simply personal but productive consumption. 
The weaver for example consumes yarn in pro- 
ductive consumption while the piece of bread 
that he eats is included in personal consumption. 



150 THE SOCIAL EEVOL¥TIOX. 

The proletarian can only accomplish this 
regulation of the circulation of products bj the 
abolition of private property in industry, and 
it not only can do this but it must do it if 
the process of production is to proceed under 
its direction and its regime is to be permanent. 
It must fix the height of production of each in- 
dividual social productive plant according to 
the basis calculated upon the existing produc- 
tive power (laborers and means of production) 
and of the existing needs, and see to it that each 
productive plant has not only the necessary 
laborers but also the necessary means of produc- 
tion and that the necessary products are de- 
livered to the consumers. 

Is not this task however insoluble in the great 
modern States ? It would presuppose that in 
Germany the State is to become the director of 
production of two million productive plants and 
to act as medium for the circulation of this 
product, which will come to it partially in the 
form of means of production and partially as 
means of consumption to be distributed to sixty 
million consumers, of which each one has a 
special and changing need. The task appears 
overwhelming if one does not proceed from the 
point of view of regulating the necessities of 
humanity from above according to a very simple 
pattern and assigning to each one, barrack 
fashion, his portion, which would mean the 
lowering of modem civilization to a much lower 



THE SOCIAL BE VOLUTION. 151 

stage. Are we destined then to come to a bar- 
rack or prison-like State ? 

Certainly the problem is not simple. It is 
the most difficulty which will come to the prole- 
tarian regime and will furnish it with many 
hard nuts to crack. But its difficulties must 
not be exaggerated. 

In the first place it must be remembered that 
we are not compelled to create out of nothing 
over night a complete organization of produc- 
tion and circulation. There is one existing 
at present of a certain character, or otherwise 
the existence of the present society would be 
impossible. The question is simply to trans- 
form this organization, which has hitherto been 
an unconscious one going on behind the should- 
ers of those engaged in it with friction, sorrow 
and woe, bankruptcies and crises, under the 
operation of the law of value, ever being re- 
adjusted, into a conscious system in which a 
previous calculation of all modifying factors 
will take the place of the retroactive corrections 
through the play of supply and demand. There 
is a proportionality between the different 
branches of labor to-day even though it is wholly 
incomplete and incompetent; it is necessary, 
not to introduce, but rather to make complete 
and permanent. As with money and with 
prices it is necessary to connect with that which 
is historically descended and not to build every- 
thing from the ground anew; but only to 
broaden out at some points or to restrict others 



152 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

and to formulate more clearly the loose rela- 
tions. 

This problem is considerably restricted by 
the fact already discussed that the concentration 
of production in the most perfect productive 
plants has already perceptibly decreased the 
number of industries. Of the 2,146,972 busi- 
nesses which constituted the industry of the 
German Empire in 1895 there were only 17,941 
great businesses having more than 50 laborers 
(and these contained three million laborers out 
of the total number of eight million industrial 
workers). To be sure I do not assert that only 
these great industries will be retained in ac- 
tivity. To attempt to give absolutely exact 
figures of a future condition would be absurd. 
All the numbers herewith printed have simply 
the piT^rpose of illustrating the problems which 
arise and not of narrowly setting forth how 
things will be formulated in reality. The rela- 
tion of two million industrial plants to 18,000 
great industries shows that the number of in- 
dustrial plants would be perceptibly decreased 
under a proletarian regime. 

But the difficulties of the organization of 
production and circulation can be diminished 
in other directions as well as by a decrease in 
the number of plants. Production can be di- 
vided into two great fields ; those in which the 
production is for consumption and those in 
which production is for production. The pro- 
duction of means of production, thanks to the 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 153 

extensive division of labor, has become to-daj 
the most important portion of production and it 
continues to increase steadily. Scarcely a single 
article of consumption comes from the hand of 
a single producer, but all run through a number 
of productive processes so that those who finally 
fit it for our use are only the last in a long row 
of producers. The production of articles for 
consumption and for the means of production 
have a wholly different character. The produc- 
tion for further production belongs to the 
domain of gigantic industries such as the iron 
industry, mining, etc. These are all highly or- 
ganized in owner's agreements, cartels, etc. But 
even among the users of these means of produc- 
tion, operator's agreements are already very 
extensive. In most cases in this field to-day the 
individual operator does not deal with indi- 
vidual operators, but union of operators with 
union of operators, industrial branch deals with 
industrial branch, and those places where the 
union of operators is least developed are just 
the regions in which there are relatively few 
producers and few consumers dealing with each 
other. For consumption is here not by an in- 
dividual but by a whole industry. In the manu- 
facture of spinning and weaving machines, for 
example, there were in 1895 1,152 businesses 
with 17,047 laborers. Of these, however, there 
were 774 industries which had only 1,474 
laborers and were scarcely to be considered. 
Among the great industries there were only 73 



164 THE SOCIAI. REVOLUTION". 

with 10,755 laborers. Opposed to these were 
200,000 textile industries (not simply spinners 
and weavers) whose numbers, as we have seen, 
may be reduced to a thousand or perhaps to a 
laundred. On the one side there remained after 
the completion of the concentration of produce 
tion in the most perfect industries perhaps 50 
manufacturers of machinery and on the other 
side 2,000 spinning and weaving establish- 
ments. Is it then so impossible that the former 
should agree with the latter in regard to the 
demand for machines, and that their production 
should be systematically regulated ? 

With this relatively small number of pur- 
chasers and consumers it is easily conceivable 
that in the sphere of the production of the 
means of production to-day, production for the 
open market has already disappeared and pro* 
duction for orders, that is to say, regulated^ 
thoughtful production and circulation has taken 
its place. 

The production of articles for consumption 
has another character. To be sure we have 
here the gigantic industries (sugar factories 
and breweries), but as a general thing the little 
industry is still generally dominant. Here it 
is necessary to satisfy the individual needs of 
the market, and the small industry can do 
this better than the large. The number of pro- 
ductive plants is here large and would not ordi' 
narily be capable of reduction as in the produc 
tion of means of production. Here also pre 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION". 155 

duction for the open market still rules. But 
because of the greater number of consumers 
this is much more difficult to supervise than is 
production for j)roduction. The number of 
oj^erators' agreements is fewer here. The or- 
ganization of the production and circulation of 
all articles of consumption accordingly offers 
much greater difficulties than that of the means 
of production. 

Here also we must again distinguish the two 
forms, namely : the production of necessary ar- 
ticles of consumption, and of luxuries. The 
demand for necessary articles of consumption 
ordinarily shows rather small fluctuations. It 
is quite definite. Day in and day out one needs 
the same amount of flour, bread, meat and 
vegetables. Year in and year out there is lit- 
tle change in the demand for boots and linen. 
On the other hand, the demand for means of 
consumption changes the more readily the more 
these take on the character of unnecessary luxu- 
ries, whose possession or use is agreeable but 
not indispensable. Here consumption is much 
more whimsical, but when we look closer we 
see that this really proceeds much less from the 
purchasing individual than from the industr;y 
itself. Changes in fashion, for example, spring 
not so much from the changes in taste of the 
public as from the necessity of the producer to 
render impossible of further use the old wares 
which have already been sold, in order to 
thereby appeal to consumers to purchase new 



156 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

wares. The new and modern goods must ac- 
cordingly be very strikingly distinguished from 
the old. Next to the restlessness which lies in 
the very nature of the modern manner of pro- 
duction, this strife of the producer is the main 
cause of the rapid changes of fashion. It is 
this which first produces the new fashions and 
then makes them necessary to the public. 

The variations in demand for articles of con- 
sumption, especially of luxuries, are influenced 
much more by the variations in the income of 
the consumers than by variations in taste. 
These last variations again, so far as they do 
not remain isolated but really have a wide ex- 
tension through society, so as to percapribly 
influence consumption, arise from the contrast 
between prosperity and crises, from the contrast 
between the strong demand for labor and the 
increase of enforced idleness. When, however, 
we investigate the source of these variations 
we find that they spring from the field of the 
production of the means of production. It is 
universally known and recognized that to-day 
it is the iron industry especially which gives 
rise to crises. 

The alternation between prosperity and crises 
and therewith the great variations in the de- 
mand for articles of consumption also arises 
out of the sphere of the production of the means 
of production. In the other sphere, as we have 
already seen, the concentration of industry and 
the organization of production is already so far 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 157 

developed that it has made possible a really 
complete organization of production and circu- 
lation. Stability in the production of means 
of production carries with it stability in de- 
mand for means of consumption, and this can 
be easily established by the State without direct 
regulation of consumption. 

Only one phase of the disturbances in circula- 
tion which spring from production is of im- 
portance to the proletarian regime, — only un- 
der-production, never over-production. To-day 
the latter is the principal cause of crises, for 
the greatest difficulty at present is the sale, or 
getting rid of the product. The purchase of 
goods, the procuring of the products that one 
needs, ordinarily causes very little complaint 
from those lucky ones who have the necessary 
small change in their pockets. Under prole- 
tarian regime this relation would be reversed. 
There will be no need of anxiety regarding the 
disposal of the products when completed. Pri- 
vate individuals will not be purchasing for sale 
to other private individuals, but society will be- 
purchasing for its own necessities. A crisis 
can then only arise when a sufficient amount 
of a number of products has not been produced 
to supply the need either for production or per- 
sonal consumption. If accordingly there are 
here and there, or even anywhere, too much 
produced this will signify only a wasting of 
labor power and a loss for society, but will not 
hinder the progress of production and consump- 



158 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

tion. It will be the principal anxiety of the 
new regime to see to it that there is not in- 
sufficient production in any sphere. Accord- 
ingly it willj to be sure, also take care that no 
labor power is wasted in superfluous production, 
for every such waste signifies an abstraction 
from all the others and an unnecessary exten- 
sion of the labor time. 

THE REMNANTS OF PRIVATE PROPERTY IN THE 
MEANS OF PRODUCTION. 

We have seen that the proletarian regime 
would make short work of the smaller businesses 
where they represent the little, undeveloped 
plants, not only in industry but also in ex- 
change. 

The efforts referred to above for the organ- 
ization of circulation would also lead to the 
greatest possible abolition of the little middle- 
men by crushing them out, partially through 
co-operatives for consumption, partly through 
extension of municipal activity. Superin- 
tendence and organization of the productive 
processes will be much easier when it is not 
necessary to deal with countless operators, but 
rather with only a few organizations. 

Besides the work of the middle-men the di- 
rect producers of articles of consumption for 
local necessity would fall to the co-operatives 
and municipalities — for example, bakeries, rnilk 
and vegetable production and erection of bnild- 
insrs. 



THE SOCIAL BEVOLUTION. 169 

But it is not to be expected that all small 
private industries will disappear in this man- 
ner. This will be specially true in agriculture. 
To be sure those agricultural plants which have 
already become capitalist industries would fall 
with the wage system and be transformed into 
national, municipal or co-operative businesses. 
Therewith a large number of the little compet- 
ing farmers of to-day would cease to exist and 
go as laborers into the industrial or agricultural 
great industry, because they could there secure 
a respectable existence. But we may be sure 
that some farmers would always remain with 
their own family, or at the most with one as- 
sistant, or maid that will be reckoned as part 
of the family, and would continue their little 
industry. With the present conservative na- 
ture of our farmers it is highly probable that 
a number of them would continue to work in 
the present manner. The proletarian govern- 
mental power would have absolutely no inclina- 
tion to take over such little businesses. As yet 
no socialist who is to be taken seriously has 
ever demanded that the farmers should be ex- 
appropriated, or that their goods should be con- 
fiscated. It is much more probable that each 
little farmer would be permitted to work on as 
he has previously done. The farmer has noth- 
ing to fear from a socialist regime. 

Indeed it is highly probable that these agri- 
cultural industries would receive considerable 
strengthening through the new regime. It 



160 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

would bring an abolition of militarism, of bur- 
dens of taxation, bring self-government and na- 
tionalism of schools and road taxes, an abolition 
of poor relief and perhaps also a lowering of 
mortgage burdens, and many other advantages. 
We have also seen that the victorious prole- 
tariat has every reason to increase the amount 
of products, and among those products for 
which the demand would be increased, the most 
important are agricultural products. In spite 
of all the refutation of the theory of increasing 
misery there is still much hunger to satisfy, and 
this fact alone justifies us in the opinion that 
the raising of wages would show itself above 
all in an increase of the demand for agricultural 
products. The proletarian regime would also 
have the greatest interest in increasing the pro- 
duction of the farmers and it would have power- 
ful forces at its disposal for this purpose. Its 
own interests demand that the agricultural 
industry should be brought to a higher stage 
through the care of animals, machines and fer- 
tilizers, through improvement of the soil, etc. 
It would in this manner assist in increasing 
agricultural products, including those in the 
industries not yet socialized. 

But here, as well as in every sphere, condi- 
tions would make it necessary to simplify the 
circulation process by substituting for a large 
number of private individuals trading their 
products with one another a few organizations 
united for economic purposes. The State 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 16\ 

would much prefer instead of selling breeding 
animals, machines and fertilizers to the indi- 
vidual farmers to deal with the farmers' so- 
cieties and co-operatives. These societies and 
co-operatives would find as the purchasers of 
their products no longer private middle-men, 
but either co-operatives, unions for consump- 
tion, municipalities or national industries 
(mills, sugar factories, breweries and such 
like). So here also the private industry would 
continually recede before the social, and the 
latter would finally transform the agricultural 
industry itself and permit the development of 
many such industries through the co-operative 
or municipal co-operative into one great social 
industry. The farmers will combine their 
possessions and operate them in common, es- 
pecially when they see how the social operation 
of the expropriated great industry proves that 
with the same expenditure of labor perceptibly 
more can be produced, or that with the same 
number of products the laborers can be granted 
considerably more leisure than is possible in the 
small industry. If the small industry is still 
able to assert itself in agriculture this is due 
not a little to the fact that it can pump more 
labor out of its laborers than the great indus- 
try. It is undeniable that farmers work harder 
than the wage workers of the great land owners. 
The farmer has scarcely any free time, and 
even during the little free time that he has he 
must be continually studying how he can im- 



162 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 

prove his business. There is nothing else in 
his life but his business, and that is also one 
of the reasons why he is so hard for us to gain. 

But this holds true only for the older genera- 
tion; the younger generation is conscious of 
other things. They feel a strong impulse to- 
wards enjoyments and pleasures, towards joy, 
and also towards a higher culture, and because 
they cannot satisfy these impulses in the coun- 
try they stream into the cities and populate the 
level plains. When once the farmer sees, how- 
ever, that he can remain in agriculture without 
being compelled to renounce leisure and culture 
he will no longer flee from agriculture, but will 
simply move from the little industry to the 
great and therewith the last fortress of private 
property will disappear. 

But the victorious proletariat will not con- 
sider a violent hastening of this development, 
and this for the very good reason that it does 
not feel itself called upon to get its head cracked 
without any necessity. And this has been the 
result of every attempt to force the farmers to 
a new stage of production. However high may 
be my estimate of the belligerency and fearless- 
ness of the proletariat, its struggle is not di- 
rected against the little people that are them- 
selves exploited, but against the great ex- 
ploiters. 

Along with agriculture the small industry in 
business comes into consideration. This also 
need not completely disappear at once. To be 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 163 

sure the new regime, as we have already seen, 
would, whenever poorly organized industry 
came in competition with the more perfect, 
strive to concentrate production in the well di- 
rected great industries. This could be easily 
attained, however, without the application of 
force by the simple raising of wages. But there 
will always be branches of industry in which 
the machine cannot compete successfully with 
hand labor, or, cannot accomplish what the lat- 
ter can accomplish. It is highly significant 
that an investigation of the factory statistics of 
the German empire did not yield a single form 
of production in which the small industry still 
exclusively rules, with one insignificant excep- 
tion (four plants each with one laborer). A few 
figures that, so far as I know, have never yet 
been published are here given. In the follow- 
ing branches of industry the small business 
rules almost exclusively, more than 97 per cent 
of all industries, while the great business with 
more than fifty laborers does not exist at all : 

Number of Factories 

With 
1 to 5 6 to 50 No. of 
Work- Work- Mo- 
ers. era. tors. 

Makers of whetstones 77 2 52 

Makers of violins 1,037 24 5 

Preparation of anatomical 

material 126 3 

Scavengers 971 2 11 



164 THE SOCIAI. REVOLUTION. 



Number of Factories 
With 
1 to 5 6 to 50 No. ot 
Work- Work- Mo- 
ers. ers. tors. 



Spinners (materials not giv- 
en) 275 3 2 

Weavers (materials not giv- 
en) 608 6 5 

Rubber toys 4 

Barbers, hairdressers, wig- 
makers 60,035 470 e 

Cleaners of clothes and boot- 
blacks 744 4 7 

Chimneysweeps 3,860 26 

Sculptors and painters 5,630 84 2 

If we exclude painters, barbers, chimney- 
sweeps, violin makers and, according to my 
opinion, also scavengers and bootblacks, this re- 
duces the field of existing small businesses, in 
industries which are outride the field of compe- 
tition of great industries, to practically nil. 

iN'evertheless it may be granted that the small 
industry will have a definite position in the 
future in many branches of industry that pro- 
duce directly for human consumption, for the 
machines manufacture essentially only products 
in bulk, while many purchasers desire that their 
personal taste shall be considered. It is easily 
possible that even under a proletarian regime 
the number of small businesses may increase as 
the well being of the masses increases. The 
demand for products of hand labor as a result 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 165 

of this may become active. Artistic hand work 
may accordingly receive a new impulse. How^- 
ever, we need not expect the realization of the 
picture of the future that William Morris has 
painted for us in his beautiful Utopia, in which 
the machine plays no role whatever. The ma- 
chine will remain the ruler of the productive 
process. It will never give up this position 
again to hand labor. This, however, does not 
exclude the possibility that hand work in many 
artistic branches will again flourish and that it 
will even conquer many new fields. Meanwhile 
it to-day too often maintains its existence only 
as the product of extreme misery. As a house 
industry hand work in a socialist society can 
only exist as an expensive luxury which may 
in a universal well being find an extensive dis- 
tribution. The foundation of the productive 
process will still remain the machine-driven 
great industry. The problematical small in- 
dustries will at the most be maintained as isl- 
ands in the ocean of the great social businesses. 
These little industries, again, can take on 
the most various forms in regard to the owner- 
ship of their means of production and the dis- 
posal of their products. They may be depend- 
ent upon a great national or municipal indus- 
try, from which they receive their raw material 
and tools and to which they dispose of their 
products. They can produce for private cus- 
tomers, or for the open market, etc. As to-day, 
so then, a laborer can occupy himself in the most 



166 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

diverse occupations one after another. A seam- 
stress, for example, can occupy herself for a 
time in a national factory, and at another time 
make dresses for private customers at home, 
then again can sew for another customer in her 
own house, and finally she may, with a few 
comrades, unite in a co-operative for the manu- 
facture of clothing for sale. 

In this, as in every other relation, the great- 
est diversity and possibility of change will rule. 
Nothing is more false than to represent the so- 
cialist society as a simple, rigid mechanism 
whose wheels when once set in motion run on 
continuously in the same manner. 

The most manifold forms of property in the 
means of production — national, municipal, co- 
operatives of consumption and production, and 
private can exist beside each other in a socialist 
society — the most diverse forms of industrial 
organization, bureaucratic, trades union, co- 
operative and individual; the most diverse 
forms of remuneration of labor, fixed wages, 
time wages, piece wages, participation in the 
economics in raw material, machinery, etc., par- 
ticipation in the results of intensive labor ; the 
most diverse forms of circulation of products, 
like contract by purchase from the warehouses 
of the State, from municipalities, from co-oper- 
atives of production, from producers them- 
selves, etc., etc. The same manifold character 
of economic mechanism that exists to-day is 
possible in a socialistic society. Only the hunt- 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 167 

ing and the hunted, the struggling and resisting, 
the annihilated and being annihilated of the 
present competitive struggle are excluded and 
therewith the contrast between exploiter and 
exploited. 

INTELLECTUAL PRODUCTION. 

So much for the most important economic 
problems that arise from the political victory of 
the proletariat and the means to their solution. 
It would be very alluring in this connection to 
follow these conditions further, to investigate 
the problems which housing and international 
commerce, the relations of city and country, 
etc., carry with them, all of which will be deeply 
touched by the domination of the proletariat 
and cannot continue in their present manner. 
But I must turn from the discussion of these 
themes at this point because I have said else- 
where the most essential things that I have to 
say upon them (the position of a socialist com- 
munity in relation to colonies and world's com- 
merce I have discussed in my preface to ^'Atlan- 
ticus, A View of the Future State,'' p. XIX, 
and "The Future of the Individual Home," in 
my Agrarfrage, p. 447, etc.). I wish to discuss 
only one point in this connection about which 
much indefiniteness exists — the future of intel- 
lectual production. 

We have here hitherto only investigated the 
problem of material production which is most 
fundamental. But upon this basis there arises 



168 THE SOCIAL EE VOLUTION. 

a production of artistic works, scientific investi- 
gation and literary activities of various forms. 
The continuation of this production is no less 
necessary for modern civilization than the un- 
disturbed continuance of the production of 
bread and meat, coal and iron. A proletarian 
revolution, however, renders its continuance iii 
the former manner impossible. What has it to 
substitute therefor ? That no reasonable man 
to-day fears that the victorious proletariat will 
cause a return to the old condition of barbarism 
or that it will fling art and science and superflu- 
ous rubbish into the lumber room, but that on 
the contrary it is just among those broad popu- 
lar sections of the proletariat that the most in- 
terest and the highest regard for art and sci- 
ence is to be found, I have already shown in my 
essay concerning "Reform and Revolution." 
But my whole inquiry is not so much in the 
nature of an investigation into what the victo- 
rious proletariat might do as to what by virtue 
of the power of logic and facts it can and must 
do. 

There will be no lack of the necessary mate- 
rial objects for art and science. We have al- 
ready seen that it is one of the strong points of 
the proletarian regime that through the aboli- 
tion of private property in the means of pro- 
duction the possibility will be created of wiping 
out in the quickest possible manner the ruins 
of the outgrown means and methods of produc- 
tion which to-day prevent the unfolding of the 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTIOK^. 169 

modern productive powers and which beneath 
the present dominion of private property can 
only be slowly and incompletely swept out of 
the road by com^petition. The wealth of society 
must thereby at once attain a level far above 
that inherited from capitalist society. 

But material objects alone are not sufficient 
to secure this elevation. Wealth alone does not 
give rise to a great ideal life. The question is 
whether the conditions of production of mate- 
rial goods in socialist society are consistent with 
the necessary conditions of a highly developed 
intellectual production. This is strongly de- 
nied by our opponents. 

Let us next examine some forms of existing 
intellectual production. It takes on three 
forms : production through organs of society for 
direct satisfaction of social needs; then, the 
production of goods in individual industries, 
and finally the production of goods under capi- 
talist industry. 

To the first form of intellectual production 
belongs the whole system of education from 
kindergartens to universities. If we disregard 
the insignificant private schools, this is to-day 
almost wholly in the hands of society and is con- 
ducted by the State not for the purpose of mak- 
ing profits or on account of gain. This holds 
above all of the modern national and municipal 
schools, but also of those which are mainly ruins 
descended from the Middle Ages, but which 
still exist under clerical organization and com- 



170 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

munity support, and which are especially prom- 
inent in the land of Anglo-Saxon culture. 

This social educational system is of the high- 
est significance for the intellectual life, espe- 
cially for the scientific, and this is not simply 
through its influence upon the growing youth. 
It controls ever more and more scientific in- 
vestigation in that its teachers, especially in 
the high schools, have more and more a 
monopoly of scientific apparatus without which 
scientific investigation is to-day almost impos- 
sible. This is especially true in the field of the 
natural sciences whose technique has become so 
highly developed that, aside from a few million- 
aires, the State alone is able to supply the means 
demanded for the establishment and mainte- 
nance of the necessary scientific apparatus. 
But in many branches of social science, 
ethnology and archaeology and others, the 
scientific apparatus of investigation has become 
«ver more comprehensive and expensive. Be- 
cause of this, science becomes ever more and 
more an unremunerative occupation, by which a 
man cannot live and to which only those people 
can devote themselves who are paid by the State 
unless they have been very fortunate in the 
choice of their parents — or of their wives. At- 
tainment of the necessary preliminary knowl- 
edge for productive scientific activity demands 
again a great and ever increasing amount of 
monev. So it is that science is more and more 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 



171 



monopolized by the governmental powers and 
the possessing classes. 

At the very least a proletarian regime can 
•abolish the conditions which hamper scientific 
activity at present. It must formulate its edu- 
cational system, as was previously pointed out, 
so that each genius will have within his reach 
all the knowledge that the social educational 
system has at its disposal. It will increase 
enormously the demand for educated people, 
and therewith also for the power of scientific 
investigation. Finally it will operate through 
the abolition of class antagonisms to make the 
investigators in the sphere of social science, 
where employed by the State, internally and 
externally free. So long as there are class an- 
tagonisms there will be very different stand- 
points from which society will be observed. 
There is no greater hypocrisy or self-deception 
than the talk about an existing science which 
is above class antagonisms. Science exists only 
in the heads of investigators and these are the 
products of society and cannot get out of it or 
reach above it. Even in a socialist society sci- 
ence will be dependent upon social conditions, 
but these will then at least be uniform and not 
antagonistic. 

Even worse than the internal dependence 
upon social conditions, from which no in- 
vestigator can free himself, is the external de- 
pendence of many of those from governmentnl 
"isr other dominating institutions, for example. 



172 THE SOCIAL BEVOLUTION. 

clerical. These compel the intellectual work- 
ers to direct their views according to those of 
the governing classes and will not permit them 
to investigate freely and independently, and it 
compels them to seek in a scientific manner for 
argmnents that will justify the existing order 
and repel the aspiring classes. So the class 
dominion operates directly to demoralize sci- 
ence. The intellectual workers will have every 
reason to breathe freer when the proletarian 
regime sweeps away the direct and indirect 
dominion of the class of capitalists and land 
owTiers. The intellectual life so far as it is 
connected with education has nothing to fear 
and everything to hope from the victory of the 
proletariat. 

How is it, then, with the production of in- 
tellectual commodities ? In this connection we 
will first study individual production. Here 
painting and sculpture come most prominently 
into consideration, together with a portion of 
literary writing. 

A proletarian regime will no more make this 
form of commodity production impossible, than 
it will abolish the little private industry in ma- 
terial production. Just as little as the needle 
and thimble, will brush and palette, or ink and 
pen belong to those means of production which 
must under all conditions be socialized. But 
one thing is well possible and that is that with 
the cessation of capitalist exploitation the num- 
ber of purchasers that heretofore constituted 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 173 

the market for the commodities produced by the 
little artistic industry will be reduced. This 
will certainly not be without influence on the 
articles of artistic production. It will not 
abolish such production but only alter its char- 
acter. The easel painting and statuettes which 
can most easily change their places and pos- 
sessors, that can be placed wherever we wish, 
are the special form of commodity production 
in art. They include those forms of artistic 
work that can easiest take the form of commodi- 
ties, which, like jewelry, can be accumulated 
and stored either for the purpose of re-selling at 
a profit or to hoard as treasures. It is pos- 
sible that their production for the purposes of 
sale will find many obstacles in a socialist so- 
ciety. But in place of these, other forms of 
artistic production will appear. 

A proletarian regime will immensely in- 
crease the number of public buildings. It will 
endeavor to make attractive every place occu- 
pied by the people, whether for labor, for con- 
sultation, or for pleasure. Instead of accumu- 
lating statuettes and pictures that will be 
thrown into a great impersonal market from 
whence they finally find a place utterly un- 
known to the artist and are used for wholly 
unthought of purposes, the artist will work to- 
gether with the architect as was the case in the 
Golden Age of art in Athens under Pericles and 
in the Italian Renaissance. One art will sup- 
port and raise the other and artistic labor will 



174 THE SOCIAL EE VOLUTION. 

have a definite social aim so that its products, 
its surroundings and its public will not be de- 
pendent on chance. 

On the other side the necessity to produce 
artistic works for sale as commodities will 
cease. Above all there will no longer be need 
to offer individual labor for profit or as wage 
labor, or for the production of commodities. 

I have already pointed out that a proletarian 
regime would endeavor, as is perfectly evident 
from the standpoint of the wageworker, to 
shorten the labor time and raise the wages. I 
have also shown to how high a degree this can 
be done, particularly in the line of highly de- 
veloped capitalist production, simply through 
the concentration of industry in the most per- 
feet centers of production and through the most 
perfect utilization of these most perfect indus- 
tries. It is by no means fantastic to conclude 
that a doubling of the wages and a reduction of 
labor time to half of the present one is possible 
at once^ and technical science is already suf- 
ficiently advanced to expect rapid progress in 
this field. The further one goes in this direc- 
tion the more the possibility increases for those 
who are engaged in material production to give 
themselves up also to intellectual activity and 
especially to those forms that bring no material 
gain, but rather find their reward in them- 
selves and which are the highest forms of in- 
tellectual activity. The greater increased leis- 
ure may in part, indeed in overwhelming part, 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION-. 175 

lead to pure intellectual enjoyment. With the 
talented the creative genius will be free and 
the union of material with artistic literary and 
scientific production will be made possible. 

This union, however, will not be simply pos- 
sible. It will be an economic necessity. We 
have seen that a proletarian regime must aim 
to make culture a universal good. If we should 
seek to extend culture in the present sense of 
the word it would end in making the growing 
generation useless for material production and 
hence would undermine the foundations of so- 
ciety. To-day the social division of labor is 
developed in such a manner that material and 
intellectual labor are well-nigh mutually exclu- 
sive. Material production exists under such 
conditions that only the few who have been 
favored by nature or by special conditions are 
able to engage in the higher intellectual labor. 
On the other side intellectual labor as it is 
carried on to-day makes those who follow it 
incapable of and disinclined toward physical 
labor. To give culture to all mankind under 
such conditions would simply make all material 
production impossible because then no one 
would be found who could or would carry it on. 
If we are to make the higher intellectual cul- 
ture a common good without endangering the 
existence of society, then not simply pedagogi- 
cal but economic necessity demands that this be 
done in such a manner that the growing genera- 
tion will be made familiar in schools not simply 



176 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 



with intellectual but also with physical labor 
and the habit of uniting intellectual and mate- 
rial production will be firmly rooted. 

The proletarian regime must proceed from 
two directions to secure the union of material 
and intellectual production and to free the latter 
in the mass of the population from its present 
material fetters. On the one side this must be 
done through the continuous shortening of the 
labor time of the so-called hand laborers. This 
will come as a result of the increasing pro- 
ductivity of labor whereby more time will be 
continuously granted for intellectual labor to 
those engaged in material production. On the 
other side this will be accomplished by an in- 
crease of the physical labor of the cultured, an 
unavoidable result of the continual increase in 
numbers of the latter. 

It is, however, plain that with this union, 
physical labor for gain and for the necessary 
labor in the interest of society, and intellectual 
labor for the free exercise of personality would 
be freed from every social compulsion. For 
intellectual labor is much more incompatible 
with such compulsion than physical. This lib- 
eration of intellectual labor by the proletariat 
is not the pious wish of the Utopian but the 
economically necessary consequence of its vic- 
tory. 

Finally we must observe the third form of 
intellectual production — ^that which is capital- 
istically exploited. Since the first of these 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION". 177 

three forms of intellectual production includes 
mainlj science and the second the fine arts, so 
what we have to say now applies to the utiliza- 
tion of all spheres of intellectual activity, but 
particularly, however, to the heroes of the pen 
and the stage, to whom now stand opposed as 
capitalist directors of industry, the publishers, 
periodical owners and theater directors. 

Capitalist exploitation in such a form is im- 
possible of continuance uncfer a proletarian 
regime. It rests, however, upon the fact that 
to get even a questionable intellectual produc- 
tion to the public requires an expensive tech- 
nical apparatus and extensive co-operative 
powers. The individual cannot here act for 
himself. Does that, however, not mean that 
here again the alternative to capitalist industry 
is national industry ? If this is so, must not the 
centering of so great and important a part of 
the intellectual life in the State threaten in the 
highest degree that intellectual life with uni- 
formity and stagnation ? It is true that the 
governmental power will cease to be a class 
organ, but will it not still be the organ of a 
majority? Can the intellectual life be made 
dependent upon the decisions of the majority? 
Would not every new truth, every new concep- 
tion and discovery be comprehended and thought 
out by the insignificant minority? Does not 
this new order threaten to bring at once the 
best and keenest of the intellectual thinkers in 
the various spheres into continuous conflict with 



178 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

the proletarian regime ? And even if this ere 
ates increased freedom for tlie artistic and sci- 
entific development would not this be more than 
offset bj the fetters that it will lay upon the 
intellectual activity when this can only be pur- 
sued by social means? Here is certainly an 
important but not an insoluble problem. 

We must first notice that as for all produc- 
tion so also for the social necessities of intel- 
lectual production the State will from the be- 
ginning not be the only leading and means- 
granting organ which will come into considera- 
tion, but there will also be municipalities. 
Through these alone all uniformity and every 
domination of the intellectual life by central 
power is excluded. As another substitute for 
the capitalist industry in individual produc- 
tion, still other organizations must be consid- 
ered ; those of /ree unions which will serve art 
and science and the public life and advance 
production in these spheres in the most diverse 
ways, or undertake them directly as even to- 
day we have countless unions which bring 
out plays, publish newspapers, purchase artistic 
works, publish writings, fit out scientific expedi- 
tions, etc. The shorter the hours of labor in 
material production and the higher the wages 
the more will these free unions be favored. 
They must increase in numbers, in enthusiasm 
and in the intelligence of their members as well 
as in the resources which the intellectuals can 
contribute to support the common cause. I 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 179 

expect that these free unions will play an even 
more important role in the intellectual life. It 
is their destiny to enter into the place now occu- 
pied by capital and individual production and 
to organize and to lead the social nature. 

Here also the proletarian regime leads not 
to greater bondage but to greater freedom. 

Freedom of education and of scientific in- 
vestigation from the fetters of capitalist do- 
minion ; freedom of the individual from the op- 
pression of exclusive, exhaustive physical labor ; 
displacement of the capitalist industry in the 
intellectual production of society by the free 
unions, — along this road proceeds the tendency 
of the proletarian regime in the sphere of in- 
tellectual production. 

We see that the problems in the field of pro- 
duction are of a contradictory nature. The 
capitalist system of production has created the 
task of formulating the social process of produc- 
tion in a simple and systematic manner. This 
task consists in placing the individual in a 
fixed order to whose rules he must conform. 
On the other side this same manner of produc- 
tion has more than ever brought the individual 
to a self-consciousness, placed him on his own 
feet and freed him from society. More than 
ever mankind demands to-day the possibility of 
developing a personality and its relation to 
other men in order to determine in the freest 
manner the more sensitive and individual of 
these relations, especially the marriage rela- 



180 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 

tion, but also their relation as artists and think- 
ers to the external world. 

Regulation of social chaos and liberation of 
the individual — these are the two historical 
tasks that capitalism has placed before society. 
They appear to be contradictory, but they are 
simultaneously soluble because each of them be- 
longs to a different sphere of social life. Un- 
doubtedly whoever should seek to rule both 
spheres in the same manner would find himself 
involved in insoluble contradictions. It is on 
this point that anarchism is wrecked. Anar- 
chism arises out of the reaction of the little 
bourgeois against the repressive and oppres- 
sive capitalism. The little handworker who 
was accustomed to direct his labor according to 
his own pleasure rebels against the discipline 
and the monotony of the factory. His ideal re- 
mains the free labor of the individual and when 
this is no longer possible he seeks to replace it 
by common working together in free unions 
wholly independent of each other. 

The *'new middle class," the intellectuals, is, 
as we have already seen many times, in its 
social position only a refined and more sensi- 
tive expression of the earlier little bourgeois. 
Its manner of working develops in them the 
same need for free labor, the same repugnance 
to discipline and uniformity. So it is that 
their social ideal becomes the same as that of 
the small bourgeois, that is the anarchist* But 
that which is a progressive ideal in their sphere 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 181 

of production shows itself to be reactionary in 
the field of material production where it corre- 
sponds to the conditions of production of the 
now extinct hand work. 

In the present stage of production there are 
only two possible forms of material production 
so far as production in quantities is concerned, 
aside from a few remnants which are mainly 
curiosities: on the one side communistic with 
social property in the means of production, and 
the systematic direction of production from a 
central point, or the capitalistic. The anar- 
chistic system of production can, under the best 
conditions, be only a transitory episode. Mate- 
rial production through free unions without 
central production leads to chaos unless the 
commodities produced exchange on the basis of 
the law of value determined by free competi- 
tion. We have seen above what the consequence 
is for individual industry under free competi- 
tion. It determines the correct proportionality 
of individual means of production to one an- 
other and prevents any one from swamping 
society 'vith buttons or leaving it without bread. 
Production of commodities under the present 
conditions of social production must continu- 
ously take on some form of capitalist produc- 
tion, as countless productive co-operatives have 
shown. To strive for an anarchist ideal in 
material production is at best a Sisyphus task. 

It is wholly different with intellectual pro- 
duction. This is built upon material produc- 



182 THE SOCIAL, REVOLUTION. 

tion, on the surplus of products and labor pow- 
ers which proceed from material production. 
It is possible only when material life is secured. 
If the latter falls into confusion then our whole 
existence is threatened. Consequently it is ab- 
sohitelj unimportant for society in what rela- 
tions the existing surplus of products and labor 
powers are applied to the individual fields of 
free intellectual creation. The exception to this 
is the educational system which has its special 
laws, and has not yet been turned over to free 
competition in any society, but has been socially 
regulated. Society would fall into bad condi- 
tion if all the world should set to work at the 
manufacture of one kind of commodities such, 
for example, as buttons, and thereby direct too 
much labor power to this, so that not enough 
was left for the production of others, such, for 
example, as bread. On the other hand the rela- 
tion between lyric poems and tragedies, works 
on Assyriology and botany which are to be pro- 
duced is no essential one; it has neither maxi- 
mum nor minimum point. If to-day there 
should be twice as many dramas as yesterday, 
and at the same time one-half as many lyrics, 
or if to-day twenty works on Assyriology should 
appear and only ten Botanical, while yesterday 
the relations were reversed, still the existence 
of society would not be touched in the slightest 
thereby. These facts find their economic ex- 
pression in that the law of value, in spite of all 
psychological theories of value, only holds good 



THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTIOlSr. 183 

for material production and not for intellectual. 
In this field a central direction of production is 
not only unnecessary, but absolutely foolish. 
Here free production can rule without the ne- 
cessity of production of commodities of value 
or of capitalist production. 

Communism in material production, anarch^ 
ism in the intellectual. This is the type of the 
socialist productive system which will arise 
from the dominion of the proletariat or, in 
other words, out of the social revolution by the 
logic of economic facts whatever may be the 
wishes, ideas and theories of the proletariat. 

THE PRELIMINAKY PSYCHICAL CONDITIONS TO 
THE DOMINION OF THE PROLETARIAT. 

It will have occurred to very many readers 
that in this investigation I have spoken only 
of economic conditions. I have not investi- 
gated what are to be the ethical foundations of 
the new society, whether they shall rest upon 
Kantian or Spencerian, upon the categorical 
imperative, or whether the greatest good to the 
greatest number shall be the principal motive. 
I have not investigated which of the above 
theories shall constitute the juridical founda- 
tion, whether the right to the complete product 
of labor, or the right to existence, or some other 
one of the fundamental economic rights which 
the judicial socialists have discovered. No 
doubt laws and ethics will play a part in the 



184 THE SOCIAL KEVOLUTION. 

social revolution, bat the determining factor 
will always be the demands of economics. 

But beside law and ethics psychology also 
comes into consideration. Will not problems 
arise therefrom for the proletarian regime and 
those of great significance ? Does not the so- 
cialist society presuppose extraordinary peo- 
ple, actual angels in unselfishness, joy in labor, 
and intelligence ? Will not the social revolution 
with the present race full of egoism and bru- 
tality be the signal for a raging battle for spoils 
or lead to a universal idleness ? All transfor- 
mations of economic foundations amount to 
nothing so long as mankind is not ennobled. 

The treatment and the text are not new. 
They were sung a hundred years ago as the song 
arose of the crushed oppressed classes. The 
gentle landlords of the Holy Alliance would 
gladly have given their beloved children all 
possible freedom, but these children must first 
attain the necessary ripeness. 

I do not intend to deny that every system of 
production demands certain definite technical 
and also psychological preliminary conditions 
in order to enable it to be realized. What shall 
be the necessary forms of these psychological 
conditions of a given manner of production de- 
pends upon the character of the economic tasks 
which it sets forth. 

"No one will claim that in my investigation I 
have presupposed mankind of an angelic char- 
acter. The problem that we have to solve pre- 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 185 

supposes intelligence, discipline and talent for 
organization. These are the psychological 
foundations of a socialist society. Those are 
just the ones that the capitalist society has cre- 
ated. It is the historical task of capital to dis- 
cipline and organize the laborers, and to widen 
their intellectual horizon beyond the boundaries 
of the workshop and the church door- 

For socialism to rise on the basis of hand 
work or agricultural industry is impossible, not 
simply on economic grounds because of the low 
productivity of industry, but also for psycho- 
logical reasons. I have already shown how 
small bourgeois psychology inclines towards 
anarchy and opposes the discipline of the social 
industry. It is one of the greatest difficulties 
that capital meets in the beginnings of capitalist 
production, in that it must take its first laborers 
directly from hand work or from agriculture. 
It had to fight with this in the eighteenth cen- 
tury in England and to-day in the Southern 
States of America which renders very difficult 
the rapid advance of the great industry not- 
withstanding the nearness to raw materials 
greatly favors such industry. 

ISiot discipline alone but also the talent for 
organization is difficult of development in lit- 
tle bourgeois and agricultural positions. There 
are no great bodies of men to be united in sys- 
tematic co-operation. On this economic stage 
it is only the soldiers who offer the opportunity 
to organize in great bodies. The great gen- 



186 THE SOCIAL REYOLUTION". 

erals are also great organizers. Capitalist pro> 
duction transplants the task of organization of 
great masses of the community to industry. 
The capitalists constitute naturally the head 
people, the field generals of those who are un- 
der them and become prominent factors in or- 
ganization. Correspondingly the organizing 
talent in its appointees is very highly valued 
and rewarded by capital. Under these condi- 
tions the organizing talent grows rapidly. It 
can be applied equally well to the uses of a 
proletarian regime that will also need numer- 
ous directors of factories and orsranizers of 
trusts. 

Capital also demands intelligent labor power, 
so we see that the competitive struggle above all 
enforces the betterment of the industrial school. 
On the other side the development of industry 
and the existence of newspapers contributes to 
extend the intellectual horizon of the laborer. 

But not alone the pressure of capital in the 
exploitation of great bodies of labor, but the 
struggle of the proletarian against this exploita- 
tion develops the psychological conditions for 
socialist production; it develops discipline in 
every way, as we have already seen, of a wholly 
different character and from that given capital, 
and this stru|2:gle develops also a talent for or- 
ganization, for it is only through the unani- 
mous co-operation of the creat body of man- 
kind that the proletariat can assert itself a2:ainst 
capital and the capitalist state. Organization 



THE SOCIAL EEVOLUTION. 187 

is the most important weapon of the proletariat 
and nearly all its great leaders are also great 
organizers. To the money of capital, and 
the weapon of the military States, the prole- 
tariat has nothing to oppose save its economic 
indispensability and its organization. That its 
intelligence grows with these and through these 
needs no proof. 

The social revolution requires high intelli- 
gence, strict discipline and complete organiza- 
tion of this great mass and these must exist 
simultaneously with and be indispensable to 
economic life if it is to attain strength to over- 
come so extremely powerful an opponent. We 
may expect that it will only succeed when these 
peculiarities are developed in the highest de- 
gree and also that the victory of the proletariat 
and therewith the social revolution will not 
come before not only the economic but also the 
psychological conditions to a socialist society 
are present in a high degree. This does not 
mean that mankind should be angels nor that 
we shall need to wait so very long for its 
psychological ripeness. 

While the modern proletariat has need of no 
great change in order to make it ripe for so- 
cialist society, nevertheless we may expect that 
this society will greatly alter the character of 
mankind. That which is demanded as a 'pre- 
liminary condition to a socialist society, and 
which the capitalist society makes impossible, 
and which would be therefore the most impos- 



188 THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 

sible preliminary condition, that is, tlie crea- 
tion of a higher type of mankind than the 
modern one, that will be the natural result of 
socialism. It will bring security, rest and lei- 
sure to mankind ; it will raise their minds above 
the commonplace because they will no longer 
need to continuously think of where the bread 
for the morrow is to come from. It will make 
personalities independent of other personalities, 
so that the feeling of slavery as well as of hu- 
man adoration will disappear. It will at the 
same time create a balance between country and 
city, make the treasures of the cultured rich 
attainable to all mankind and give back to them 
the nature which arises from the strength and 
joy of living. 

Simultaneously with the abolition of the 
physiological roots of pessimism it will do away 
with the social ones also, together with the 
misery and degradation of the one who makes a 
virtue of necessity, and the satiety of the other 
who in idle luxury has drained the cup of en- 
joyment even to the dregs. 

Socialism will abolish poverty and satiety 
and unnaturalness, make mankind joyful, ap- 
preciative of beauty, capable of happiness, and 
thereby it will bring freedom in scientific and 
artistic creation for all. 

May we not expect that under such condi- 
tions a new type of mankind will arise which 
will be far superior to the highest type which 
culture has hitherto created? An over-man 



THE SOCIAL REVOLUTION. 189 

(Uebermenscli), if you will, not as an exception 
but as a rule, an over-man compared v^ith his 
predecessors, but not as opposed to bis com- 
rades, a noble man who seeks his satisfaction 
not by being great among crippled dwarfs, but 
great among the great, happy among the happy 
— ^who does not draw his feeling of strength 
from the fact that he raises himself upon the 
bodies of the down-trodden, but because a union 
with his fellow-workers gives him courage to 
dare the attainment of the highest tasks. 

So we may expect that a realm of strength 
and of beauty will arise that will be worthy the 
ideal of our best and noblest thinkers. 



HX Kautsky, Karl 

276 The social revolution 

K3 

1902 



PLEASE DO NOT REMOVE 
CARDS OR SLIPS FROM THIS POCKET 

ERINDALE COLLEGE LIBRARY 



l/ 



